 

Curry's Paradox Fund I Lp raised $693,616 on August 17th, 2015































Want to see more?Want to find out who got funded, and who’s funding the next big thing? in real time? all across the world? tailored to your specific areas of focus?100+ deals per dayGet access to the most exhaustive worldwide funding watch on the web!Comprehensive funding informationKnow about who invested in a company, which sites covered the event, the funding history, etc.Exclusive insightsView original analytics such as most dynamic industries, most active investors, and more!Stay aware!Get emailed when deals critical to your business happen. Filter by region, industry and topics of interest.As seen onHave a login?Sign inRegister now!It's free!Use your social accountOr fill in the quick form:Register nowpromise we won't spamSign invia your social account:via your existing WGF account:Remember meRegister, it's freeForgot your password?SIGN INForgot your password?Enter your e-mail and we will send you your new password.reset passwordThe world's largest funding base/deals/365216-currys-paradox-fund-i-lpsection=deals&subsection=detail&id=365216  




			Search deals by company name, industry, location, investors...			
			




SEARCH


Curry's Paradox Fund I Lp raised $693,616 on August 17th, 2015.Get alertedif Curry's Paradox Fund I Lp gets funded!Amount:$693,616Company:Curry's Paradox Fund I LpInvestors:-Industry:FinanceCountry:State:City:United StatesCaliforniaSan FranciscoKey people:LLC AngelList Advisors, (Director) LLC Assure Fund Management, (Director) Jens Beyrich (Executive Officer)Data sources:www.sec.gov - D - Curry's Paradox Fund I, LP (0001651137) (Filer)Description:Curry's Paradox Fund I Lp has closed its 690K securities offering. Curry's Paradox Fund I Lp, a San Francisco, United States-based firm, is a Finance company. The transaction took place in August 17th, 2015.Please note that all data is automatically extracted and errors can occur.The WhoGotFunded team has not necessarily reviewed the information in this page and has not determined if it is accurate and complete.Inaccurate Data? Help us improve WhoGotFunded: post a comment!


List of paradoxes - Wikipedia





















 






List of paradoxes

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Economic paradox)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This is a list of paradoxes, grouped thematically. The grouping is approximate, as paradoxes may fit into more than one category. Because of varying definitions of the term paradox, some of the following are not considered to be paradoxes by everyone. This list collects only scenarios that have been called a paradox by at least one source and have their own article.
Although considered paradoxes, some of these are based on fallacious reasoning, or incomplete/faulty analysis. Informally, the term is often used to describe a counter-intuitive result.



Contents


1 Logic

1.1 Self-reference
1.2 Vagueness


2 Mathematics

2.1 Statistics
2.2 Probability
2.3 Infinity and infinitesimals
2.4 Geometry and topology


3 Decision theory
4 Physics

4.1 Astrophysics
4.2 Classical mechanics
4.3 Cosmology
4.4 Electromagnetism
4.5 Quantum mechanics
4.6 Relativity
4.7 Thermodynamics


5 Biology

5.1 Health and nutrition


6 Chemistry
7 Time travel
8 Linguistics and artificial intelligence
9 Philosophy
10 Mysticism
11 Economics
12 Perception
13 Politics
14 Psychology and sociology
15 Miscellaneous
16 See also
17 Notes



Logic[edit]

Barbershop paradox: The supposition that if one of two simultaneous assumptions leads to a contradiction, the other assumption is also disproved leads to paradoxical consequences. Not to be confused with the Barber paradox.
What the Tortoise Said to Achilles: "Whatever Logic is good enough to tell me is worth writing down...", also known as Carroll's paradox, not to be confused with the "Achilles and the tortoise" paradox by Zeno of Elea.
Catch-22: A situation in which someone is in need of something that can only be had by not being in need of it. A soldier who wants to be declared insane in order to avoid combat is deemed not insane for that very reason, and will therefore not be declared insane.
Drinker paradox: In any pub there is a customer of whom it is true to say: if that customer drinks, everybody in the pub drinks.
Paradox of entailment: Inconsistent premises always make an argument valid.
Lottery paradox: If there is one winning ticket in a large lottery, it is reasonable to believe of any particular lottery ticket that it is not the winning ticket, but it is not reasonable to believe that no lottery ticket will win.
Raven paradox: (or Hempel's Ravens): Observing a green apple increases the likelihood of all ravens being black.
Ross' paradox: Disjunction introduction poses a problem for imperative inference by seemingly permitting arbitrary imperatives to be inferred.
Unexpected hanging paradox: The day of the hanging will be a surprise, so it cannot happen at all, so it will be a surprise. The surprise examination and Bottle Imp paradox use similar logic.

Self-reference[edit]
These paradoxes have in common a contradiction arising from either self-reference or circular reference, in which several statements refer to each other in a way that following some of the references leads back to the starting point.

Barber paradox: A barber (who is a man) shaves all and only those men who do not shave themselves. Does he shave himself? (Russell's popularization of his set theoretic paradox.)
Bhartrhari's paradox: The thesis that there are some things which are unnameable conflicts with the notion that something is named by calling it unnameable.
Berry paradox: The phrase "the first number not nameable in under ten words" appears to name it in nine words.
Crocodile dilemma: If a crocodile steals a child and promises its return if the father can correctly guess exactly what the crocodile will do, how should the crocodile respond in the case that the father guesses that the child will not be returned?
Paradox of the Court: A law student agrees to pay his teacher after (and only after) winning his first case. The teacher then sues the student (who has not yet won a case) for payment.
Curry's paradox: "If this sentence is true, then Santa Claus exists."
Epimenides paradox: A Cretan says: "All Cretans are liars". This paradox works in mainly the same way as the Liar paradox.
Grelling–Nelson paradox: Is the word "heterological", meaning "not applicable to itself", a heterological word? (Another close relative of Russell's paradox.)
Kleene–Rosser paradox: By formulating an equivalent to Richard's paradox, untyped lambda calculus is shown to be inconsistent.
Liar paradox: "This sentence is false." This is the canonical self-referential paradox. Also "Is the answer to this question 'no'?", and "I'm lying."

Card paradox: "The next statement is true. The previous statement is false." A variant of the liar paradox that does not use self-reference.
Pinocchio paradox: What would happen if Pinocchio said "My nose will be growing"?[1]
Quine's paradox: "'Yields a falsehood when appended to its own quotation' yields a falsehood when appended to its own quotation." Shows that a sentence can be paradoxical even if it is not self-referring and does not use demonstratives or indexicals.
Yablo's paradox: An ordered infinite sequence of sentences, each of which says that all following sentences are false. While constructed to avoid self-reference, there is no consensus whether it relies on self-reference or not.


Opposite Day: "It is opposite day today." Therefore, it is not opposite day, but if you say it is a normal day it would be considered a normal day.
Petronius' paradox: "Moderation in all things, including moderation" (unsourced quotation sometimes attributed to Petronius).
Richard's paradox: We appear to be able to use simple English to define a decimal expansion in a way that is self-contradictory.
Russell's paradox: Does the set of all those sets that do not contain themselves contain itself?
Socratic paradox: "All I know is that I know nothing."

Vagueness[edit]

Ship of Theseus: It seems like you can replace any component of a ship, and it is still the same ship. So you can replace them all, one at a time, and it is still the same ship. However, you can then take all the original pieces, and assemble them into a ship. That, too, is the same ship you began with.


See also List of Ship of Theseus examples


Sorites paradox (also known as the paradox of the heap): If you remove a single grain of sand from a heap, you still have a heap. Keep removing single grains, and the heap will disappear. Can a single grain of sand make the difference between heap and non-heap?

Mathematics[edit]
See also: Category:Mathematics paradoxes and Paradoxes of set theory

All horses are the same color: A proof by induction that all horses have the same color.
Ant on a rubber rope: An ant crawling on a rubber rope can reach the end even when the rope stretches much faster than the ant can crawl.
Cramer's paradox: The number of points of intersection of two higher-order curves can be greater than the number of arbitrary points needed to define one such curve.
Elevator paradox: Elevators can seem to be mostly going in one direction, as if they were being manufactured in the middle of the building and being disassembled on the roof and basement.
Interesting number paradox: The first number that can be considered "dull" rather than "interesting" becomes interesting because of that fact.
Potato paradox: If you let potatoes consisting of 99% water dry so that they are 98% water, they lose 50% of their weight.
Russell's paradox: Does the set of all those sets that do not contain themselves contain itself?

Statistics[edit]
See also: Category:Statistical paradoxes

Abelson's paradox: Effect size may not be indicative of practical meaning.
Accuracy paradox: Predictive models with a given level of accuracy may have greater predictive power than models with higher accuracy.
Berkson's paradox: A complicating factor arising in statistical tests of proportions.
Freedman's paradox: Describes a problem in model selection where predictor variables with no explanatory power can appear artificially important.
Friendship paradox: For almost everyone, their friends have more friends than they do.
Inspection paradox: Why one will wait longer for a bus than one should.
Lindley's paradox: Tiny errors in the null hypothesis are magnified when large data sets are analyzed, leading to false but highly statistically significant results.
Low birth weight paradox: Low birth weight and mothers who smoke contribute to a higher mortality rate. Babies of smokers have lower average birth weight, but low birth weight babies born to smokers have a lower mortality rate than other low birth weight babies. This is a special case of Simpson's paradox.
Simpson's paradox, or the Yule–Simpson effect: A trend that appears in different groups of data disappears when these groups are combined, and the reverse trend appears for the aggregate data.
Will Rogers phenomenon: The mathematical concept of an average, whether defined as the mean or median, leads to apparently paradoxical results—for example, it is possible that moving an entry from an encyclopedia to a dictionary would increase the average entry length on both books.

Probability[edit]




The Monty Hall problem: which door do you choose?


See also: Category:Probability theory paradoxes

Bertrand's box paradox: A paradox of conditional probability closely related to the Boy or Girl paradox.
Bertrand's paradox: Different common-sense definitions of randomness give quite different results.
Birthday paradox: What is the chance that two people in a room have the same birthday?
Borel's paradox: Conditional probability density functions are not invariant under coordinate transformations.
Boy or Girl paradox: A two-child family has at least one boy. What is the probability that it has a girl?
Dartboard Puzzle: If a dart is guaranteed to hit a dartboard and the probability of hitting a specific point is positive, adding the infinitely many positive chances yields infinity, but the chance of hitting the dartboard is one. If the probability of hitting each point is zero, the probability of hitting anywhere on the dartboard is zero.[2]
False positive paradox: A test that is accurate the vast majority of the time could show you have a disease, but the probability that you actually have it could still be tiny.
Grice's paradox: Shows that the exact meaning of statements involving conditionals and probabilities is more complicated than may be obvious on casual examination.
Monty Hall problem: An unintuitive consequence of conditional probability.
Necktie paradox: A wager between two people seems to favour them both. Very similar in essence to the Two-envelope paradox.
Nontransitive dice: You can have three dice, called A, B, and C, such that A is likely to win in a roll against B, B is likely to win in a roll against C, and C is likely to win in a roll against A.
Proebsting's paradox: The Kelly criterion is an often optimal strategy for maximizing profit in the long run. Proebsting's paradox apparently shows that the Kelly criterion can lead to ruin.
Sleeping Beauty problem: A probability problem that can be correctly answered as one half or one third depending on how the question is approached.
Three cards problem: When pulling a random card, how do you determine the color of the underside?
Three Prisoners problem: A variation of the Monty Hall problem.
Two-envelope paradox: You are given two indistinguishable envelopes, each of which contains a positive sum of money. One envelope contains twice as much as the other. You may pick one envelope and keep whatever amount it contains. You pick one envelope at random but before you open it you are given the chance to take the other envelope instead.

Infinity and infinitesimals[edit]

Burali-Forti paradox: If the ordinal numbers formed a set, it would be an ordinal number that is smaller than itself.
Cantor's paradox: The set of all sets would have its own power set as a subset, therefore its cardinality would be at least as great as that of its power set. But Cantor's theorem proves that power sets are strictly greater than the sets they are constructed from. Consequently, the set of all sets would contain a subset greater than itself.
Galileo's paradox: Though most numbers are not squares, there are no more numbers than squares. (See also Cantor's diagonal argument)
Hilbert's paradox of the Grand Hotel: If a hotel with infinitely many rooms is full, it can still take in more guests.
Russell's paradox: Does the set of all those sets that do not contain themselves contain itself?
Skolem's paradox: Countably infinite models of set theory contain uncountably infinite sets.
Zeno's paradoxes: "You will never reach point B from point A as you must always get half-way there, and half of the half, and half of that half, and so on." (This is also a physical paradox.)
Supertasks may result in paradoxes such as




Benardete's paradox: Apparently, a man can be "forced to stay where he is by the mere unfulfilled intentions of the gods".
Grandi's series: The sum of 1-1+1-1+1-1... can be either one, zero, or one-half.
Ross–Littlewood paradox: After alternately adding and removing balls to a vase infinitely often, how many balls remain?
Thomson's lamp: After flicking a lamp on and off infinitely often, is it on or off?



Geometry and topology[edit]




The Banach–Tarski paradox: A ball can be decomposed and reassembled into two balls the same size as the original.



Banach–Tarski paradox: Cut a ball into a finite number of pieces and re-assemble the pieces to get two balls, each of equal size to the first. The von Neumann paradox is a two-dimensional analogue.

Paradoxical set: A set that can be partitioned into two sets, each of which is equivalent to the original.


Coastline paradox: the perimeter of a landmass is in general ill-defined.
Coin rotation paradox: a coin rotating along the edge of an identical coin will make a full revolution after traversing only half of the stationary coin's circumference.
Gabriel's Horn: or Torricelli's trumpet: A simple object with finite volume but infinite surface area. Also, the Mandelbrot set and various other fractals are covered by a finite area, but have an infinite perimeter (in fact, there are no two distinct points on the boundary of the Mandelbrot set that can be reached from one another by moving a finite distance along that boundary, which also implies that in a sense you go no further if you walk "the wrong way" around the set to reach a nearby point). This can be represented by a Klein bottle.
Hausdorff paradox: There exists a countable subset C of the sphere S such that S\C is equidecomposable with two copies of itself.
Nikodym set: A set contained in and with the same Lebesgue measure as the unit square, yet for every one of its points there is a straight line intersecting the Nikodym set only in that point.
Sphere eversion: A sphere can, topologically, be turned inside out.

Decision theory[edit]

Abilene paradox: People can make decisions based not on what they actually want to do, but on what they think that other people want to do, with the result that everybody decides to do something that nobody really wants to do, but only what they thought that everybody else wanted to do.
Apportionment paradox: Some systems of apportioning representation can have unintuitive results due to rounding

Alabama paradox: Increasing the total number of seats might shrink one block's seats.
New states paradox: Adding a new state or voting block might increase the number of votes of another.
Population paradox: A fast-growing state can lose votes to a slow-growing state.


Arrow's paradox: Given more than two choices, no system can have all the attributes of an ideal voting system at once.
Buridan's ass: How can a rational choice be made between two outcomes of equal value?
Chainstore paradox: Even those who know better play the so-called chain store game in an irrational manner.
Decision-making paradox: Selecting the best decision-making method is a decision problem in itself.
Fenno's paradox: The belief that people generally disapprove of the United States Congress as a whole, but support the Congressman from their own Congressional district.
Fredkin's paradox: The more similar two choices are, the more time a decision-making agent spends on deciding.
Green paradox: Policies intending to reduce future CO2 emissions may lead to increased emissions in the present.
Hedgehog's dilemma: or Lover's paradox Despite goodwill, human intimacy cannot occur without substantial mutual harm.
Inventor's paradox: It is easier to solve a more general problem that covers the specifics of the sought-after solution.
Kavka's toxin puzzle: Can one intend to drink the non-deadly toxin, if the intention is the only thing needed to get the reward?
Morton's fork: Choosing between unpalatable alternatives.
Navigation paradox: Increased navigational precision may result in increased collision risk.
Newcomb's paradox: How do you play a game against an omniscient opponent?
Paradox of tolerance: Should one tolerate intolerance if intolerance would destroy the possibility of tolerance?
Paradox of voting: Also known as the Downs paradox. For a rational, self-interested voter the costs of voting will normally exceed the expected benefits, so why do people keep voting?
Parrondo's paradox: It is possible to play two losing games alternately to eventually win.
Prevention paradox: For one person to benefit, many people have to change their behavior — even though they receive no benefit, or even suffer, from the change.
Prisoner's dilemma: Two people might not cooperate even if it is in both their best interests to do so.
Voting paradox: Also known as Condorcet's paradox and paradox of voting. A group of separately rational individuals may have preferences that are irrational in the aggregate.
Willpower paradox: Those who kept their minds open were more goal-directed and more motivated than those who declared their objective to themselves.

Physics[edit]
For more details on this topic, see Physical paradox.


Play media


A demonstration of the tea leaf paradox



Cool tropics paradox: A contradiction between modelled estimates of tropical temperatures during warm, ice-free periods of the Cretaceous and Eocene, and the lower temperatures that proxies suggest were present.
Irresistible force paradox: What would happen if an unstoppable force hit an immovable object?
Paradox of Place: If everything that exist has a place, that place must have a place, and so on ad infinitum.
Paradox of the grain of millet: When a grain of millet falls it makes no sound, but when a thousand grains fall they do, thus many of nothing become something.
The Moving Rows

Astrophysics[edit]

Algol paradox: In some binaries the partners seem to have different ages, even though they are thought to have formed at the same time.
Faint young Sun paradox: The contradiction between existence of liquid water early in the Earth's history and the expectation that the output of the young Sun would have been insufficient to melt ice on Earth.
GZK paradox: Extreme-energy cosmic rays have been observed that seem to violate the Greisen–Zatsepin–Kuzmin limit, which is a consequence of special relativity.
Paradox of youth: Compared to theory, there is an overabundance of young stars close to the supermassive black hole in the Galactic Center.

Classical mechanics[edit]

Achilles and the tortoise: If the tortoise is ahead of achilles, by the time Achilles reaches the tortoise's current position, the tortoise will have moved a bit further ahead, which goes on indefinitely.
Archer's paradox: An archer must, in order to hit his target, not aim directly at it, but slightly to the side. Not to be confused with the arrow paradox.
Arrow paradox If we divide time into discrete 0-duration slices, no motion is happening in each of them, so taking them all as a whole, motion is impossible.
Hydrostatic paradox: A massive battleship can float in a few litres of water.
Aristotle's wheel paradox: Rolling joined concentric wheels seem to trace the same distance with their circumferences, even though the circumferences are different.
Carroll's paradox: The angular momentum of a stick should be zero, but is not.
D'Alembert's paradox: Flow of an inviscid fluid produces no net force on a solid body.
Knudsen paradox: Based on the Navier–Stokes equations, one would expect the mass flux in a channel to decrease with increasing Knudsen number, but there is a distinct minimum around Knudsen number 0.8.
Denny's paradox: Surface-dwelling arthropods (such as the water strider) should not be able to propel themselves horizontally.
Dichotomy paradox: To reach its target, an airborne arrow must first reach an infinite number of midpoints between its current position and the target.
Elevator paradox: Even though hydrometers are used to measure fluid density, a hydrometer will not indicate changes of fluid density caused by changing atmospheric pressure.
Feynman sprinkler: Which way does a sprinkler rotate when submerged in a tank and made to suck in the surrounding fluid?
Painlevé paradox: Rigid-body dynamics with contact and friction is inconsistent.
Tea leaf paradox: When a cup of tea is stirred, the leaves assemble in the center, even though centrifugal force pushes them outward.
Upstream contamination: When a fluid is poured from a higher container onto a lower one, particles can climb up the falling water.

Cosmology[edit]

Bentley's paradox: In a Newtonian universe, gravitation should pull all matter into a single point.
Boltzmann brain: If the universe we observe resulted from a random thermodynamic fluctuation, it would be vastly more likely to be a simple one than the complex one we observe. The simplest case would be just a brain floating in vacuum, having the thoughts and sensations you have.
Fermi paradox: If there are, as various arguments suggest, many other sentient species in the Universe, then where are they? Shouldn't their presence be obvious?
Heat death paradox: If the universe was infinitely old, it would be in thermodynamical equilibrium, which contradicts what we observe.
Olbers' paradox: Why is the night sky dark if there is an infinity of stars, covering every part of the celestial sphere?

Electromagnetism[edit]

Faraday paradox: An apparent violation of Faraday's law of electromagnetic induction.

Quantum mechanics[edit]

Aharonov–Bohm effect: a charged particle is affected by an electromagnetic field even though it has no local contact with that field
Bell's theorem: Why do measured quantum particles not satisfy mathematical probability theory?
Double-slit experiment: Matter and energy can act as a wave or as a particle depending on the experiment.
Einstein–Podolsky–Rosen paradox: Can far away events influence each other in quantum mechanics?
Extinction paradox: In the small wavelength limit, the total scattering cross section of an impenetrable sphere is twice its geometrical cross-sectional area (which is the value obtained in classical mechanics).[3]
Hardy's paradox: How can we make inferences about past events that we haven't observed while at the same time acknowledge that the act of observing it affects the reality we are inferring to?
Klein paradox: When the potential of a potential barrier becomes similar to the mass of the impinging particle, it becomes transparent.
Mott problem: Spherically symmetric wave functions, when observed, produce linear particle tracks.
Quantum LC circuit paradox: Energies stored on capacitance and inductance are not equal to the ground state energy of the quantum oscillator.[citation needed]
Quantum pseudo-telepathy: Two players who can not communicate accomplish tasks that seemingly require direct contact.
Quantum Zeno effect: (Turing paradox) echoing the Zeno paradox, a quantum particle that is continuously observed cannot change its state
Schrödinger's cat paradox: According to the Copenhagen interpretation of quantum mechanics, a cat could be simultaneously alive and dead, as long as it remains unobserved.
Uncertainty principle: Attempts to determine position must disturb momentum, and vice versa.

Relativity[edit]

Bell's spaceship paradox: concerning relativity.
Black hole information paradox: Black holes violate a commonly assumed tenet of science that information cannot be destroyed.
Ehrenfest paradox: On the kinematics of a rigid rotating disk.
Ladder paradox: A classic relativity problem.
Mocanu's velocity composition paradox: a paradox in special relativity.
Supplee's paradox: the buoyancy of a relativistic object (such as a bullet) appears to change when the reference frame is changed from one in which the bullet is at rest to one in which the fluid is at rest.
Trouton-Noble or Right-angle lever paradox: Does a torque arise in static systems when changing frames?
Twin paradox: The theory of relativity predicts that a person making a round trip will return younger than his or her identical twin who stayed at home.

Thermodynamics[edit]

Gibbs paradox: In an ideal gas, is entropy an extensive variable?
Loschmidt's paradox: Why is there an inevitable increase in entropy when the laws of physics are invariant under time reversal? The time reversal symmetry of physical laws appears to contradict the second law of thermodynamics.
Maxwell's demon: The second law of thermodynamics seems to be violated by a cleverly operated trapdoor.[4]
Mpemba effect: Hot water can, under certain conditions, freeze faster than cold water, even though it must pass the lower temperature on the way to freezing.
Duncan's Paradox: Gas-surface reactions create either steady-state temperature or pressure differentials that can be used in perpetual motion machines.[5][6]


Schmidt's Paradox (In Russian): – the contradiction (discovered in 1917) between the observed vertical turbulent heat flux in the surface layer and the theory of heat conduction in the atmosphere .

Biology[edit]

Antarctic paradox: In some areas of the oceans, phytoplankton concentrations are low despite there apparently being sufficient nutrients.
C-value enigma: Genome size does not correlate with organismal complexity. For example, some unicellular organisms have genomes much larger than that of humans.
Cole's paradox: Even a tiny fecundity advantage of one additional offspring would favor the evolution of semelparity.
Gray's paradox: Despite their relatively small muscle mass, dolphins can swim at high speeds and obtain large accelerations.
Hormesis: Exposure to small doses of toxins can have beneficial effects.
Lek paradox: Persistent female choice for particular male trait values should erode genetic variance in male traits and thereby remove the benefits of choice, yet choice persists.
Lombard's paradox: When rising to stand from a sitting or squatting position, both the hamstrings and quadriceps contract at the same time, despite their being antagonists to each other.
Paradox of enrichment: Increasing the food available to an ecosystem may lead to instability, and even to extinction.
Paradox of the pesticides: Applying pesticide to a pest may increase the pest's abundance.
Paradox of the plankton: Why are there so many different species of phytoplankton, even though competition for the same resources tends to reduce the number of species?
Sherman paradox: An anomalous pattern of inheritance in the fragile X syndrome.
Temporal paradox (paleontology): When did the ancestors of birds live?

Health and nutrition[edit]

French paradox: The observation that the French suffer a relatively low incidence of coronary heart disease, despite having a diet relatively rich in saturated fats, which are assumed to be the leading dietary cause of such disease.
Glucose paradox: The large amount of glycogen in the liver cannot be explained by its small glucose absorption.
Hispanic paradox: The finding that Hispanics in the United States tend to have substantially better health than the average population in spite of what their aggregate socio-economic indicators predict.
Israeli paradox: The observation that Israelis suffer a relatively high incidence of coronary heart disease, despite having a diet very low in saturated fats, which are assumed to be the leading dietary cause of such disease.
Meditation paradox: The amplitude of heart rate oscillations during meditation was significantly greater than in the pre-meditation control state and also in three non-meditation control groups[7]
Mexican paradox: Mexican children tend to have higher birth weights than can be expected from their socio-economic status.
Obesity survival paradox: Although the negative health consequences of obesity in the general population are well supported by the available evidence, health outcomes in certain subgroups seem to be improved at an increased BMI.
Peto's paradox: Humans and other small-to-medium-sized mammals get cancer with high frequency, while larger mammals, like whales, do not. If cancer is essentially a negative outcome lottery at the cell level, and larger organisms have more cells, and thus more potentially cancerous cell divisions, one would expect larger organisms to be more predisposed to cancer.
Pulsus paradoxus: A pulsus paradoxus is an exaggerated decrease in systolic blood pressure during inspiration. It can indicate certain medical conditions in which there is reduced cardiac output, such as cardiac tamponade or constrictive pericarditis. Also known as the Pulse Paradox.[8]
Second wind: The "second wind" is a sudden period of increased wakefulness in individuals deprived of sleep that tends to coincide with the individual's circadian rhythm. Although the individual is more wakeful and aware of their surroundings, they are continuing to accrue sleep debt and thus, are actually exacerbating their sleep deprivation.

Chemistry[edit]

Faraday paradox (electrochemistry): Diluted nitric acid will corrode steel, while concentrated nitric acid will not.
Levinthal paradox: The length of time that it takes for a protein chain to find its folded state is many orders of magnitude shorter than it would be if it freely searched all possible configurations.
SAR paradox: Exceptions to the principle that a small change in a molecule causes a small change in its chemical behaviour are frequently profound.

Time travel[edit]

Bootstrap paradox, (also ontological paradox) Can a time traveler send himself information with no outside source?
Polchinski's paradox: A billiard ball can be thrown into a wormhole in such a way that it would emerge in the past and knock its incoming past self away from the wormhole entrance, creating a variant of the grandfather paradox.
Predestination paradox: A man travels back in time to discover the cause of a famous fire. While in the building where the fire started, he accidentally knocks over a kerosene lantern and causes a fire, the same fire that would inspire him, years later, to travel back in time. The bootstrap paradox is closely tied to this, in which, as a result of time travel, information or objects appear to have no beginning.
Temporal paradox: What happens when a time traveler does things in the past that prevent him from doing them in the first place?




Grandfather paradox: You travel back in time and kill your grandfather before he conceives one of your parents, which precludes your own conception and, therefore, you couldn't go back in time and kill your grandfather.
Hitler's murder paradox: You travel back in time and kill a famous person in history before they become famous; but if the person had never been famous, then he could not have been targeted as a famous person.



Linguistics and artificial intelligence[edit]

Bracketing paradox: Is a "historical linguist" a linguist who is historical, or someone who studies "historical linguistics"?
Code-talker paradox: How can a language both enable communication and block communication?
Moravec's paradox: Logical thought is hard for humans and easy for computers, but picking a screw from a box of screws is an unsolved problem.
Movement paradox: In transformational linguistics, there are pairs of sentences in which the sentence without movement is ungrammatical while the sentence with movement is not.
Sayre's paradox: In automated handwriting recognition, a cursively written word cannot be recognized without being segmented and cannot be segmented without being recognized.

Philosophy[edit]

Paradox of analysis: It seems that no conceptual analysis can meet the requirements both of correctness and of informativeness.
Buridan's bridge: Will Plato throw Socrates into the water or not?
Paradox of fiction: How can people experience strong emotions from purely fictional things?
Fitch's paradox: If all truths are knowable, then all truths must in fact be known.
Paradox of free will: If God knows in advance how we will decide, how can there be free will?
Goodman's paradox: Why can induction be used to confirm that things are "green", but not to confirm that things are "grue"?
Paradox of hedonism: When one pursues happiness itself, one is miserable; but, when one pursues something else, one achieves happiness.
Hutton's Paradox: If asking oneself "Am I dreaming?" in a dream proves that one is, what does it prove in waking life?
Liberal paradox: "Minimal Liberty" is incompatible with Pareto optimality.
Meno's paradox: (Learner's paradox) A man cannot search either for what he knows or for what he does not know.
Mere addition paradox: (Parfit's paradox) Is a large population living a barely tolerable life better than a small, happy population?
Moore's paradox: "It's raining, but I don't believe that it is."
Newcomb's paradox: A paradoxical game between two players, one of whom can predict the actions of the other.
Paradox of nihilism: Several distinct paradoxes share this name.
Omnipotence paradox: Can an omnipotent being create a rock too heavy for itself to lift?
Preface paradox: The author of a book may be justified in believing that all his statements in the book are correct, at the same time believing that at least one of them is incorrect.
Problem of evil: (Epicurean paradox) The existence of evil seems to be incompatible with the existence of an omnipotent, omniscient, and morally perfect God.
Rule-following paradox: Even though rules are intended to determine actions, "no course of action could be determined by a rule, because any course of action can be made out to accord with the rule".
When a white horse is not a horse: White horses are not horses because white and horse refer to different things.
Zeno's paradoxes: "You will never reach point B from point A as you must always get half-way there, and half of the half, and half of that half, and so on ..." (This is also a paradox of the infinite)

Mysticism[edit]

Maya_(illusion): Our illusions are not real, yet it's real that illusion itself exists.


Tzimtzum: In Kabbalah, how to reconcile self-awareness of finite Creation with Infinite Divine source, as an emanated causal chain would seemingly nullify existence. Luria's initial withdrawal of God in Hasidic panentheism involves simultaneous illusionism of Creation (Upper Unity) and self-aware existence (Lower Unity), God encompassing logical opposites.

Economics[edit]
See also: Category:Economics paradoxes
One class of paradoxes in economics are the paradoxes of competition, in which behavior that benefits a lone actor would leave everyone worse off if everyone did the same. These paradoxes are classified into circuit, classical and Marx paradoxes.

Allais paradox: A change in a possible outcome that is shared by different alternatives affects people's choices among those alternatives, in contradiction with expected utility theory.
The Antitrust Paradox:[dubious – discuss]: A book arguing that antitrust enforcement artificially raised prices by protecting inefficient competitors from competition.
Arrow information paradox: To sell information you need to give it away before the sale.
Bertrand paradox: Two players reaching a state of Nash equilibrium both find themselves with no profits gained via exploitation.
Braess' paradox: Adding extra capacity to a network can reduce overall performance.
Deaton paradox: Consumption varies surprisingly smoothly despite sharp variations in income.
Demographic-economic paradox: nations or subpopulations with higher GDP per capita are observed to have fewer children, even though a richer population can support more children.
Downs–Thomson paradox: Increasing road capacity at the expense of investments in public transport can make overall congestion on the road worse.
Easterlin paradox: For countries with income sufficient to meet basic needs, the reported level of happiness does not correlate with national income per person.
Edgeworth paradox: With capacity constraints, there may not be an equilibrium.
Ellsberg paradox: People exhibit ambiguity aversion (as distinct from risk aversion), in contradiction with expected utility theory.
European paradox: The perceived failure of European countries to translate scientific advances into marketable innovations.
Gibson's paradox: Why were interest rates and prices correlated?
Giffen paradox: Increasing the price of bread makes poor people eat more of it.
Grossman-Stiglitz paradox: Inability to recoup cost of obtaining market information implies efficient markets cannot exist.
Icarus paradox: Some businesses bring about their own downfall through their own successes.
Jevons paradox: Increases in efficiency lead to even larger increases in demand.
Leontief paradox: Some countries export labor-intensive commodities and import capital-intensive commodities, in contradiction with the Heckscher–Ohlin theorem.
Lucas paradox: Capital is not flowing from developed countries to developing countries despite the fact that developing countries have lower levels of capital per worker, and therefore higher returns to capital.
Mandeville's paradox: Actions that may be vicious to individuals may benefit society as a whole.
Mayfield's paradox: Keeping everyone out of an information system is impossible, but so is getting everybody in.
Metzler paradox: The imposition of a tariff on imports may reduce the relative internal price of that good.
Paradox of prosperity: Why do generations that significantly improve the economic climate seem to generally rear a successor generation that consumes rather than produces?
Paradox of thrift: If everyone saves more money during times of recession, then aggregate demand will fall and will in turn lower total savings in the population.
Paradox of toil: If everyone tries to work during times of recession, lower wages will reduce prices, leading to more deflationary expectations, leading to further thrift, reducing demand and thereby reducing employment.
Paradox of value, also known as diamond-water paradox: Water is more useful than diamonds, yet is a lot cheaper.
Productivity paradox: (also known as Solow computer paradox): Worker productivity may go down, despite technological improvements.
Scitovsky paradox: Using the Kaldor–Hicks criterion, an allocation A may be more efficient than allocation B, while at the same time B is more efficient than A.
Service recovery paradox: Successfully fixing a problem with a defective product may lead to higher consumer satisfaction than in the case where no problem occurred at all.
St. Petersburg paradox: People will only offer a modest fee for a reward of infinite expected value.
Paradox of Plenty: The Paradox of Plenty (resource curse) refers to the paradox that countries and regions with an abundance of natural resources, specifically point-source non-renewable resources like minerals and fuels, tend to have less economic growth and worse development outcomes than countries with fewer natural resources.
Throw away paradox: A trader can gain by throwing away some of his/her initial endowment.
Tullock paradox: Bribing politicians costs less than one would expect, considering how much profit it can yield.

Perception[edit]
For more details on this topic, see Perceptual paradox.




the vertical–horizontal illusion



Tritone paradox: An auditory illusion in which a sequentially played pair of Shepard tones is heard as ascending by some people and as descending by others.
Blub paradox: Cognitive lock of some experienced programmers that prevents them from properly evaluating the quality of programming languages which they do not know.[9]
Optical illusion: A visual illusion which suggests inconsistency, such as an impossible cube or the vertical-horizontal illusion, where the two lines are exactly the same length but appear to be of different lengths.

Politics[edit]

Stability–instability paradox: When two countries each have nuclear weapons, the probability of a direct war between them greatly decreases, but the probability of minor or indirect conflicts between them increases.
Wollheim's paradox: A person can simultaneously advocate two conflicting policy options, A and B, provided that the person believes that democratic decisions should be followed.

Psychology and sociology[edit]

Gender paradox: Women conform more closely than men to sociolinguistics norms that are overtly prescribed, but conform less than men when they are not.
Ironic process theory: Ironic processing is the psychological process whereby an individual's deliberate attempts to suppress or avoid certain thoughts (thought suppression) renders those thoughts more persistent.
Meat paradox: People care about animals, but embrace diets that involve harming them.
Moral paradox: A situation in which moral imperatives clash without clear resolution.
Outcomes paradox: Schizophrenia patients in developing countries seem to fare better than their Western counterparts.[10]
Region-beta paradox: People can sometimes recover more quickly from more intense emotions or pain than from less distressing experiences.
Self-absorption paradox: The contradictory association whereby higher levels of self-awareness are simultaneously associated with higher levels of psychological distress and with psychological well-being.[11]
Stapp's ironical paradox: "The universal aptitude for ineptitude makes any human accomplishment an incredible miracle."
Status paradox: Several paradoxes involve the concept of medical or social status.
Stockdale paradox: "You must never confuse faith that you will prevail in the end—which you can never afford to lose—with the discipline to confront the most brutal facts of your current reality, whatever they might be."
The Paradox of Anti-Semitism: A book arguing that the lack of external persecutions and antagonisms results in the dissolution of Jewish identity, a theory that resonates in works of Dershowitz and Sartre.

Miscellaneous[edit]

Absence paradox: No one is ever "here".
Bonini's paradox: Models or simulations that explain the workings of complex systems are seemingly impossible to construct. As a model of a complex system becomes more complete, it becomes less understandable, for it to be more understandable it must be less complete and therefore less accurate. When the model becomes accurate, it is just as difficult to understand as the real-world processes it represents.
Buttered cat paradox: Humorous example of a paradox from contradicting proverbs.
Intentionally blank page: Many documents contain pages on which the text "This page is intentionally left blank" is printed, thereby making the page not blank.
Observer's paradox: The outcome of an event or experiment is influenced by the presence of the observer.

See also[edit]


Logic portal



Auto-antonym: A word that is encoded with opposing meanings.
Absurdity
Excusable negligence: If a behavior is excusable, it is not negligence.
Gödel's incompleteness theorems: and Tarski's undefinability theorem
Ignore all rules: To obey this rule, it is necessary to ignore it.
Impossible object: A type of optical illusion.
Invalid proof: An apparently correct mathematical derivation that leads to an obvious contradiction.
Logical fallacy: A misconception resulting from incorrect reasoning in argumentation.
Paradox gun: A gun that has characteristics of both (smoothbore) shotguns and rifles.
Paradoxical laughter: Inappropriate laughter, often recognized as such by the laughing person.
Performative contradiction: Some statements contradict the conditions that allow them to be stated.
Proof that 0.999... equals 1
Puzzle
Self-refuting idea
Theories of humor: Incongruity theory and the Ridiculous.

Notes[edit]


^ Eldridge-Smith, Peter; Eldridge-Smith, Veronique (13 January 2010). "The Pinocchio paradox". Analysis. 70 (2): 212–215. ISSN 1467-8284. doi:10.1093/analys/anp173. Retrieved 23 July 2010. 
As of 2010[update], an image of Pinocchio with a speech bubble "My nose will grow now!" has become a minor Internet phenomenon (Google search, Google image search). It seems likely that this paradox has been independently conceived multiple times.
^ Numberphile (2013-07-15), Infinity Paradoxes - Numberphile, retrieved 2016-05-30 
^ Newton, Roger G. (2002). Scattering Theory of Waves and Particles, second edition. Dover Publications. p. 68. ISBN 0-486-42535-5. 
^ Carnap is quoted as saying in 1977 "... the situation with respect to Maxwell's paradox", in Leff, Harvey S.; Rex, A. F., eds. (2003). Maxwell's Demon 2: Entropy, Classical and Quantum Information, Computing (PDF). Institute of Physics. p. 19. ISBN 0-7503-0759-5. Archived from the original (PDF) on 2005-11-09. Retrieved 15 March 2010. 
On page 36, Leff and Rex also quote Goldstein and Goldstein as saying "Smoluchowski fully resolved the paradox of the demon in 1912" in Goldstein, Martin; Goldstein, Inge F. (1993). The Refrigerator and The Universe. Universities Press (India) Pvt. Ltd. p. 228. ISBN 978-81-7371-085-8. OCLC 477206415. Retrieved 15 March 2010. 
^ T.L. Duncan, Phys. Rev. E 61, 4661 (2000).
^ Sheehan, D.P., D.J. Mallin, J.T. Garamella, and W.F. Sheehan, Found. Phys. 44 235 (2014).
^ Peng, C.-K; Isaac C Henry; Joseph E Mietus; Jeffrey M Hausdorff; Gurucharan Khalsa; Herbert Benson; Ary L Goldberger (May 2004). "Heart rate dynamics during three forms of meditation". International Journal of Cardiology. 95 (1): 19–27. PMID 15159033. doi:10.1016/j.ijcard.2003.02.006. Retrieved 23 May 2012. 
^ Khasnis, A.; Lokhandwala, Y. (Jan–Mar 2002). "Clinical signs in medicine: pulsus paradoxus". Journal of Postgraduate Medicine. Mumbai – 400 012, India: 49. 48 (1): 46–9. ISSN 0022-3859. PMID 12082330. Retrieved 21 March 2010. The "paradox" refers to the fact that heart sounds may be heard over the precordium when the radial pulse is not felt. 
^ Hidders, J. "Expressive Power of Recursion and Aggregates in XQuery" (PDF). Retrieved 23 May 2012. : Chapter 1, Introduction.
^ Developing countries: The outcomes paradox Nature.com
^ Trapnell, P. D., & Campbell, J. D. (1999). "Private self-consciousness and the Five-Factor Model of Personality: Distinguishing rumination from reflection". Journal of Personality and Social Psychology, 76, 284–304.








v
t
e


Logic






Outline
History





Fields



Argumentation theory
Axiology
Critical thinking
Logic in computer science
Mathematical logic
Metalogic
Metamathematics
Non-classical logic
Philosophical logic
Philosophy of logic
Set theory





Foundations



Abduction
Analytic and synthetic propositions
Antinomy
A priori and a posteriori
Deduction
Definition
Description
Induction
Inference
Logical form
Logical consequence
Logical truth
Name
Necessity and sufficiency
Meaning
Paradox
Possible world
Presupposition
Probability
Reason
Reference
Semantics
Statement
Strict implication
Substitution
Syntax
Truth
Validity





Lists




topics



Mathematical logic
Boolean algebra
Set theory





other



Logicians
Rules of inference
Paradoxes
Fallacies
Logic symbols











Portal
Category
WikiProject (talk)
changes












v
t
e


Decision theory paradoxes






Abilene
Apportionment
Arrow's
Buridan's ass
Chainstore
Condorcet's
Decision-making
Downs
Ellsberg
Fenno's
Fredkin's
Green
Hedgehog's
Inventor's
Kavka's toxin puzzle
Morton's fork
Navigation
Newcomb's
Parrondo's
Prevention
Prisoner's dilemma
Tolerance
Willpower









List of paradoxes










v
t
e


Economic paradoxes (list)






Allais
Antitrust
Arrow information
Bertrand
Braess's
Competition
Income and fertility
Downs–Thomson
Easterlin
Edgeworth
Ellsberg
European
Gibson's
Giffen good
Icarus
Jevons
Leontief
Lucas
Mandeville's
Mayfield's
Metzler
Plenty
Productivity
Prosperity
Scitovsky
Service recovery
St. Petersburg
Thrift
Toil
Tullock
Value












v
t
e


Logical paradoxes



Self-reference



Barber
Berry
Bhartrhari's
Court
Crocodile
Curry's
Epimenides
Grelling–Nelson
Kleene–Rosser
Liar

Card
Pinocchio
Quine's
Yablo's


Richard's
Russell's
Socratic








Vagueness



Theseus' ship
Sorites





Other paradoxes



Barbershop
Catch-22
Drinker
Entailment
Lottery
Plato's beard
Raven
Ross'
Unexpected hanging






List of paradoxes










v
t
e


Philosophical paradoxes (list)






Analysis
Buridan's bridge
Dream argument
Epicurean
Fiction
Fitch's knowability
Free will
Goodman's
Hedonism
Liberal
Meno's
Mere addition
Moore's
Newcomb's
Nihilism
Omnipotence
Preface
Rule-following
White horse
Zeno's













 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=List_of_paradoxes&oldid=791566219#Economics"					
Categories: ParadoxesLists related to philosophical problemsHidden categories: Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2010All articles containing potentially dated statementsAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from April 2010All accuracy disputesArticles with disputed statements from February 2014Use dmy dates from October 2010Articles containing video clips 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةবাংলাفارسیFrançaisहिन्दीOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаPortuguêsРусскийSlovenščinaSuomiTürkçeУкраїнськаZazaki 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 21 July 2017, at 02:57.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









List of paradoxes - Wikipedia





















 






List of paradoxes

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Economic paradox)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This is a list of paradoxes, grouped thematically. The grouping is approximate, as paradoxes may fit into more than one category. Because of varying definitions of the term paradox, some of the following are not considered to be paradoxes by everyone. This list collects only scenarios that have been called a paradox by at least one source and have their own article.
Although considered paradoxes, some of these are based on fallacious reasoning, or incomplete/faulty analysis. Informally, the term is often used to describe a counter-intuitive result.



Contents


1 Logic

1.1 Self-reference
1.2 Vagueness


2 Mathematics

2.1 Statistics
2.2 Probability
2.3 Infinity and infinitesimals
2.4 Geometry and topology


3 Decision theory
4 Physics

4.1 Astrophysics
4.2 Classical mechanics
4.3 Cosmology
4.4 Electromagnetism
4.5 Quantum mechanics
4.6 Relativity
4.7 Thermodynamics


5 Biology

5.1 Health and nutrition


6 Chemistry
7 Time travel
8 Linguistics and artificial intelligence
9 Philosophy
10 Mysticism
11 Economics
12 Perception
13 Politics
14 Psychology and sociology
15 Miscellaneous
16 See also
17 Notes



Logic[edit]

Barbershop paradox: The supposition that if one of two simultaneous assumptions leads to a contradiction, the other assumption is also disproved leads to paradoxical consequences. Not to be confused with the Barber paradox.
What the Tortoise Said to Achilles: "Whatever Logic is good enough to tell me is worth writing down...", also known as Carroll's paradox, not to be confused with the "Achilles and the tortoise" paradox by Zeno of Elea.
Catch-22: A situation in which someone is in need of something that can only be had by not being in need of it. A soldier who wants to be declared insane in order to avoid combat is deemed not insane for that very reason, and will therefore not be declared insane.
Drinker paradox: In any pub there is a customer of whom it is true to say: if that customer drinks, everybody in the pub drinks.
Paradox of entailment: Inconsistent premises always make an argument valid.
Lottery paradox: If there is one winning ticket in a large lottery, it is reasonable to believe of any particular lottery ticket that it is not the winning ticket, but it is not reasonable to believe that no lottery ticket will win.
Raven paradox: (or Hempel's Ravens): Observing a green apple increases the likelihood of all ravens being black.
Ross' paradox: Disjunction introduction poses a problem for imperative inference by seemingly permitting arbitrary imperatives to be inferred.
Unexpected hanging paradox: The day of the hanging will be a surprise, so it cannot happen at all, so it will be a surprise. The surprise examination and Bottle Imp paradox use similar logic.

Self-reference[edit]
These paradoxes have in common a contradiction arising from either self-reference or circular reference, in which several statements refer to each other in a way that following some of the references leads back to the starting point.

Barber paradox: A barber (who is a man) shaves all and only those men who do not shave themselves. Does he shave himself? (Russell's popularization of his set theoretic paradox.)
Bhartrhari's paradox: The thesis that there are some things which are unnameable conflicts with the notion that something is named by calling it unnameable.
Berry paradox: The phrase "the first number not nameable in under ten words" appears to name it in nine words.
Crocodile dilemma: If a crocodile steals a child and promises its return if the father can correctly guess exactly what the crocodile will do, how should the crocodile respond in the case that the father guesses that the child will not be returned?
Paradox of the Court: A law student agrees to pay his teacher after (and only after) winning his first case. The teacher then sues the student (who has not yet won a case) for payment.
Curry's paradox: "If this sentence is true, then Santa Claus exists."
Epimenides paradox: A Cretan says: "All Cretans are liars". This paradox works in mainly the same way as the Liar paradox.
Grelling–Nelson paradox: Is the word "heterological", meaning "not applicable to itself", a heterological word? (Another close relative of Russell's paradox.)
Kleene–Rosser paradox: By formulating an equivalent to Richard's paradox, untyped lambda calculus is shown to be inconsistent.
Liar paradox: "This sentence is false." This is the canonical self-referential paradox. Also "Is the answer to this question 'no'?", and "I'm lying."

Card paradox: "The next statement is true. The previous statement is false." A variant of the liar paradox that does not use self-reference.
Pinocchio paradox: What would happen if Pinocchio said "My nose will be growing"?[1]
Quine's paradox: "'Yields a falsehood when appended to its own quotation' yields a falsehood when appended to its own quotation." Shows that a sentence can be paradoxical even if it is not self-referring and does not use demonstratives or indexicals.
Yablo's paradox: An ordered infinite sequence of sentences, each of which says that all following sentences are false. While constructed to avoid self-reference, there is no consensus whether it relies on self-reference or not.


Opposite Day: "It is opposite day today." Therefore, it is not opposite day, but if you say it is a normal day it would be considered a normal day.
Petronius' paradox: "Moderation in all things, including moderation" (unsourced quotation sometimes attributed to Petronius).
Richard's paradox: We appear to be able to use simple English to define a decimal expansion in a way that is self-contradictory.
Russell's paradox: Does the set of all those sets that do not contain themselves contain itself?
Socratic paradox: "All I know is that I know nothing."

Vagueness[edit]

Ship of Theseus: It seems like you can replace any component of a ship, and it is still the same ship. So you can replace them all, one at a time, and it is still the same ship. However, you can then take all the original pieces, and assemble them into a ship. That, too, is the same ship you began with.


See also List of Ship of Theseus examples


Sorites paradox (also known as the paradox of the heap): If you remove a single grain of sand from a heap, you still have a heap. Keep removing single grains, and the heap will disappear. Can a single grain of sand make the difference between heap and non-heap?

Mathematics[edit]
See also: Category:Mathematics paradoxes and Paradoxes of set theory

All horses are the same color: A proof by induction that all horses have the same color.
Ant on a rubber rope: An ant crawling on a rubber rope can reach the end even when the rope stretches much faster than the ant can crawl.
Cramer's paradox: The number of points of intersection of two higher-order curves can be greater than the number of arbitrary points needed to define one such curve.
Elevator paradox: Elevators can seem to be mostly going in one direction, as if they were being manufactured in the middle of the building and being disassembled on the roof and basement.
Interesting number paradox: The first number that can be considered "dull" rather than "interesting" becomes interesting because of that fact.
Potato paradox: If you let potatoes consisting of 99% water dry so that they are 98% water, they lose 50% of their weight.
Russell's paradox: Does the set of all those sets that do not contain themselves contain itself?

Statistics[edit]
See also: Category:Statistical paradoxes

Abelson's paradox: Effect size may not be indicative of practical meaning.
Accuracy paradox: Predictive models with a given level of accuracy may have greater predictive power than models with higher accuracy.
Berkson's paradox: A complicating factor arising in statistical tests of proportions.
Freedman's paradox: Describes a problem in model selection where predictor variables with no explanatory power can appear artificially important.
Friendship paradox: For almost everyone, their friends have more friends than they do.
Inspection paradox: Why one will wait longer for a bus than one should.
Lindley's paradox: Tiny errors in the null hypothesis are magnified when large data sets are analyzed, leading to false but highly statistically significant results.
Low birth weight paradox: Low birth weight and mothers who smoke contribute to a higher mortality rate. Babies of smokers have lower average birth weight, but low birth weight babies born to smokers have a lower mortality rate than other low birth weight babies. This is a special case of Simpson's paradox.
Simpson's paradox, or the Yule–Simpson effect: A trend that appears in different groups of data disappears when these groups are combined, and the reverse trend appears for the aggregate data.
Will Rogers phenomenon: The mathematical concept of an average, whether defined as the mean or median, leads to apparently paradoxical results—for example, it is possible that moving an entry from an encyclopedia to a dictionary would increase the average entry length on both books.

Probability[edit]




The Monty Hall problem: which door do you choose?


See also: Category:Probability theory paradoxes

Bertrand's box paradox: A paradox of conditional probability closely related to the Boy or Girl paradox.
Bertrand's paradox: Different common-sense definitions of randomness give quite different results.
Birthday paradox: What is the chance that two people in a room have the same birthday?
Borel's paradox: Conditional probability density functions are not invariant under coordinate transformations.
Boy or Girl paradox: A two-child family has at least one boy. What is the probability that it has a girl?
Dartboard Puzzle: If a dart is guaranteed to hit a dartboard and the probability of hitting a specific point is positive, adding the infinitely many positive chances yields infinity, but the chance of hitting the dartboard is one. If the probability of hitting each point is zero, the probability of hitting anywhere on the dartboard is zero.[2]
False positive paradox: A test that is accurate the vast majority of the time could show you have a disease, but the probability that you actually have it could still be tiny.
Grice's paradox: Shows that the exact meaning of statements involving conditionals and probabilities is more complicated than may be obvious on casual examination.
Monty Hall problem: An unintuitive consequence of conditional probability.
Necktie paradox: A wager between two people seems to favour them both. Very similar in essence to the Two-envelope paradox.
Nontransitive dice: You can have three dice, called A, B, and C, such that A is likely to win in a roll against B, B is likely to win in a roll against C, and C is likely to win in a roll against A.
Proebsting's paradox: The Kelly criterion is an often optimal strategy for maximizing profit in the long run. Proebsting's paradox apparently shows that the Kelly criterion can lead to ruin.
Sleeping Beauty problem: A probability problem that can be correctly answered as one half or one third depending on how the question is approached.
Three cards problem: When pulling a random card, how do you determine the color of the underside?
Three Prisoners problem: A variation of the Monty Hall problem.
Two-envelope paradox: You are given two indistinguishable envelopes, each of which contains a positive sum of money. One envelope contains twice as much as the other. You may pick one envelope and keep whatever amount it contains. You pick one envelope at random but before you open it you are given the chance to take the other envelope instead.

Infinity and infinitesimals[edit]

Burali-Forti paradox: If the ordinal numbers formed a set, it would be an ordinal number that is smaller than itself.
Cantor's paradox: The set of all sets would have its own power set as a subset, therefore its cardinality would be at least as great as that of its power set. But Cantor's theorem proves that power sets are strictly greater than the sets they are constructed from. Consequently, the set of all sets would contain a subset greater than itself.
Galileo's paradox: Though most numbers are not squares, there are no more numbers than squares. (See also Cantor's diagonal argument)
Hilbert's paradox of the Grand Hotel: If a hotel with infinitely many rooms is full, it can still take in more guests.
Russell's paradox: Does the set of all those sets that do not contain themselves contain itself?
Skolem's paradox: Countably infinite models of set theory contain uncountably infinite sets.
Zeno's paradoxes: "You will never reach point B from point A as you must always get half-way there, and half of the half, and half of that half, and so on." (This is also a physical paradox.)
Supertasks may result in paradoxes such as




Benardete's paradox: Apparently, a man can be "forced to stay where he is by the mere unfulfilled intentions of the gods".
Grandi's series: The sum of 1-1+1-1+1-1... can be either one, zero, or one-half.
Ross–Littlewood paradox: After alternately adding and removing balls to a vase infinitely often, how many balls remain?
Thomson's lamp: After flicking a lamp on and off infinitely often, is it on or off?



Geometry and topology[edit]




The Banach–Tarski paradox: A ball can be decomposed and reassembled into two balls the same size as the original.



Banach–Tarski paradox: Cut a ball into a finite number of pieces and re-assemble the pieces to get two balls, each of equal size to the first. The von Neumann paradox is a two-dimensional analogue.

Paradoxical set: A set that can be partitioned into two sets, each of which is equivalent to the original.


Coastline paradox: the perimeter of a landmass is in general ill-defined.
Coin rotation paradox: a coin rotating along the edge of an identical coin will make a full revolution after traversing only half of the stationary coin's circumference.
Gabriel's Horn: or Torricelli's trumpet: A simple object with finite volume but infinite surface area. Also, the Mandelbrot set and various other fractals are covered by a finite area, but have an infinite perimeter (in fact, there are no two distinct points on the boundary of the Mandelbrot set that can be reached from one another by moving a finite distance along that boundary, which also implies that in a sense you go no further if you walk "the wrong way" around the set to reach a nearby point). This can be represented by a Klein bottle.
Hausdorff paradox: There exists a countable subset C of the sphere S such that S\C is equidecomposable with two copies of itself.
Nikodym set: A set contained in and with the same Lebesgue measure as the unit square, yet for every one of its points there is a straight line intersecting the Nikodym set only in that point.
Sphere eversion: A sphere can, topologically, be turned inside out.

Decision theory[edit]

Abilene paradox: People can make decisions based not on what they actually want to do, but on what they think that other people want to do, with the result that everybody decides to do something that nobody really wants to do, but only what they thought that everybody else wanted to do.
Apportionment paradox: Some systems of apportioning representation can have unintuitive results due to rounding

Alabama paradox: Increasing the total number of seats might shrink one block's seats.
New states paradox: Adding a new state or voting block might increase the number of votes of another.
Population paradox: A fast-growing state can lose votes to a slow-growing state.


Arrow's paradox: Given more than two choices, no system can have all the attributes of an ideal voting system at once.
Buridan's ass: How can a rational choice be made between two outcomes of equal value?
Chainstore paradox: Even those who know better play the so-called chain store game in an irrational manner.
Decision-making paradox: Selecting the best decision-making method is a decision problem in itself.
Fenno's paradox: The belief that people generally disapprove of the United States Congress as a whole, but support the Congressman from their own Congressional district.
Fredkin's paradox: The more similar two choices are, the more time a decision-making agent spends on deciding.
Green paradox: Policies intending to reduce future CO2 emissions may lead to increased emissions in the present.
Hedgehog's dilemma: or Lover's paradox Despite goodwill, human intimacy cannot occur without substantial mutual harm.
Inventor's paradox: It is easier to solve a more general problem that covers the specifics of the sought-after solution.
Kavka's toxin puzzle: Can one intend to drink the non-deadly toxin, if the intention is the only thing needed to get the reward?
Morton's fork: Choosing between unpalatable alternatives.
Navigation paradox: Increased navigational precision may result in increased collision risk.
Newcomb's paradox: How do you play a game against an omniscient opponent?
Paradox of tolerance: Should one tolerate intolerance if intolerance would destroy the possibility of tolerance?
Paradox of voting: Also known as the Downs paradox. For a rational, self-interested voter the costs of voting will normally exceed the expected benefits, so why do people keep voting?
Parrondo's paradox: It is possible to play two losing games alternately to eventually win.
Prevention paradox: For one person to benefit, many people have to change their behavior — even though they receive no benefit, or even suffer, from the change.
Prisoner's dilemma: Two people might not cooperate even if it is in both their best interests to do so.
Voting paradox: Also known as Condorcet's paradox and paradox of voting. A group of separately rational individuals may have preferences that are irrational in the aggregate.
Willpower paradox: Those who kept their minds open were more goal-directed and more motivated than those who declared their objective to themselves.

Physics[edit]
For more details on this topic, see Physical paradox.


Play media


A demonstration of the tea leaf paradox



Cool tropics paradox: A contradiction between modelled estimates of tropical temperatures during warm, ice-free periods of the Cretaceous and Eocene, and the lower temperatures that proxies suggest were present.
Irresistible force paradox: What would happen if an unstoppable force hit an immovable object?
Paradox of Place: If everything that exist has a place, that place must have a place, and so on ad infinitum.
Paradox of the grain of millet: When a grain of millet falls it makes no sound, but when a thousand grains fall they do, thus many of nothing become something.
The Moving Rows

Astrophysics[edit]

Algol paradox: In some binaries the partners seem to have different ages, even though they are thought to have formed at the same time.
Faint young Sun paradox: The contradiction between existence of liquid water early in the Earth's history and the expectation that the output of the young Sun would have been insufficient to melt ice on Earth.
GZK paradox: Extreme-energy cosmic rays have been observed that seem to violate the Greisen–Zatsepin–Kuzmin limit, which is a consequence of special relativity.
Paradox of youth: Compared to theory, there is an overabundance of young stars close to the supermassive black hole in the Galactic Center.

Classical mechanics[edit]

Achilles and the tortoise: If the tortoise is ahead of achilles, by the time Achilles reaches the tortoise's current position, the tortoise will have moved a bit further ahead, which goes on indefinitely.
Archer's paradox: An archer must, in order to hit his target, not aim directly at it, but slightly to the side. Not to be confused with the arrow paradox.
Arrow paradox If we divide time into discrete 0-duration slices, no motion is happening in each of them, so taking them all as a whole, motion is impossible.
Hydrostatic paradox: A massive battleship can float in a few litres of water.
Aristotle's wheel paradox: Rolling joined concentric wheels seem to trace the same distance with their circumferences, even though the circumferences are different.
Carroll's paradox: The angular momentum of a stick should be zero, but is not.
D'Alembert's paradox: Flow of an inviscid fluid produces no net force on a solid body.
Knudsen paradox: Based on the Navier–Stokes equations, one would expect the mass flux in a channel to decrease with increasing Knudsen number, but there is a distinct minimum around Knudsen number 0.8.
Denny's paradox: Surface-dwelling arthropods (such as the water strider) should not be able to propel themselves horizontally.
Dichotomy paradox: To reach its target, an airborne arrow must first reach an infinite number of midpoints between its current position and the target.
Elevator paradox: Even though hydrometers are used to measure fluid density, a hydrometer will not indicate changes of fluid density caused by changing atmospheric pressure.
Feynman sprinkler: Which way does a sprinkler rotate when submerged in a tank and made to suck in the surrounding fluid?
Painlevé paradox: Rigid-body dynamics with contact and friction is inconsistent.
Tea leaf paradox: When a cup of tea is stirred, the leaves assemble in the center, even though centrifugal force pushes them outward.
Upstream contamination: When a fluid is poured from a higher container onto a lower one, particles can climb up the falling water.

Cosmology[edit]

Bentley's paradox: In a Newtonian universe, gravitation should pull all matter into a single point.
Boltzmann brain: If the universe we observe resulted from a random thermodynamic fluctuation, it would be vastly more likely to be a simple one than the complex one we observe. The simplest case would be just a brain floating in vacuum, having the thoughts and sensations you have.
Fermi paradox: If there are, as various arguments suggest, many other sentient species in the Universe, then where are they? Shouldn't their presence be obvious?
Heat death paradox: If the universe was infinitely old, it would be in thermodynamical equilibrium, which contradicts what we observe.
Olbers' paradox: Why is the night sky dark if there is an infinity of stars, covering every part of the celestial sphere?

Electromagnetism[edit]

Faraday paradox: An apparent violation of Faraday's law of electromagnetic induction.

Quantum mechanics[edit]

Aharonov–Bohm effect: a charged particle is affected by an electromagnetic field even though it has no local contact with that field
Bell's theorem: Why do measured quantum particles not satisfy mathematical probability theory?
Double-slit experiment: Matter and energy can act as a wave or as a particle depending on the experiment.
Einstein–Podolsky–Rosen paradox: Can far away events influence each other in quantum mechanics?
Extinction paradox: In the small wavelength limit, the total scattering cross section of an impenetrable sphere is twice its geometrical cross-sectional area (which is the value obtained in classical mechanics).[3]
Hardy's paradox: How can we make inferences about past events that we haven't observed while at the same time acknowledge that the act of observing it affects the reality we are inferring to?
Klein paradox: When the potential of a potential barrier becomes similar to the mass of the impinging particle, it becomes transparent.
Mott problem: Spherically symmetric wave functions, when observed, produce linear particle tracks.
Quantum LC circuit paradox: Energies stored on capacitance and inductance are not equal to the ground state energy of the quantum oscillator.[citation needed]
Quantum pseudo-telepathy: Two players who can not communicate accomplish tasks that seemingly require direct contact.
Quantum Zeno effect: (Turing paradox) echoing the Zeno paradox, a quantum particle that is continuously observed cannot change its state
Schrödinger's cat paradox: According to the Copenhagen interpretation of quantum mechanics, a cat could be simultaneously alive and dead, as long as it remains unobserved.
Uncertainty principle: Attempts to determine position must disturb momentum, and vice versa.

Relativity[edit]

Bell's spaceship paradox: concerning relativity.
Black hole information paradox: Black holes violate a commonly assumed tenet of science that information cannot be destroyed.
Ehrenfest paradox: On the kinematics of a rigid rotating disk.
Ladder paradox: A classic relativity problem.
Mocanu's velocity composition paradox: a paradox in special relativity.
Supplee's paradox: the buoyancy of a relativistic object (such as a bullet) appears to change when the reference frame is changed from one in which the bullet is at rest to one in which the fluid is at rest.
Trouton-Noble or Right-angle lever paradox: Does a torque arise in static systems when changing frames?
Twin paradox: The theory of relativity predicts that a person making a round trip will return younger than his or her identical twin who stayed at home.

Thermodynamics[edit]

Gibbs paradox: In an ideal gas, is entropy an extensive variable?
Loschmidt's paradox: Why is there an inevitable increase in entropy when the laws of physics are invariant under time reversal? The time reversal symmetry of physical laws appears to contradict the second law of thermodynamics.
Maxwell's demon: The second law of thermodynamics seems to be violated by a cleverly operated trapdoor.[4]
Mpemba effect: Hot water can, under certain conditions, freeze faster than cold water, even though it must pass the lower temperature on the way to freezing.
Duncan's Paradox: Gas-surface reactions create either steady-state temperature or pressure differentials that can be used in perpetual motion machines.[5][6]


Schmidt's Paradox (In Russian): – the contradiction (discovered in 1917) between the observed vertical turbulent heat flux in the surface layer and the theory of heat conduction in the atmosphere .

Biology[edit]

Antarctic paradox: In some areas of the oceans, phytoplankton concentrations are low despite there apparently being sufficient nutrients.
C-value enigma: Genome size does not correlate with organismal complexity. For example, some unicellular organisms have genomes much larger than that of humans.
Cole's paradox: Even a tiny fecundity advantage of one additional offspring would favor the evolution of semelparity.
Gray's paradox: Despite their relatively small muscle mass, dolphins can swim at high speeds and obtain large accelerations.
Hormesis: Exposure to small doses of toxins can have beneficial effects.
Lek paradox: Persistent female choice for particular male trait values should erode genetic variance in male traits and thereby remove the benefits of choice, yet choice persists.
Lombard's paradox: When rising to stand from a sitting or squatting position, both the hamstrings and quadriceps contract at the same time, despite their being antagonists to each other.
Paradox of enrichment: Increasing the food available to an ecosystem may lead to instability, and even to extinction.
Paradox of the pesticides: Applying pesticide to a pest may increase the pest's abundance.
Paradox of the plankton: Why are there so many different species of phytoplankton, even though competition for the same resources tends to reduce the number of species?
Sherman paradox: An anomalous pattern of inheritance in the fragile X syndrome.
Temporal paradox (paleontology): When did the ancestors of birds live?

Health and nutrition[edit]

French paradox: The observation that the French suffer a relatively low incidence of coronary heart disease, despite having a diet relatively rich in saturated fats, which are assumed to be the leading dietary cause of such disease.
Glucose paradox: The large amount of glycogen in the liver cannot be explained by its small glucose absorption.
Hispanic paradox: The finding that Hispanics in the United States tend to have substantially better health than the average population in spite of what their aggregate socio-economic indicators predict.
Israeli paradox: The observation that Israelis suffer a relatively high incidence of coronary heart disease, despite having a diet very low in saturated fats, which are assumed to be the leading dietary cause of such disease.
Meditation paradox: The amplitude of heart rate oscillations during meditation was significantly greater than in the pre-meditation control state and also in three non-meditation control groups[7]
Mexican paradox: Mexican children tend to have higher birth weights than can be expected from their socio-economic status.
Obesity survival paradox: Although the negative health consequences of obesity in the general population are well supported by the available evidence, health outcomes in certain subgroups seem to be improved at an increased BMI.
Peto's paradox: Humans and other small-to-medium-sized mammals get cancer with high frequency, while larger mammals, like whales, do not. If cancer is essentially a negative outcome lottery at the cell level, and larger organisms have more cells, and thus more potentially cancerous cell divisions, one would expect larger organisms to be more predisposed to cancer.
Pulsus paradoxus: A pulsus paradoxus is an exaggerated decrease in systolic blood pressure during inspiration. It can indicate certain medical conditions in which there is reduced cardiac output, such as cardiac tamponade or constrictive pericarditis. Also known as the Pulse Paradox.[8]
Second wind: The "second wind" is a sudden period of increased wakefulness in individuals deprived of sleep that tends to coincide with the individual's circadian rhythm. Although the individual is more wakeful and aware of their surroundings, they are continuing to accrue sleep debt and thus, are actually exacerbating their sleep deprivation.

Chemistry[edit]

Faraday paradox (electrochemistry): Diluted nitric acid will corrode steel, while concentrated nitric acid will not.
Levinthal paradox: The length of time that it takes for a protein chain to find its folded state is many orders of magnitude shorter than it would be if it freely searched all possible configurations.
SAR paradox: Exceptions to the principle that a small change in a molecule causes a small change in its chemical behaviour are frequently profound.

Time travel[edit]

Bootstrap paradox, (also ontological paradox) Can a time traveler send himself information with no outside source?
Polchinski's paradox: A billiard ball can be thrown into a wormhole in such a way that it would emerge in the past and knock its incoming past self away from the wormhole entrance, creating a variant of the grandfather paradox.
Predestination paradox: A man travels back in time to discover the cause of a famous fire. While in the building where the fire started, he accidentally knocks over a kerosene lantern and causes a fire, the same fire that would inspire him, years later, to travel back in time. The bootstrap paradox is closely tied to this, in which, as a result of time travel, information or objects appear to have no beginning.
Temporal paradox: What happens when a time traveler does things in the past that prevent him from doing them in the first place?




Grandfather paradox: You travel back in time and kill your grandfather before he conceives one of your parents, which precludes your own conception and, therefore, you couldn't go back in time and kill your grandfather.
Hitler's murder paradox: You travel back in time and kill a famous person in history before they become famous; but if the person had never been famous, then he could not have been targeted as a famous person.



Linguistics and artificial intelligence[edit]

Bracketing paradox: Is a "historical linguist" a linguist who is historical, or someone who studies "historical linguistics"?
Code-talker paradox: How can a language both enable communication and block communication?
Moravec's paradox: Logical thought is hard for humans and easy for computers, but picking a screw from a box of screws is an unsolved problem.
Movement paradox: In transformational linguistics, there are pairs of sentences in which the sentence without movement is ungrammatical while the sentence with movement is not.
Sayre's paradox: In automated handwriting recognition, a cursively written word cannot be recognized without being segmented and cannot be segmented without being recognized.

Philosophy[edit]

Paradox of analysis: It seems that no conceptual analysis can meet the requirements both of correctness and of informativeness.
Buridan's bridge: Will Plato throw Socrates into the water or not?
Paradox of fiction: How can people experience strong emotions from purely fictional things?
Fitch's paradox: If all truths are knowable, then all truths must in fact be known.
Paradox of free will: If God knows in advance how we will decide, how can there be free will?
Goodman's paradox: Why can induction be used to confirm that things are "green", but not to confirm that things are "grue"?
Paradox of hedonism: When one pursues happiness itself, one is miserable; but, when one pursues something else, one achieves happiness.
Hutton's Paradox: If asking oneself "Am I dreaming?" in a dream proves that one is, what does it prove in waking life?
Liberal paradox: "Minimal Liberty" is incompatible with Pareto optimality.
Meno's paradox: (Learner's paradox) A man cannot search either for what he knows or for what he does not know.
Mere addition paradox: (Parfit's paradox) Is a large population living a barely tolerable life better than a small, happy population?
Moore's paradox: "It's raining, but I don't believe that it is."
Newcomb's paradox: A paradoxical game between two players, one of whom can predict the actions of the other.
Paradox of nihilism: Several distinct paradoxes share this name.
Omnipotence paradox: Can an omnipotent being create a rock too heavy for itself to lift?
Preface paradox: The author of a book may be justified in believing that all his statements in the book are correct, at the same time believing that at least one of them is incorrect.
Problem of evil: (Epicurean paradox) The existence of evil seems to be incompatible with the existence of an omnipotent, omniscient, and morally perfect God.
Rule-following paradox: Even though rules are intended to determine actions, "no course of action could be determined by a rule, because any course of action can be made out to accord with the rule".
When a white horse is not a horse: White horses are not horses because white and horse refer to different things.
Zeno's paradoxes: "You will never reach point B from point A as you must always get half-way there, and half of the half, and half of that half, and so on ..." (This is also a paradox of the infinite)

Mysticism[edit]

Maya_(illusion): Our illusions are not real, yet it's real that illusion itself exists.


Tzimtzum: In Kabbalah, how to reconcile self-awareness of finite Creation with Infinite Divine source, as an emanated causal chain would seemingly nullify existence. Luria's initial withdrawal of God in Hasidic panentheism involves simultaneous illusionism of Creation (Upper Unity) and self-aware existence (Lower Unity), God encompassing logical opposites.

Economics[edit]
See also: Category:Economics paradoxes
One class of paradoxes in economics are the paradoxes of competition, in which behavior that benefits a lone actor would leave everyone worse off if everyone did the same. These paradoxes are classified into circuit, classical and Marx paradoxes.

Allais paradox: A change in a possible outcome that is shared by different alternatives affects people's choices among those alternatives, in contradiction with expected utility theory.
The Antitrust Paradox:[dubious – discuss]: A book arguing that antitrust enforcement artificially raised prices by protecting inefficient competitors from competition.
Arrow information paradox: To sell information you need to give it away before the sale.
Bertrand paradox: Two players reaching a state of Nash equilibrium both find themselves with no profits gained via exploitation.
Braess' paradox: Adding extra capacity to a network can reduce overall performance.
Deaton paradox: Consumption varies surprisingly smoothly despite sharp variations in income.
Demographic-economic paradox: nations or subpopulations with higher GDP per capita are observed to have fewer children, even though a richer population can support more children.
Downs–Thomson paradox: Increasing road capacity at the expense of investments in public transport can make overall congestion on the road worse.
Easterlin paradox: For countries with income sufficient to meet basic needs, the reported level of happiness does not correlate with national income per person.
Edgeworth paradox: With capacity constraints, there may not be an equilibrium.
Ellsberg paradox: People exhibit ambiguity aversion (as distinct from risk aversion), in contradiction with expected utility theory.
European paradox: The perceived failure of European countries to translate scientific advances into marketable innovations.
Gibson's paradox: Why were interest rates and prices correlated?
Giffen paradox: Increasing the price of bread makes poor people eat more of it.
Grossman-Stiglitz paradox: Inability to recoup cost of obtaining market information implies efficient markets cannot exist.
Icarus paradox: Some businesses bring about their own downfall through their own successes.
Jevons paradox: Increases in efficiency lead to even larger increases in demand.
Leontief paradox: Some countries export labor-intensive commodities and import capital-intensive commodities, in contradiction with the Heckscher–Ohlin theorem.
Lucas paradox: Capital is not flowing from developed countries to developing countries despite the fact that developing countries have lower levels of capital per worker, and therefore higher returns to capital.
Mandeville's paradox: Actions that may be vicious to individuals may benefit society as a whole.
Mayfield's paradox: Keeping everyone out of an information system is impossible, but so is getting everybody in.
Metzler paradox: The imposition of a tariff on imports may reduce the relative internal price of that good.
Paradox of prosperity: Why do generations that significantly improve the economic climate seem to generally rear a successor generation that consumes rather than produces?
Paradox of thrift: If everyone saves more money during times of recession, then aggregate demand will fall and will in turn lower total savings in the population.
Paradox of toil: If everyone tries to work during times of recession, lower wages will reduce prices, leading to more deflationary expectations, leading to further thrift, reducing demand and thereby reducing employment.
Paradox of value, also known as diamond-water paradox: Water is more useful than diamonds, yet is a lot cheaper.
Productivity paradox: (also known as Solow computer paradox): Worker productivity may go down, despite technological improvements.
Scitovsky paradox: Using the Kaldor–Hicks criterion, an allocation A may be more efficient than allocation B, while at the same time B is more efficient than A.
Service recovery paradox: Successfully fixing a problem with a defective product may lead to higher consumer satisfaction than in the case where no problem occurred at all.
St. Petersburg paradox: People will only offer a modest fee for a reward of infinite expected value.
Paradox of Plenty: The Paradox of Plenty (resource curse) refers to the paradox that countries and regions with an abundance of natural resources, specifically point-source non-renewable resources like minerals and fuels, tend to have less economic growth and worse development outcomes than countries with fewer natural resources.
Throw away paradox: A trader can gain by throwing away some of his/her initial endowment.
Tullock paradox: Bribing politicians costs less than one would expect, considering how much profit it can yield.

Perception[edit]
For more details on this topic, see Perceptual paradox.




the vertical–horizontal illusion



Tritone paradox: An auditory illusion in which a sequentially played pair of Shepard tones is heard as ascending by some people and as descending by others.
Blub paradox: Cognitive lock of some experienced programmers that prevents them from properly evaluating the quality of programming languages which they do not know.[9]
Optical illusion: A visual illusion which suggests inconsistency, such as an impossible cube or the vertical-horizontal illusion, where the two lines are exactly the same length but appear to be of different lengths.

Politics[edit]

Stability–instability paradox: When two countries each have nuclear weapons, the probability of a direct war between them greatly decreases, but the probability of minor or indirect conflicts between them increases.
Wollheim's paradox: A person can simultaneously advocate two conflicting policy options, A and B, provided that the person believes that democratic decisions should be followed.

Psychology and sociology[edit]

Gender paradox: Women conform more closely than men to sociolinguistics norms that are overtly prescribed, but conform less than men when they are not.
Ironic process theory: Ironic processing is the psychological process whereby an individual's deliberate attempts to suppress or avoid certain thoughts (thought suppression) renders those thoughts more persistent.
Meat paradox: People care about animals, but embrace diets that involve harming them.
Moral paradox: A situation in which moral imperatives clash without clear resolution.
Outcomes paradox: Schizophrenia patients in developing countries seem to fare better than their Western counterparts.[10]
Region-beta paradox: People can sometimes recover more quickly from more intense emotions or pain than from less distressing experiences.
Self-absorption paradox: The contradictory association whereby higher levels of self-awareness are simultaneously associated with higher levels of psychological distress and with psychological well-being.[11]
Stapp's ironical paradox: "The universal aptitude for ineptitude makes any human accomplishment an incredible miracle."
Status paradox: Several paradoxes involve the concept of medical or social status.
Stockdale paradox: "You must never confuse faith that you will prevail in the end—which you can never afford to lose—with the discipline to confront the most brutal facts of your current reality, whatever they might be."
The Paradox of Anti-Semitism: A book arguing that the lack of external persecutions and antagonisms results in the dissolution of Jewish identity, a theory that resonates in works of Dershowitz and Sartre.

Miscellaneous[edit]

Absence paradox: No one is ever "here".
Bonini's paradox: Models or simulations that explain the workings of complex systems are seemingly impossible to construct. As a model of a complex system becomes more complete, it becomes less understandable, for it to be more understandable it must be less complete and therefore less accurate. When the model becomes accurate, it is just as difficult to understand as the real-world processes it represents.
Buttered cat paradox: Humorous example of a paradox from contradicting proverbs.
Intentionally blank page: Many documents contain pages on which the text "This page is intentionally left blank" is printed, thereby making the page not blank.
Observer's paradox: The outcome of an event or experiment is influenced by the presence of the observer.

See also[edit]


Logic portal



Auto-antonym: A word that is encoded with opposing meanings.
Absurdity
Excusable negligence: If a behavior is excusable, it is not negligence.
Gödel's incompleteness theorems: and Tarski's undefinability theorem
Ignore all rules: To obey this rule, it is necessary to ignore it.
Impossible object: A type of optical illusion.
Invalid proof: An apparently correct mathematical derivation that leads to an obvious contradiction.
Logical fallacy: A misconception resulting from incorrect reasoning in argumentation.
Paradox gun: A gun that has characteristics of both (smoothbore) shotguns and rifles.
Paradoxical laughter: Inappropriate laughter, often recognized as such by the laughing person.
Performative contradiction: Some statements contradict the conditions that allow them to be stated.
Proof that 0.999... equals 1
Puzzle
Self-refuting idea
Theories of humor: Incongruity theory and the Ridiculous.

Notes[edit]


^ Eldridge-Smith, Peter; Eldridge-Smith, Veronique (13 January 2010). "The Pinocchio paradox". Analysis. 70 (2): 212–215. ISSN 1467-8284. doi:10.1093/analys/anp173. Retrieved 23 July 2010. 
As of 2010[update], an image of Pinocchio with a speech bubble "My nose will grow now!" has become a minor Internet phenomenon (Google search, Google image search). It seems likely that this paradox has been independently conceived multiple times.
^ Numberphile (2013-07-15), Infinity Paradoxes - Numberphile, retrieved 2016-05-30 
^ Newton, Roger G. (2002). Scattering Theory of Waves and Particles, second edition. Dover Publications. p. 68. ISBN 0-486-42535-5. 
^ Carnap is quoted as saying in 1977 "... the situation with respect to Maxwell's paradox", in Leff, Harvey S.; Rex, A. F., eds. (2003). Maxwell's Demon 2: Entropy, Classical and Quantum Information, Computing (PDF). Institute of Physics. p. 19. ISBN 0-7503-0759-5. Archived from the original (PDF) on 2005-11-09. Retrieved 15 March 2010. 
On page 36, Leff and Rex also quote Goldstein and Goldstein as saying "Smoluchowski fully resolved the paradox of the demon in 1912" in Goldstein, Martin; Goldstein, Inge F. (1993). The Refrigerator and The Universe. Universities Press (India) Pvt. Ltd. p. 228. ISBN 978-81-7371-085-8. OCLC 477206415. Retrieved 15 March 2010. 
^ T.L. Duncan, Phys. Rev. E 61, 4661 (2000).
^ Sheehan, D.P., D.J. Mallin, J.T. Garamella, and W.F. Sheehan, Found. Phys. 44 235 (2014).
^ Peng, C.-K; Isaac C Henry; Joseph E Mietus; Jeffrey M Hausdorff; Gurucharan Khalsa; Herbert Benson; Ary L Goldberger (May 2004). "Heart rate dynamics during three forms of meditation". International Journal of Cardiology. 95 (1): 19–27. PMID 15159033. doi:10.1016/j.ijcard.2003.02.006. Retrieved 23 May 2012. 
^ Khasnis, A.; Lokhandwala, Y. (Jan–Mar 2002). "Clinical signs in medicine: pulsus paradoxus". Journal of Postgraduate Medicine. Mumbai – 400 012, India: 49. 48 (1): 46–9. ISSN 0022-3859. PMID 12082330. Retrieved 21 March 2010. The "paradox" refers to the fact that heart sounds may be heard over the precordium when the radial pulse is not felt. 
^ Hidders, J. "Expressive Power of Recursion and Aggregates in XQuery" (PDF). Retrieved 23 May 2012. : Chapter 1, Introduction.
^ Developing countries: The outcomes paradox Nature.com
^ Trapnell, P. D., & Campbell, J. D. (1999). "Private self-consciousness and the Five-Factor Model of Personality: Distinguishing rumination from reflection". Journal of Personality and Social Psychology, 76, 284–304.








v
t
e


Logic






Outline
History





Fields



Argumentation theory
Axiology
Critical thinking
Logic in computer science
Mathematical logic
Metalogic
Metamathematics
Non-classical logic
Philosophical logic
Philosophy of logic
Set theory





Foundations



Abduction
Analytic and synthetic propositions
Antinomy
A priori and a posteriori
Deduction
Definition
Description
Induction
Inference
Logical form
Logical consequence
Logical truth
Name
Necessity and sufficiency
Meaning
Paradox
Possible world
Presupposition
Probability
Reason
Reference
Semantics
Statement
Strict implication
Substitution
Syntax
Truth
Validity





Lists




topics



Mathematical logic
Boolean algebra
Set theory





other



Logicians
Rules of inference
Paradoxes
Fallacies
Logic symbols











Portal
Category
WikiProject (talk)
changes












v
t
e


Decision theory paradoxes






Abilene
Apportionment
Arrow's
Buridan's ass
Chainstore
Condorcet's
Decision-making
Downs
Ellsberg
Fenno's
Fredkin's
Green
Hedgehog's
Inventor's
Kavka's toxin puzzle
Morton's fork
Navigation
Newcomb's
Parrondo's
Prevention
Prisoner's dilemma
Tolerance
Willpower









List of paradoxes










v
t
e


Economic paradoxes (list)






Allais
Antitrust
Arrow information
Bertrand
Braess's
Competition
Income and fertility
Downs–Thomson
Easterlin
Edgeworth
Ellsberg
European
Gibson's
Giffen good
Icarus
Jevons
Leontief
Lucas
Mandeville's
Mayfield's
Metzler
Plenty
Productivity
Prosperity
Scitovsky
Service recovery
St. Petersburg
Thrift
Toil
Tullock
Value












v
t
e


Logical paradoxes



Self-reference



Barber
Berry
Bhartrhari's
Court
Crocodile
Curry's
Epimenides
Grelling–Nelson
Kleene–Rosser
Liar

Card
Pinocchio
Quine's
Yablo's


Richard's
Russell's
Socratic








Vagueness



Theseus' ship
Sorites





Other paradoxes



Barbershop
Catch-22
Drinker
Entailment
Lottery
Plato's beard
Raven
Ross'
Unexpected hanging






List of paradoxes










v
t
e


Philosophical paradoxes (list)






Analysis
Buridan's bridge
Dream argument
Epicurean
Fiction
Fitch's knowability
Free will
Goodman's
Hedonism
Liberal
Meno's
Mere addition
Moore's
Newcomb's
Nihilism
Omnipotence
Preface
Rule-following
White horse
Zeno's













 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=List_of_paradoxes&oldid=791566219#Economics"					
Categories: ParadoxesLists related to philosophical problemsHidden categories: Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2010All articles containing potentially dated statementsAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from April 2010All accuracy disputesArticles with disputed statements from February 2014Use dmy dates from October 2010Articles containing video clips 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةবাংলাفارسیFrançaisहिन्दीOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаPortuguêsРусскийSlovenščinaSuomiTürkçeУкраїнськаZazaki 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 21 July 2017, at 02:57.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









List of paradoxes - Wikipedia





















 






List of paradoxes

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Economic paradox)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This is a list of paradoxes, grouped thematically. The grouping is approximate, as paradoxes may fit into more than one category. Because of varying definitions of the term paradox, some of the following are not considered to be paradoxes by everyone. This list collects only scenarios that have been called a paradox by at least one source and have their own article.
Although considered paradoxes, some of these are based on fallacious reasoning, or incomplete/faulty analysis. Informally, the term is often used to describe a counter-intuitive result.



Contents


1 Logic

1.1 Self-reference
1.2 Vagueness


2 Mathematics

2.1 Statistics
2.2 Probability
2.3 Infinity and infinitesimals
2.4 Geometry and topology


3 Decision theory
4 Physics

4.1 Astrophysics
4.2 Classical mechanics
4.3 Cosmology
4.4 Electromagnetism
4.5 Quantum mechanics
4.6 Relativity
4.7 Thermodynamics


5 Biology

5.1 Health and nutrition


6 Chemistry
7 Time travel
8 Linguistics and artificial intelligence
9 Philosophy
10 Mysticism
11 Economics
12 Perception
13 Politics
14 Psychology and sociology
15 Miscellaneous
16 See also
17 Notes



Logic[edit]

Barbershop paradox: The supposition that if one of two simultaneous assumptions leads to a contradiction, the other assumption is also disproved leads to paradoxical consequences. Not to be confused with the Barber paradox.
What the Tortoise Said to Achilles: "Whatever Logic is good enough to tell me is worth writing down...", also known as Carroll's paradox, not to be confused with the "Achilles and the tortoise" paradox by Zeno of Elea.
Catch-22: A situation in which someone is in need of something that can only be had by not being in need of it. A soldier who wants to be declared insane in order to avoid combat is deemed not insane for that very reason, and will therefore not be declared insane.
Drinker paradox: In any pub there is a customer of whom it is true to say: if that customer drinks, everybody in the pub drinks.
Paradox of entailment: Inconsistent premises always make an argument valid.
Lottery paradox: If there is one winning ticket in a large lottery, it is reasonable to believe of any particular lottery ticket that it is not the winning ticket, but it is not reasonable to believe that no lottery ticket will win.
Raven paradox: (or Hempel's Ravens): Observing a green apple increases the likelihood of all ravens being black.
Ross' paradox: Disjunction introduction poses a problem for imperative inference by seemingly permitting arbitrary imperatives to be inferred.
Unexpected hanging paradox: The day of the hanging will be a surprise, so it cannot happen at all, so it will be a surprise. The surprise examination and Bottle Imp paradox use similar logic.

Self-reference[edit]
These paradoxes have in common a contradiction arising from either self-reference or circular reference, in which several statements refer to each other in a way that following some of the references leads back to the starting point.

Barber paradox: A barber (who is a man) shaves all and only those men who do not shave themselves. Does he shave himself? (Russell's popularization of his set theoretic paradox.)
Bhartrhari's paradox: The thesis that there are some things which are unnameable conflicts with the notion that something is named by calling it unnameable.
Berry paradox: The phrase "the first number not nameable in under ten words" appears to name it in nine words.
Crocodile dilemma: If a crocodile steals a child and promises its return if the father can correctly guess exactly what the crocodile will do, how should the crocodile respond in the case that the father guesses that the child will not be returned?
Paradox of the Court: A law student agrees to pay his teacher after (and only after) winning his first case. The teacher then sues the student (who has not yet won a case) for payment.
Curry's paradox: "If this sentence is true, then Santa Claus exists."
Epimenides paradox: A Cretan says: "All Cretans are liars". This paradox works in mainly the same way as the Liar paradox.
Grelling–Nelson paradox: Is the word "heterological", meaning "not applicable to itself", a heterological word? (Another close relative of Russell's paradox.)
Kleene–Rosser paradox: By formulating an equivalent to Richard's paradox, untyped lambda calculus is shown to be inconsistent.
Liar paradox: "This sentence is false." This is the canonical self-referential paradox. Also "Is the answer to this question 'no'?", and "I'm lying."

Card paradox: "The next statement is true. The previous statement is false." A variant of the liar paradox that does not use self-reference.
Pinocchio paradox: What would happen if Pinocchio said "My nose will be growing"?[1]
Quine's paradox: "'Yields a falsehood when appended to its own quotation' yields a falsehood when appended to its own quotation." Shows that a sentence can be paradoxical even if it is not self-referring and does not use demonstratives or indexicals.
Yablo's paradox: An ordered infinite sequence of sentences, each of which says that all following sentences are false. While constructed to avoid self-reference, there is no consensus whether it relies on self-reference or not.


Opposite Day: "It is opposite day today." Therefore, it is not opposite day, but if you say it is a normal day it would be considered a normal day.
Petronius' paradox: "Moderation in all things, including moderation" (unsourced quotation sometimes attributed to Petronius).
Richard's paradox: We appear to be able to use simple English to define a decimal expansion in a way that is self-contradictory.
Russell's paradox: Does the set of all those sets that do not contain themselves contain itself?
Socratic paradox: "All I know is that I know nothing."

Vagueness[edit]

Ship of Theseus: It seems like you can replace any component of a ship, and it is still the same ship. So you can replace them all, one at a time, and it is still the same ship. However, you can then take all the original pieces, and assemble them into a ship. That, too, is the same ship you began with.


See also List of Ship of Theseus examples


Sorites paradox (also known as the paradox of the heap): If you remove a single grain of sand from a heap, you still have a heap. Keep removing single grains, and the heap will disappear. Can a single grain of sand make the difference between heap and non-heap?

Mathematics[edit]
See also: Category:Mathematics paradoxes and Paradoxes of set theory

All horses are the same color: A proof by induction that all horses have the same color.
Ant on a rubber rope: An ant crawling on a rubber rope can reach the end even when the rope stretches much faster than the ant can crawl.
Cramer's paradox: The number of points of intersection of two higher-order curves can be greater than the number of arbitrary points needed to define one such curve.
Elevator paradox: Elevators can seem to be mostly going in one direction, as if they were being manufactured in the middle of the building and being disassembled on the roof and basement.
Interesting number paradox: The first number that can be considered "dull" rather than "interesting" becomes interesting because of that fact.
Potato paradox: If you let potatoes consisting of 99% water dry so that they are 98% water, they lose 50% of their weight.
Russell's paradox: Does the set of all those sets that do not contain themselves contain itself?

Statistics[edit]
See also: Category:Statistical paradoxes

Abelson's paradox: Effect size may not be indicative of practical meaning.
Accuracy paradox: Predictive models with a given level of accuracy may have greater predictive power than models with higher accuracy.
Berkson's paradox: A complicating factor arising in statistical tests of proportions.
Freedman's paradox: Describes a problem in model selection where predictor variables with no explanatory power can appear artificially important.
Friendship paradox: For almost everyone, their friends have more friends than they do.
Inspection paradox: Why one will wait longer for a bus than one should.
Lindley's paradox: Tiny errors in the null hypothesis are magnified when large data sets are analyzed, leading to false but highly statistically significant results.
Low birth weight paradox: Low birth weight and mothers who smoke contribute to a higher mortality rate. Babies of smokers have lower average birth weight, but low birth weight babies born to smokers have a lower mortality rate than other low birth weight babies. This is a special case of Simpson's paradox.
Simpson's paradox, or the Yule–Simpson effect: A trend that appears in different groups of data disappears when these groups are combined, and the reverse trend appears for the aggregate data.
Will Rogers phenomenon: The mathematical concept of an average, whether defined as the mean or median, leads to apparently paradoxical results—for example, it is possible that moving an entry from an encyclopedia to a dictionary would increase the average entry length on both books.

Probability[edit]




The Monty Hall problem: which door do you choose?


See also: Category:Probability theory paradoxes

Bertrand's box paradox: A paradox of conditional probability closely related to the Boy or Girl paradox.
Bertrand's paradox: Different common-sense definitions of randomness give quite different results.
Birthday paradox: What is the chance that two people in a room have the same birthday?
Borel's paradox: Conditional probability density functions are not invariant under coordinate transformations.
Boy or Girl paradox: A two-child family has at least one boy. What is the probability that it has a girl?
Dartboard Puzzle: If a dart is guaranteed to hit a dartboard and the probability of hitting a specific point is positive, adding the infinitely many positive chances yields infinity, but the chance of hitting the dartboard is one. If the probability of hitting each point is zero, the probability of hitting anywhere on the dartboard is zero.[2]
False positive paradox: A test that is accurate the vast majority of the time could show you have a disease, but the probability that you actually have it could still be tiny.
Grice's paradox: Shows that the exact meaning of statements involving conditionals and probabilities is more complicated than may be obvious on casual examination.
Monty Hall problem: An unintuitive consequence of conditional probability.
Necktie paradox: A wager between two people seems to favour them both. Very similar in essence to the Two-envelope paradox.
Nontransitive dice: You can have three dice, called A, B, and C, such that A is likely to win in a roll against B, B is likely to win in a roll against C, and C is likely to win in a roll against A.
Proebsting's paradox: The Kelly criterion is an often optimal strategy for maximizing profit in the long run. Proebsting's paradox apparently shows that the Kelly criterion can lead to ruin.
Sleeping Beauty problem: A probability problem that can be correctly answered as one half or one third depending on how the question is approached.
Three cards problem: When pulling a random card, how do you determine the color of the underside?
Three Prisoners problem: A variation of the Monty Hall problem.
Two-envelope paradox: You are given two indistinguishable envelopes, each of which contains a positive sum of money. One envelope contains twice as much as the other. You may pick one envelope and keep whatever amount it contains. You pick one envelope at random but before you open it you are given the chance to take the other envelope instead.

Infinity and infinitesimals[edit]

Burali-Forti paradox: If the ordinal numbers formed a set, it would be an ordinal number that is smaller than itself.
Cantor's paradox: The set of all sets would have its own power set as a subset, therefore its cardinality would be at least as great as that of its power set. But Cantor's theorem proves that power sets are strictly greater than the sets they are constructed from. Consequently, the set of all sets would contain a subset greater than itself.
Galileo's paradox: Though most numbers are not squares, there are no more numbers than squares. (See also Cantor's diagonal argument)
Hilbert's paradox of the Grand Hotel: If a hotel with infinitely many rooms is full, it can still take in more guests.
Russell's paradox: Does the set of all those sets that do not contain themselves contain itself?
Skolem's paradox: Countably infinite models of set theory contain uncountably infinite sets.
Zeno's paradoxes: "You will never reach point B from point A as you must always get half-way there, and half of the half, and half of that half, and so on." (This is also a physical paradox.)
Supertasks may result in paradoxes such as




Benardete's paradox: Apparently, a man can be "forced to stay where he is by the mere unfulfilled intentions of the gods".
Grandi's series: The sum of 1-1+1-1+1-1... can be either one, zero, or one-half.
Ross–Littlewood paradox: After alternately adding and removing balls to a vase infinitely often, how many balls remain?
Thomson's lamp: After flicking a lamp on and off infinitely often, is it on or off?



Geometry and topology[edit]




The Banach–Tarski paradox: A ball can be decomposed and reassembled into two balls the same size as the original.



Banach–Tarski paradox: Cut a ball into a finite number of pieces and re-assemble the pieces to get two balls, each of equal size to the first. The von Neumann paradox is a two-dimensional analogue.

Paradoxical set: A set that can be partitioned into two sets, each of which is equivalent to the original.


Coastline paradox: the perimeter of a landmass is in general ill-defined.
Coin rotation paradox: a coin rotating along the edge of an identical coin will make a full revolution after traversing only half of the stationary coin's circumference.
Gabriel's Horn: or Torricelli's trumpet: A simple object with finite volume but infinite surface area. Also, the Mandelbrot set and various other fractals are covered by a finite area, but have an infinite perimeter (in fact, there are no two distinct points on the boundary of the Mandelbrot set that can be reached from one another by moving a finite distance along that boundary, which also implies that in a sense you go no further if you walk "the wrong way" around the set to reach a nearby point). This can be represented by a Klein bottle.
Hausdorff paradox: There exists a countable subset C of the sphere S such that S\C is equidecomposable with two copies of itself.
Nikodym set: A set contained in and with the same Lebesgue measure as the unit square, yet for every one of its points there is a straight line intersecting the Nikodym set only in that point.
Sphere eversion: A sphere can, topologically, be turned inside out.

Decision theory[edit]

Abilene paradox: People can make decisions based not on what they actually want to do, but on what they think that other people want to do, with the result that everybody decides to do something that nobody really wants to do, but only what they thought that everybody else wanted to do.
Apportionment paradox: Some systems of apportioning representation can have unintuitive results due to rounding

Alabama paradox: Increasing the total number of seats might shrink one block's seats.
New states paradox: Adding a new state or voting block might increase the number of votes of another.
Population paradox: A fast-growing state can lose votes to a slow-growing state.


Arrow's paradox: Given more than two choices, no system can have all the attributes of an ideal voting system at once.
Buridan's ass: How can a rational choice be made between two outcomes of equal value?
Chainstore paradox: Even those who know better play the so-called chain store game in an irrational manner.
Decision-making paradox: Selecting the best decision-making method is a decision problem in itself.
Fenno's paradox: The belief that people generally disapprove of the United States Congress as a whole, but support the Congressman from their own Congressional district.
Fredkin's paradox: The more similar two choices are, the more time a decision-making agent spends on deciding.
Green paradox: Policies intending to reduce future CO2 emissions may lead to increased emissions in the present.
Hedgehog's dilemma: or Lover's paradox Despite goodwill, human intimacy cannot occur without substantial mutual harm.
Inventor's paradox: It is easier to solve a more general problem that covers the specifics of the sought-after solution.
Kavka's toxin puzzle: Can one intend to drink the non-deadly toxin, if the intention is the only thing needed to get the reward?
Morton's fork: Choosing between unpalatable alternatives.
Navigation paradox: Increased navigational precision may result in increased collision risk.
Newcomb's paradox: How do you play a game against an omniscient opponent?
Paradox of tolerance: Should one tolerate intolerance if intolerance would destroy the possibility of tolerance?
Paradox of voting: Also known as the Downs paradox. For a rational, self-interested voter the costs of voting will normally exceed the expected benefits, so why do people keep voting?
Parrondo's paradox: It is possible to play two losing games alternately to eventually win.
Prevention paradox: For one person to benefit, many people have to change their behavior — even though they receive no benefit, or even suffer, from the change.
Prisoner's dilemma: Two people might not cooperate even if it is in both their best interests to do so.
Voting paradox: Also known as Condorcet's paradox and paradox of voting. A group of separately rational individuals may have preferences that are irrational in the aggregate.
Willpower paradox: Those who kept their minds open were more goal-directed and more motivated than those who declared their objective to themselves.

Physics[edit]
For more details on this topic, see Physical paradox.


Play media


A demonstration of the tea leaf paradox



Cool tropics paradox: A contradiction between modelled estimates of tropical temperatures during warm, ice-free periods of the Cretaceous and Eocene, and the lower temperatures that proxies suggest were present.
Irresistible force paradox: What would happen if an unstoppable force hit an immovable object?
Paradox of Place: If everything that exist has a place, that place must have a place, and so on ad infinitum.
Paradox of the grain of millet: When a grain of millet falls it makes no sound, but when a thousand grains fall they do, thus many of nothing become something.
The Moving Rows

Astrophysics[edit]

Algol paradox: In some binaries the partners seem to have different ages, even though they are thought to have formed at the same time.
Faint young Sun paradox: The contradiction between existence of liquid water early in the Earth's history and the expectation that the output of the young Sun would have been insufficient to melt ice on Earth.
GZK paradox: Extreme-energy cosmic rays have been observed that seem to violate the Greisen–Zatsepin–Kuzmin limit, which is a consequence of special relativity.
Paradox of youth: Compared to theory, there is an overabundance of young stars close to the supermassive black hole in the Galactic Center.

Classical mechanics[edit]

Achilles and the tortoise: If the tortoise is ahead of achilles, by the time Achilles reaches the tortoise's current position, the tortoise will have moved a bit further ahead, which goes on indefinitely.
Archer's paradox: An archer must, in order to hit his target, not aim directly at it, but slightly to the side. Not to be confused with the arrow paradox.
Arrow paradox If we divide time into discrete 0-duration slices, no motion is happening in each of them, so taking them all as a whole, motion is impossible.
Hydrostatic paradox: A massive battleship can float in a few litres of water.
Aristotle's wheel paradox: Rolling joined concentric wheels seem to trace the same distance with their circumferences, even though the circumferences are different.
Carroll's paradox: The angular momentum of a stick should be zero, but is not.
D'Alembert's paradox: Flow of an inviscid fluid produces no net force on a solid body.
Knudsen paradox: Based on the Navier–Stokes equations, one would expect the mass flux in a channel to decrease with increasing Knudsen number, but there is a distinct minimum around Knudsen number 0.8.
Denny's paradox: Surface-dwelling arthropods (such as the water strider) should not be able to propel themselves horizontally.
Dichotomy paradox: To reach its target, an airborne arrow must first reach an infinite number of midpoints between its current position and the target.
Elevator paradox: Even though hydrometers are used to measure fluid density, a hydrometer will not indicate changes of fluid density caused by changing atmospheric pressure.
Feynman sprinkler: Which way does a sprinkler rotate when submerged in a tank and made to suck in the surrounding fluid?
Painlevé paradox: Rigid-body dynamics with contact and friction is inconsistent.
Tea leaf paradox: When a cup of tea is stirred, the leaves assemble in the center, even though centrifugal force pushes them outward.
Upstream contamination: When a fluid is poured from a higher container onto a lower one, particles can climb up the falling water.

Cosmology[edit]

Bentley's paradox: In a Newtonian universe, gravitation should pull all matter into a single point.
Boltzmann brain: If the universe we observe resulted from a random thermodynamic fluctuation, it would be vastly more likely to be a simple one than the complex one we observe. The simplest case would be just a brain floating in vacuum, having the thoughts and sensations you have.
Fermi paradox: If there are, as various arguments suggest, many other sentient species in the Universe, then where are they? Shouldn't their presence be obvious?
Heat death paradox: If the universe was infinitely old, it would be in thermodynamical equilibrium, which contradicts what we observe.
Olbers' paradox: Why is the night sky dark if there is an infinity of stars, covering every part of the celestial sphere?

Electromagnetism[edit]

Faraday paradox: An apparent violation of Faraday's law of electromagnetic induction.

Quantum mechanics[edit]

Aharonov–Bohm effect: a charged particle is affected by an electromagnetic field even though it has no local contact with that field
Bell's theorem: Why do measured quantum particles not satisfy mathematical probability theory?
Double-slit experiment: Matter and energy can act as a wave or as a particle depending on the experiment.
Einstein–Podolsky–Rosen paradox: Can far away events influence each other in quantum mechanics?
Extinction paradox: In the small wavelength limit, the total scattering cross section of an impenetrable sphere is twice its geometrical cross-sectional area (which is the value obtained in classical mechanics).[3]
Hardy's paradox: How can we make inferences about past events that we haven't observed while at the same time acknowledge that the act of observing it affects the reality we are inferring to?
Klein paradox: When the potential of a potential barrier becomes similar to the mass of the impinging particle, it becomes transparent.
Mott problem: Spherically symmetric wave functions, when observed, produce linear particle tracks.
Quantum LC circuit paradox: Energies stored on capacitance and inductance are not equal to the ground state energy of the quantum oscillator.[citation needed]
Quantum pseudo-telepathy: Two players who can not communicate accomplish tasks that seemingly require direct contact.
Quantum Zeno effect: (Turing paradox) echoing the Zeno paradox, a quantum particle that is continuously observed cannot change its state
Schrödinger's cat paradox: According to the Copenhagen interpretation of quantum mechanics, a cat could be simultaneously alive and dead, as long as it remains unobserved.
Uncertainty principle: Attempts to determine position must disturb momentum, and vice versa.

Relativity[edit]

Bell's spaceship paradox: concerning relativity.
Black hole information paradox: Black holes violate a commonly assumed tenet of science that information cannot be destroyed.
Ehrenfest paradox: On the kinematics of a rigid rotating disk.
Ladder paradox: A classic relativity problem.
Mocanu's velocity composition paradox: a paradox in special relativity.
Supplee's paradox: the buoyancy of a relativistic object (such as a bullet) appears to change when the reference frame is changed from one in which the bullet is at rest to one in which the fluid is at rest.
Trouton-Noble or Right-angle lever paradox: Does a torque arise in static systems when changing frames?
Twin paradox: The theory of relativity predicts that a person making a round trip will return younger than his or her identical twin who stayed at home.

Thermodynamics[edit]

Gibbs paradox: In an ideal gas, is entropy an extensive variable?
Loschmidt's paradox: Why is there an inevitable increase in entropy when the laws of physics are invariant under time reversal? The time reversal symmetry of physical laws appears to contradict the second law of thermodynamics.
Maxwell's demon: The second law of thermodynamics seems to be violated by a cleverly operated trapdoor.[4]
Mpemba effect: Hot water can, under certain conditions, freeze faster than cold water, even though it must pass the lower temperature on the way to freezing.
Duncan's Paradox: Gas-surface reactions create either steady-state temperature or pressure differentials that can be used in perpetual motion machines.[5][6]


Schmidt's Paradox (In Russian): – the contradiction (discovered in 1917) between the observed vertical turbulent heat flux in the surface layer and the theory of heat conduction in the atmosphere .

Biology[edit]

Antarctic paradox: In some areas of the oceans, phytoplankton concentrations are low despite there apparently being sufficient nutrients.
C-value enigma: Genome size does not correlate with organismal complexity. For example, some unicellular organisms have genomes much larger than that of humans.
Cole's paradox: Even a tiny fecundity advantage of one additional offspring would favor the evolution of semelparity.
Gray's paradox: Despite their relatively small muscle mass, dolphins can swim at high speeds and obtain large accelerations.
Hormesis: Exposure to small doses of toxins can have beneficial effects.
Lek paradox: Persistent female choice for particular male trait values should erode genetic variance in male traits and thereby remove the benefits of choice, yet choice persists.
Lombard's paradox: When rising to stand from a sitting or squatting position, both the hamstrings and quadriceps contract at the same time, despite their being antagonists to each other.
Paradox of enrichment: Increasing the food available to an ecosystem may lead to instability, and even to extinction.
Paradox of the pesticides: Applying pesticide to a pest may increase the pest's abundance.
Paradox of the plankton: Why are there so many different species of phytoplankton, even though competition for the same resources tends to reduce the number of species?
Sherman paradox: An anomalous pattern of inheritance in the fragile X syndrome.
Temporal paradox (paleontology): When did the ancestors of birds live?

Health and nutrition[edit]

French paradox: The observation that the French suffer a relatively low incidence of coronary heart disease, despite having a diet relatively rich in saturated fats, which are assumed to be the leading dietary cause of such disease.
Glucose paradox: The large amount of glycogen in the liver cannot be explained by its small glucose absorption.
Hispanic paradox: The finding that Hispanics in the United States tend to have substantially better health than the average population in spite of what their aggregate socio-economic indicators predict.
Israeli paradox: The observation that Israelis suffer a relatively high incidence of coronary heart disease, despite having a diet very low in saturated fats, which are assumed to be the leading dietary cause of such disease.
Meditation paradox: The amplitude of heart rate oscillations during meditation was significantly greater than in the pre-meditation control state and also in three non-meditation control groups[7]
Mexican paradox: Mexican children tend to have higher birth weights than can be expected from their socio-economic status.
Obesity survival paradox: Although the negative health consequences of obesity in the general population are well supported by the available evidence, health outcomes in certain subgroups seem to be improved at an increased BMI.
Peto's paradox: Humans and other small-to-medium-sized mammals get cancer with high frequency, while larger mammals, like whales, do not. If cancer is essentially a negative outcome lottery at the cell level, and larger organisms have more cells, and thus more potentially cancerous cell divisions, one would expect larger organisms to be more predisposed to cancer.
Pulsus paradoxus: A pulsus paradoxus is an exaggerated decrease in systolic blood pressure during inspiration. It can indicate certain medical conditions in which there is reduced cardiac output, such as cardiac tamponade or constrictive pericarditis. Also known as the Pulse Paradox.[8]
Second wind: The "second wind" is a sudden period of increased wakefulness in individuals deprived of sleep that tends to coincide with the individual's circadian rhythm. Although the individual is more wakeful and aware of their surroundings, they are continuing to accrue sleep debt and thus, are actually exacerbating their sleep deprivation.

Chemistry[edit]

Faraday paradox (electrochemistry): Diluted nitric acid will corrode steel, while concentrated nitric acid will not.
Levinthal paradox: The length of time that it takes for a protein chain to find its folded state is many orders of magnitude shorter than it would be if it freely searched all possible configurations.
SAR paradox: Exceptions to the principle that a small change in a molecule causes a small change in its chemical behaviour are frequently profound.

Time travel[edit]

Bootstrap paradox, (also ontological paradox) Can a time traveler send himself information with no outside source?
Polchinski's paradox: A billiard ball can be thrown into a wormhole in such a way that it would emerge in the past and knock its incoming past self away from the wormhole entrance, creating a variant of the grandfather paradox.
Predestination paradox: A man travels back in time to discover the cause of a famous fire. While in the building where the fire started, he accidentally knocks over a kerosene lantern and causes a fire, the same fire that would inspire him, years later, to travel back in time. The bootstrap paradox is closely tied to this, in which, as a result of time travel, information or objects appear to have no beginning.
Temporal paradox: What happens when a time traveler does things in the past that prevent him from doing them in the first place?




Grandfather paradox: You travel back in time and kill your grandfather before he conceives one of your parents, which precludes your own conception and, therefore, you couldn't go back in time and kill your grandfather.
Hitler's murder paradox: You travel back in time and kill a famous person in history before they become famous; but if the person had never been famous, then he could not have been targeted as a famous person.



Linguistics and artificial intelligence[edit]

Bracketing paradox: Is a "historical linguist" a linguist who is historical, or someone who studies "historical linguistics"?
Code-talker paradox: How can a language both enable communication and block communication?
Moravec's paradox: Logical thought is hard for humans and easy for computers, but picking a screw from a box of screws is an unsolved problem.
Movement paradox: In transformational linguistics, there are pairs of sentences in which the sentence without movement is ungrammatical while the sentence with movement is not.
Sayre's paradox: In automated handwriting recognition, a cursively written word cannot be recognized without being segmented and cannot be segmented without being recognized.

Philosophy[edit]

Paradox of analysis: It seems that no conceptual analysis can meet the requirements both of correctness and of informativeness.
Buridan's bridge: Will Plato throw Socrates into the water or not?
Paradox of fiction: How can people experience strong emotions from purely fictional things?
Fitch's paradox: If all truths are knowable, then all truths must in fact be known.
Paradox of free will: If God knows in advance how we will decide, how can there be free will?
Goodman's paradox: Why can induction be used to confirm that things are "green", but not to confirm that things are "grue"?
Paradox of hedonism: When one pursues happiness itself, one is miserable; but, when one pursues something else, one achieves happiness.
Hutton's Paradox: If asking oneself "Am I dreaming?" in a dream proves that one is, what does it prove in waking life?
Liberal paradox: "Minimal Liberty" is incompatible with Pareto optimality.
Meno's paradox: (Learner's paradox) A man cannot search either for what he knows or for what he does not know.
Mere addition paradox: (Parfit's paradox) Is a large population living a barely tolerable life better than a small, happy population?
Moore's paradox: "It's raining, but I don't believe that it is."
Newcomb's paradox: A paradoxical game between two players, one of whom can predict the actions of the other.
Paradox of nihilism: Several distinct paradoxes share this name.
Omnipotence paradox: Can an omnipotent being create a rock too heavy for itself to lift?
Preface paradox: The author of a book may be justified in believing that all his statements in the book are correct, at the same time believing that at least one of them is incorrect.
Problem of evil: (Epicurean paradox) The existence of evil seems to be incompatible with the existence of an omnipotent, omniscient, and morally perfect God.
Rule-following paradox: Even though rules are intended to determine actions, "no course of action could be determined by a rule, because any course of action can be made out to accord with the rule".
When a white horse is not a horse: White horses are not horses because white and horse refer to different things.
Zeno's paradoxes: "You will never reach point B from point A as you must always get half-way there, and half of the half, and half of that half, and so on ..." (This is also a paradox of the infinite)

Mysticism[edit]

Maya_(illusion): Our illusions are not real, yet it's real that illusion itself exists.


Tzimtzum: In Kabbalah, how to reconcile self-awareness of finite Creation with Infinite Divine source, as an emanated causal chain would seemingly nullify existence. Luria's initial withdrawal of God in Hasidic panentheism involves simultaneous illusionism of Creation (Upper Unity) and self-aware existence (Lower Unity), God encompassing logical opposites.

Economics[edit]
See also: Category:Economics paradoxes
One class of paradoxes in economics are the paradoxes of competition, in which behavior that benefits a lone actor would leave everyone worse off if everyone did the same. These paradoxes are classified into circuit, classical and Marx paradoxes.

Allais paradox: A change in a possible outcome that is shared by different alternatives affects people's choices among those alternatives, in contradiction with expected utility theory.
The Antitrust Paradox:[dubious – discuss]: A book arguing that antitrust enforcement artificially raised prices by protecting inefficient competitors from competition.
Arrow information paradox: To sell information you need to give it away before the sale.
Bertrand paradox: Two players reaching a state of Nash equilibrium both find themselves with no profits gained via exploitation.
Braess' paradox: Adding extra capacity to a network can reduce overall performance.
Deaton paradox: Consumption varies surprisingly smoothly despite sharp variations in income.
Demographic-economic paradox: nations or subpopulations with higher GDP per capita are observed to have fewer children, even though a richer population can support more children.
Downs–Thomson paradox: Increasing road capacity at the expense of investments in public transport can make overall congestion on the road worse.
Easterlin paradox: For countries with income sufficient to meet basic needs, the reported level of happiness does not correlate with national income per person.
Edgeworth paradox: With capacity constraints, there may not be an equilibrium.
Ellsberg paradox: People exhibit ambiguity aversion (as distinct from risk aversion), in contradiction with expected utility theory.
European paradox: The perceived failure of European countries to translate scientific advances into marketable innovations.
Gibson's paradox: Why were interest rates and prices correlated?
Giffen paradox: Increasing the price of bread makes poor people eat more of it.
Grossman-Stiglitz paradox: Inability to recoup cost of obtaining market information implies efficient markets cannot exist.
Icarus paradox: Some businesses bring about their own downfall through their own successes.
Jevons paradox: Increases in efficiency lead to even larger increases in demand.
Leontief paradox: Some countries export labor-intensive commodities and import capital-intensive commodities, in contradiction with the Heckscher–Ohlin theorem.
Lucas paradox: Capital is not flowing from developed countries to developing countries despite the fact that developing countries have lower levels of capital per worker, and therefore higher returns to capital.
Mandeville's paradox: Actions that may be vicious to individuals may benefit society as a whole.
Mayfield's paradox: Keeping everyone out of an information system is impossible, but so is getting everybody in.
Metzler paradox: The imposition of a tariff on imports may reduce the relative internal price of that good.
Paradox of prosperity: Why do generations that significantly improve the economic climate seem to generally rear a successor generation that consumes rather than produces?
Paradox of thrift: If everyone saves more money during times of recession, then aggregate demand will fall and will in turn lower total savings in the population.
Paradox of toil: If everyone tries to work during times of recession, lower wages will reduce prices, leading to more deflationary expectations, leading to further thrift, reducing demand and thereby reducing employment.
Paradox of value, also known as diamond-water paradox: Water is more useful than diamonds, yet is a lot cheaper.
Productivity paradox: (also known as Solow computer paradox): Worker productivity may go down, despite technological improvements.
Scitovsky paradox: Using the Kaldor–Hicks criterion, an allocation A may be more efficient than allocation B, while at the same time B is more efficient than A.
Service recovery paradox: Successfully fixing a problem with a defective product may lead to higher consumer satisfaction than in the case where no problem occurred at all.
St. Petersburg paradox: People will only offer a modest fee for a reward of infinite expected value.
Paradox of Plenty: The Paradox of Plenty (resource curse) refers to the paradox that countries and regions with an abundance of natural resources, specifically point-source non-renewable resources like minerals and fuels, tend to have less economic growth and worse development outcomes than countries with fewer natural resources.
Throw away paradox: A trader can gain by throwing away some of his/her initial endowment.
Tullock paradox: Bribing politicians costs less than one would expect, considering how much profit it can yield.

Perception[edit]
For more details on this topic, see Perceptual paradox.




the vertical–horizontal illusion



Tritone paradox: An auditory illusion in which a sequentially played pair of Shepard tones is heard as ascending by some people and as descending by others.
Blub paradox: Cognitive lock of some experienced programmers that prevents them from properly evaluating the quality of programming languages which they do not know.[9]
Optical illusion: A visual illusion which suggests inconsistency, such as an impossible cube or the vertical-horizontal illusion, where the two lines are exactly the same length but appear to be of different lengths.

Politics[edit]

Stability–instability paradox: When two countries each have nuclear weapons, the probability of a direct war between them greatly decreases, but the probability of minor or indirect conflicts between them increases.
Wollheim's paradox: A person can simultaneously advocate two conflicting policy options, A and B, provided that the person believes that democratic decisions should be followed.

Psychology and sociology[edit]

Gender paradox: Women conform more closely than men to sociolinguistics norms that are overtly prescribed, but conform less than men when they are not.
Ironic process theory: Ironic processing is the psychological process whereby an individual's deliberate attempts to suppress or avoid certain thoughts (thought suppression) renders those thoughts more persistent.
Meat paradox: People care about animals, but embrace diets that involve harming them.
Moral paradox: A situation in which moral imperatives clash without clear resolution.
Outcomes paradox: Schizophrenia patients in developing countries seem to fare better than their Western counterparts.[10]
Region-beta paradox: People can sometimes recover more quickly from more intense emotions or pain than from less distressing experiences.
Self-absorption paradox: The contradictory association whereby higher levels of self-awareness are simultaneously associated with higher levels of psychological distress and with psychological well-being.[11]
Stapp's ironical paradox: "The universal aptitude for ineptitude makes any human accomplishment an incredible miracle."
Status paradox: Several paradoxes involve the concept of medical or social status.
Stockdale paradox: "You must never confuse faith that you will prevail in the end—which you can never afford to lose—with the discipline to confront the most brutal facts of your current reality, whatever they might be."
The Paradox of Anti-Semitism: A book arguing that the lack of external persecutions and antagonisms results in the dissolution of Jewish identity, a theory that resonates in works of Dershowitz and Sartre.

Miscellaneous[edit]

Absence paradox: No one is ever "here".
Bonini's paradox: Models or simulations that explain the workings of complex systems are seemingly impossible to construct. As a model of a complex system becomes more complete, it becomes less understandable, for it to be more understandable it must be less complete and therefore less accurate. When the model becomes accurate, it is just as difficult to understand as the real-world processes it represents.
Buttered cat paradox: Humorous example of a paradox from contradicting proverbs.
Intentionally blank page: Many documents contain pages on which the text "This page is intentionally left blank" is printed, thereby making the page not blank.
Observer's paradox: The outcome of an event or experiment is influenced by the presence of the observer.

See also[edit]


Logic portal



Auto-antonym: A word that is encoded with opposing meanings.
Absurdity
Excusable negligence: If a behavior is excusable, it is not negligence.
Gödel's incompleteness theorems: and Tarski's undefinability theorem
Ignore all rules: To obey this rule, it is necessary to ignore it.
Impossible object: A type of optical illusion.
Invalid proof: An apparently correct mathematical derivation that leads to an obvious contradiction.
Logical fallacy: A misconception resulting from incorrect reasoning in argumentation.
Paradox gun: A gun that has characteristics of both (smoothbore) shotguns and rifles.
Paradoxical laughter: Inappropriate laughter, often recognized as such by the laughing person.
Performative contradiction: Some statements contradict the conditions that allow them to be stated.
Proof that 0.999... equals 1
Puzzle
Self-refuting idea
Theories of humor: Incongruity theory and the Ridiculous.

Notes[edit]


^ Eldridge-Smith, Peter; Eldridge-Smith, Veronique (13 January 2010). "The Pinocchio paradox". Analysis. 70 (2): 212–215. ISSN 1467-8284. doi:10.1093/analys/anp173. Retrieved 23 July 2010. 
As of 2010[update], an image of Pinocchio with a speech bubble "My nose will grow now!" has become a minor Internet phenomenon (Google search, Google image search). It seems likely that this paradox has been independently conceived multiple times.
^ Numberphile (2013-07-15), Infinity Paradoxes - Numberphile, retrieved 2016-05-30 
^ Newton, Roger G. (2002). Scattering Theory of Waves and Particles, second edition. Dover Publications. p. 68. ISBN 0-486-42535-5. 
^ Carnap is quoted as saying in 1977 "... the situation with respect to Maxwell's paradox", in Leff, Harvey S.; Rex, A. F., eds. (2003). Maxwell's Demon 2: Entropy, Classical and Quantum Information, Computing (PDF). Institute of Physics. p. 19. ISBN 0-7503-0759-5. Archived from the original (PDF) on 2005-11-09. Retrieved 15 March 2010. 
On page 36, Leff and Rex also quote Goldstein and Goldstein as saying "Smoluchowski fully resolved the paradox of the demon in 1912" in Goldstein, Martin; Goldstein, Inge F. (1993). The Refrigerator and The Universe. Universities Press (India) Pvt. Ltd. p. 228. ISBN 978-81-7371-085-8. OCLC 477206415. Retrieved 15 March 2010. 
^ T.L. Duncan, Phys. Rev. E 61, 4661 (2000).
^ Sheehan, D.P., D.J. Mallin, J.T. Garamella, and W.F. Sheehan, Found. Phys. 44 235 (2014).
^ Peng, C.-K; Isaac C Henry; Joseph E Mietus; Jeffrey M Hausdorff; Gurucharan Khalsa; Herbert Benson; Ary L Goldberger (May 2004). "Heart rate dynamics during three forms of meditation". International Journal of Cardiology. 95 (1): 19–27. PMID 15159033. doi:10.1016/j.ijcard.2003.02.006. Retrieved 23 May 2012. 
^ Khasnis, A.; Lokhandwala, Y. (Jan–Mar 2002). "Clinical signs in medicine: pulsus paradoxus". Journal of Postgraduate Medicine. Mumbai – 400 012, India: 49. 48 (1): 46–9. ISSN 0022-3859. PMID 12082330. Retrieved 21 March 2010. The "paradox" refers to the fact that heart sounds may be heard over the precordium when the radial pulse is not felt. 
^ Hidders, J. "Expressive Power of Recursion and Aggregates in XQuery" (PDF). Retrieved 23 May 2012. : Chapter 1, Introduction.
^ Developing countries: The outcomes paradox Nature.com
^ Trapnell, P. D., & Campbell, J. D. (1999). "Private self-consciousness and the Five-Factor Model of Personality: Distinguishing rumination from reflection". Journal of Personality and Social Psychology, 76, 284–304.








v
t
e


Logic






Outline
History





Fields



Argumentation theory
Axiology
Critical thinking
Logic in computer science
Mathematical logic
Metalogic
Metamathematics
Non-classical logic
Philosophical logic
Philosophy of logic
Set theory





Foundations



Abduction
Analytic and synthetic propositions
Antinomy
A priori and a posteriori
Deduction
Definition
Description
Induction
Inference
Logical form
Logical consequence
Logical truth
Name
Necessity and sufficiency
Meaning
Paradox
Possible world
Presupposition
Probability
Reason
Reference
Semantics
Statement
Strict implication
Substitution
Syntax
Truth
Validity





Lists




topics



Mathematical logic
Boolean algebra
Set theory





other



Logicians
Rules of inference
Paradoxes
Fallacies
Logic symbols











Portal
Category
WikiProject (talk)
changes












v
t
e


Decision theory paradoxes






Abilene
Apportionment
Arrow's
Buridan's ass
Chainstore
Condorcet's
Decision-making
Downs
Ellsberg
Fenno's
Fredkin's
Green
Hedgehog's
Inventor's
Kavka's toxin puzzle
Morton's fork
Navigation
Newcomb's
Parrondo's
Prevention
Prisoner's dilemma
Tolerance
Willpower









List of paradoxes










v
t
e


Economic paradoxes (list)






Allais
Antitrust
Arrow information
Bertrand
Braess's
Competition
Income and fertility
Downs–Thomson
Easterlin
Edgeworth
Ellsberg
European
Gibson's
Giffen good
Icarus
Jevons
Leontief
Lucas
Mandeville's
Mayfield's
Metzler
Plenty
Productivity
Prosperity
Scitovsky
Service recovery
St. Petersburg
Thrift
Toil
Tullock
Value












v
t
e


Logical paradoxes



Self-reference



Barber
Berry
Bhartrhari's
Court
Crocodile
Curry's
Epimenides
Grelling–Nelson
Kleene–Rosser
Liar

Card
Pinocchio
Quine's
Yablo's


Richard's
Russell's
Socratic








Vagueness



Theseus' ship
Sorites





Other paradoxes



Barbershop
Catch-22
Drinker
Entailment
Lottery
Plato's beard
Raven
Ross'
Unexpected hanging






List of paradoxes










v
t
e


Philosophical paradoxes (list)






Analysis
Buridan's bridge
Dream argument
Epicurean
Fiction
Fitch's knowability
Free will
Goodman's
Hedonism
Liberal
Meno's
Mere addition
Moore's
Newcomb's
Nihilism
Omnipotence
Preface
Rule-following
White horse
Zeno's













 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=List_of_paradoxes&oldid=791566219#Economics"					
Categories: ParadoxesLists related to philosophical problemsHidden categories: Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2010All articles containing potentially dated statementsAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from April 2010All accuracy disputesArticles with disputed statements from February 2014Use dmy dates from October 2010Articles containing video clips 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةবাংলাفارسیFrançaisहिन्दीOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаPortuguêsРусскийSlovenščinaSuomiTürkçeУкраїнськаZazaki 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 21 July 2017, at 02:57.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









List of paradoxes - Wikipedia





















 






List of paradoxes

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Economic paradox)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This is a list of paradoxes, grouped thematically. The grouping is approximate, as paradoxes may fit into more than one category. Because of varying definitions of the term paradox, some of the following are not considered to be paradoxes by everyone. This list collects only scenarios that have been called a paradox by at least one source and have their own article.
Although considered paradoxes, some of these are based on fallacious reasoning, or incomplete/faulty analysis. Informally, the term is often used to describe a counter-intuitive result.



Contents


1 Logic

1.1 Self-reference
1.2 Vagueness


2 Mathematics

2.1 Statistics
2.2 Probability
2.3 Infinity and infinitesimals
2.4 Geometry and topology


3 Decision theory
4 Physics

4.1 Astrophysics
4.2 Classical mechanics
4.3 Cosmology
4.4 Electromagnetism
4.5 Quantum mechanics
4.6 Relativity
4.7 Thermodynamics


5 Biology

5.1 Health and nutrition


6 Chemistry
7 Time travel
8 Linguistics and artificial intelligence
9 Philosophy
10 Mysticism
11 Economics
12 Perception
13 Politics
14 Psychology and sociology
15 Miscellaneous
16 See also
17 Notes



Logic[edit]

Barbershop paradox: The supposition that if one of two simultaneous assumptions leads to a contradiction, the other assumption is also disproved leads to paradoxical consequences. Not to be confused with the Barber paradox.
What the Tortoise Said to Achilles: "Whatever Logic is good enough to tell me is worth writing down...", also known as Carroll's paradox, not to be confused with the "Achilles and the tortoise" paradox by Zeno of Elea.
Catch-22: A situation in which someone is in need of something that can only be had by not being in need of it. A soldier who wants to be declared insane in order to avoid combat is deemed not insane for that very reason, and will therefore not be declared insane.
Drinker paradox: In any pub there is a customer of whom it is true to say: if that customer drinks, everybody in the pub drinks.
Paradox of entailment: Inconsistent premises always make an argument valid.
Lottery paradox: If there is one winning ticket in a large lottery, it is reasonable to believe of any particular lottery ticket that it is not the winning ticket, but it is not reasonable to believe that no lottery ticket will win.
Raven paradox: (or Hempel's Ravens): Observing a green apple increases the likelihood of all ravens being black.
Ross' paradox: Disjunction introduction poses a problem for imperative inference by seemingly permitting arbitrary imperatives to be inferred.
Unexpected hanging paradox: The day of the hanging will be a surprise, so it cannot happen at all, so it will be a surprise. The surprise examination and Bottle Imp paradox use similar logic.

Self-reference[edit]
These paradoxes have in common a contradiction arising from either self-reference or circular reference, in which several statements refer to each other in a way that following some of the references leads back to the starting point.

Barber paradox: A barber (who is a man) shaves all and only those men who do not shave themselves. Does he shave himself? (Russell's popularization of his set theoretic paradox.)
Bhartrhari's paradox: The thesis that there are some things which are unnameable conflicts with the notion that something is named by calling it unnameable.
Berry paradox: The phrase "the first number not nameable in under ten words" appears to name it in nine words.
Crocodile dilemma: If a crocodile steals a child and promises its return if the father can correctly guess exactly what the crocodile will do, how should the crocodile respond in the case that the father guesses that the child will not be returned?
Paradox of the Court: A law student agrees to pay his teacher after (and only after) winning his first case. The teacher then sues the student (who has not yet won a case) for payment.
Curry's paradox: "If this sentence is true, then Santa Claus exists."
Epimenides paradox: A Cretan says: "All Cretans are liars". This paradox works in mainly the same way as the Liar paradox.
Grelling–Nelson paradox: Is the word "heterological", meaning "not applicable to itself", a heterological word? (Another close relative of Russell's paradox.)
Kleene–Rosser paradox: By formulating an equivalent to Richard's paradox, untyped lambda calculus is shown to be inconsistent.
Liar paradox: "This sentence is false." This is the canonical self-referential paradox. Also "Is the answer to this question 'no'?", and "I'm lying."

Card paradox: "The next statement is true. The previous statement is false." A variant of the liar paradox that does not use self-reference.
Pinocchio paradox: What would happen if Pinocchio said "My nose will be growing"?[1]
Quine's paradox: "'Yields a falsehood when appended to its own quotation' yields a falsehood when appended to its own quotation." Shows that a sentence can be paradoxical even if it is not self-referring and does not use demonstratives or indexicals.
Yablo's paradox: An ordered infinite sequence of sentences, each of which says that all following sentences are false. While constructed to avoid self-reference, there is no consensus whether it relies on self-reference or not.


Opposite Day: "It is opposite day today." Therefore, it is not opposite day, but if you say it is a normal day it would be considered a normal day.
Petronius' paradox: "Moderation in all things, including moderation" (unsourced quotation sometimes attributed to Petronius).
Richard's paradox: We appear to be able to use simple English to define a decimal expansion in a way that is self-contradictory.
Russell's paradox: Does the set of all those sets that do not contain themselves contain itself?
Socratic paradox: "All I know is that I know nothing."

Vagueness[edit]

Ship of Theseus: It seems like you can replace any component of a ship, and it is still the same ship. So you can replace them all, one at a time, and it is still the same ship. However, you can then take all the original pieces, and assemble them into a ship. That, too, is the same ship you began with.


See also List of Ship of Theseus examples


Sorites paradox (also known as the paradox of the heap): If you remove a single grain of sand from a heap, you still have a heap. Keep removing single grains, and the heap will disappear. Can a single grain of sand make the difference between heap and non-heap?

Mathematics[edit]
See also: Category:Mathematics paradoxes and Paradoxes of set theory

All horses are the same color: A proof by induction that all horses have the same color.
Ant on a rubber rope: An ant crawling on a rubber rope can reach the end even when the rope stretches much faster than the ant can crawl.
Cramer's paradox: The number of points of intersection of two higher-order curves can be greater than the number of arbitrary points needed to define one such curve.
Elevator paradox: Elevators can seem to be mostly going in one direction, as if they were being manufactured in the middle of the building and being disassembled on the roof and basement.
Interesting number paradox: The first number that can be considered "dull" rather than "interesting" becomes interesting because of that fact.
Potato paradox: If you let potatoes consisting of 99% water dry so that they are 98% water, they lose 50% of their weight.
Russell's paradox: Does the set of all those sets that do not contain themselves contain itself?

Statistics[edit]
See also: Category:Statistical paradoxes

Abelson's paradox: Effect size may not be indicative of practical meaning.
Accuracy paradox: Predictive models with a given level of accuracy may have greater predictive power than models with higher accuracy.
Berkson's paradox: A complicating factor arising in statistical tests of proportions.
Freedman's paradox: Describes a problem in model selection where predictor variables with no explanatory power can appear artificially important.
Friendship paradox: For almost everyone, their friends have more friends than they do.
Inspection paradox: Why one will wait longer for a bus than one should.
Lindley's paradox: Tiny errors in the null hypothesis are magnified when large data sets are analyzed, leading to false but highly statistically significant results.
Low birth weight paradox: Low birth weight and mothers who smoke contribute to a higher mortality rate. Babies of smokers have lower average birth weight, but low birth weight babies born to smokers have a lower mortality rate than other low birth weight babies. This is a special case of Simpson's paradox.
Simpson's paradox, or the Yule–Simpson effect: A trend that appears in different groups of data disappears when these groups are combined, and the reverse trend appears for the aggregate data.
Will Rogers phenomenon: The mathematical concept of an average, whether defined as the mean or median, leads to apparently paradoxical results—for example, it is possible that moving an entry from an encyclopedia to a dictionary would increase the average entry length on both books.

Probability[edit]




The Monty Hall problem: which door do you choose?


See also: Category:Probability theory paradoxes

Bertrand's box paradox: A paradox of conditional probability closely related to the Boy or Girl paradox.
Bertrand's paradox: Different common-sense definitions of randomness give quite different results.
Birthday paradox: What is the chance that two people in a room have the same birthday?
Borel's paradox: Conditional probability density functions are not invariant under coordinate transformations.
Boy or Girl paradox: A two-child family has at least one boy. What is the probability that it has a girl?
Dartboard Puzzle: If a dart is guaranteed to hit a dartboard and the probability of hitting a specific point is positive, adding the infinitely many positive chances yields infinity, but the chance of hitting the dartboard is one. If the probability of hitting each point is zero, the probability of hitting anywhere on the dartboard is zero.[2]
False positive paradox: A test that is accurate the vast majority of the time could show you have a disease, but the probability that you actually have it could still be tiny.
Grice's paradox: Shows that the exact meaning of statements involving conditionals and probabilities is more complicated than may be obvious on casual examination.
Monty Hall problem: An unintuitive consequence of conditional probability.
Necktie paradox: A wager between two people seems to favour them both. Very similar in essence to the Two-envelope paradox.
Nontransitive dice: You can have three dice, called A, B, and C, such that A is likely to win in a roll against B, B is likely to win in a roll against C, and C is likely to win in a roll against A.
Proebsting's paradox: The Kelly criterion is an often optimal strategy for maximizing profit in the long run. Proebsting's paradox apparently shows that the Kelly criterion can lead to ruin.
Sleeping Beauty problem: A probability problem that can be correctly answered as one half or one third depending on how the question is approached.
Three cards problem: When pulling a random card, how do you determine the color of the underside?
Three Prisoners problem: A variation of the Monty Hall problem.
Two-envelope paradox: You are given two indistinguishable envelopes, each of which contains a positive sum of money. One envelope contains twice as much as the other. You may pick one envelope and keep whatever amount it contains. You pick one envelope at random but before you open it you are given the chance to take the other envelope instead.

Infinity and infinitesimals[edit]

Burali-Forti paradox: If the ordinal numbers formed a set, it would be an ordinal number that is smaller than itself.
Cantor's paradox: The set of all sets would have its own power set as a subset, therefore its cardinality would be at least as great as that of its power set. But Cantor's theorem proves that power sets are strictly greater than the sets they are constructed from. Consequently, the set of all sets would contain a subset greater than itself.
Galileo's paradox: Though most numbers are not squares, there are no more numbers than squares. (See also Cantor's diagonal argument)
Hilbert's paradox of the Grand Hotel: If a hotel with infinitely many rooms is full, it can still take in more guests.
Russell's paradox: Does the set of all those sets that do not contain themselves contain itself?
Skolem's paradox: Countably infinite models of set theory contain uncountably infinite sets.
Zeno's paradoxes: "You will never reach point B from point A as you must always get half-way there, and half of the half, and half of that half, and so on." (This is also a physical paradox.)
Supertasks may result in paradoxes such as




Benardete's paradox: Apparently, a man can be "forced to stay where he is by the mere unfulfilled intentions of the gods".
Grandi's series: The sum of 1-1+1-1+1-1... can be either one, zero, or one-half.
Ross–Littlewood paradox: After alternately adding and removing balls to a vase infinitely often, how many balls remain?
Thomson's lamp: After flicking a lamp on and off infinitely often, is it on or off?



Geometry and topology[edit]




The Banach–Tarski paradox: A ball can be decomposed and reassembled into two balls the same size as the original.



Banach–Tarski paradox: Cut a ball into a finite number of pieces and re-assemble the pieces to get two balls, each of equal size to the first. The von Neumann paradox is a two-dimensional analogue.

Paradoxical set: A set that can be partitioned into two sets, each of which is equivalent to the original.


Coastline paradox: the perimeter of a landmass is in general ill-defined.
Coin rotation paradox: a coin rotating along the edge of an identical coin will make a full revolution after traversing only half of the stationary coin's circumference.
Gabriel's Horn: or Torricelli's trumpet: A simple object with finite volume but infinite surface area. Also, the Mandelbrot set and various other fractals are covered by a finite area, but have an infinite perimeter (in fact, there are no two distinct points on the boundary of the Mandelbrot set that can be reached from one another by moving a finite distance along that boundary, which also implies that in a sense you go no further if you walk "the wrong way" around the set to reach a nearby point). This can be represented by a Klein bottle.
Hausdorff paradox: There exists a countable subset C of the sphere S such that S\C is equidecomposable with two copies of itself.
Nikodym set: A set contained in and with the same Lebesgue measure as the unit square, yet for every one of its points there is a straight line intersecting the Nikodym set only in that point.
Sphere eversion: A sphere can, topologically, be turned inside out.

Decision theory[edit]

Abilene paradox: People can make decisions based not on what they actually want to do, but on what they think that other people want to do, with the result that everybody decides to do something that nobody really wants to do, but only what they thought that everybody else wanted to do.
Apportionment paradox: Some systems of apportioning representation can have unintuitive results due to rounding

Alabama paradox: Increasing the total number of seats might shrink one block's seats.
New states paradox: Adding a new state or voting block might increase the number of votes of another.
Population paradox: A fast-growing state can lose votes to a slow-growing state.


Arrow's paradox: Given more than two choices, no system can have all the attributes of an ideal voting system at once.
Buridan's ass: How can a rational choice be made between two outcomes of equal value?
Chainstore paradox: Even those who know better play the so-called chain store game in an irrational manner.
Decision-making paradox: Selecting the best decision-making method is a decision problem in itself.
Fenno's paradox: The belief that people generally disapprove of the United States Congress as a whole, but support the Congressman from their own Congressional district.
Fredkin's paradox: The more similar two choices are, the more time a decision-making agent spends on deciding.
Green paradox: Policies intending to reduce future CO2 emissions may lead to increased emissions in the present.
Hedgehog's dilemma: or Lover's paradox Despite goodwill, human intimacy cannot occur without substantial mutual harm.
Inventor's paradox: It is easier to solve a more general problem that covers the specifics of the sought-after solution.
Kavka's toxin puzzle: Can one intend to drink the non-deadly toxin, if the intention is the only thing needed to get the reward?
Morton's fork: Choosing between unpalatable alternatives.
Navigation paradox: Increased navigational precision may result in increased collision risk.
Newcomb's paradox: How do you play a game against an omniscient opponent?
Paradox of tolerance: Should one tolerate intolerance if intolerance would destroy the possibility of tolerance?
Paradox of voting: Also known as the Downs paradox. For a rational, self-interested voter the costs of voting will normally exceed the expected benefits, so why do people keep voting?
Parrondo's paradox: It is possible to play two losing games alternately to eventually win.
Prevention paradox: For one person to benefit, many people have to change their behavior — even though they receive no benefit, or even suffer, from the change.
Prisoner's dilemma: Two people might not cooperate even if it is in both their best interests to do so.
Voting paradox: Also known as Condorcet's paradox and paradox of voting. A group of separately rational individuals may have preferences that are irrational in the aggregate.
Willpower paradox: Those who kept their minds open were more goal-directed and more motivated than those who declared their objective to themselves.

Physics[edit]
For more details on this topic, see Physical paradox.


Play media


A demonstration of the tea leaf paradox



Cool tropics paradox: A contradiction between modelled estimates of tropical temperatures during warm, ice-free periods of the Cretaceous and Eocene, and the lower temperatures that proxies suggest were present.
Irresistible force paradox: What would happen if an unstoppable force hit an immovable object?
Paradox of Place: If everything that exist has a place, that place must have a place, and so on ad infinitum.
Paradox of the grain of millet: When a grain of millet falls it makes no sound, but when a thousand grains fall they do, thus many of nothing become something.
The Moving Rows

Astrophysics[edit]

Algol paradox: In some binaries the partners seem to have different ages, even though they are thought to have formed at the same time.
Faint young Sun paradox: The contradiction between existence of liquid water early in the Earth's history and the expectation that the output of the young Sun would have been insufficient to melt ice on Earth.
GZK paradox: Extreme-energy cosmic rays have been observed that seem to violate the Greisen–Zatsepin–Kuzmin limit, which is a consequence of special relativity.
Paradox of youth: Compared to theory, there is an overabundance of young stars close to the supermassive black hole in the Galactic Center.

Classical mechanics[edit]

Achilles and the tortoise: If the tortoise is ahead of achilles, by the time Achilles reaches the tortoise's current position, the tortoise will have moved a bit further ahead, which goes on indefinitely.
Archer's paradox: An archer must, in order to hit his target, not aim directly at it, but slightly to the side. Not to be confused with the arrow paradox.
Arrow paradox If we divide time into discrete 0-duration slices, no motion is happening in each of them, so taking them all as a whole, motion is impossible.
Hydrostatic paradox: A massive battleship can float in a few litres of water.
Aristotle's wheel paradox: Rolling joined concentric wheels seem to trace the same distance with their circumferences, even though the circumferences are different.
Carroll's paradox: The angular momentum of a stick should be zero, but is not.
D'Alembert's paradox: Flow of an inviscid fluid produces no net force on a solid body.
Knudsen paradox: Based on the Navier–Stokes equations, one would expect the mass flux in a channel to decrease with increasing Knudsen number, but there is a distinct minimum around Knudsen number 0.8.
Denny's paradox: Surface-dwelling arthropods (such as the water strider) should not be able to propel themselves horizontally.
Dichotomy paradox: To reach its target, an airborne arrow must first reach an infinite number of midpoints between its current position and the target.
Elevator paradox: Even though hydrometers are used to measure fluid density, a hydrometer will not indicate changes of fluid density caused by changing atmospheric pressure.
Feynman sprinkler: Which way does a sprinkler rotate when submerged in a tank and made to suck in the surrounding fluid?
Painlevé paradox: Rigid-body dynamics with contact and friction is inconsistent.
Tea leaf paradox: When a cup of tea is stirred, the leaves assemble in the center, even though centrifugal force pushes them outward.
Upstream contamination: When a fluid is poured from a higher container onto a lower one, particles can climb up the falling water.

Cosmology[edit]

Bentley's paradox: In a Newtonian universe, gravitation should pull all matter into a single point.
Boltzmann brain: If the universe we observe resulted from a random thermodynamic fluctuation, it would be vastly more likely to be a simple one than the complex one we observe. The simplest case would be just a brain floating in vacuum, having the thoughts and sensations you have.
Fermi paradox: If there are, as various arguments suggest, many other sentient species in the Universe, then where are they? Shouldn't their presence be obvious?
Heat death paradox: If the universe was infinitely old, it would be in thermodynamical equilibrium, which contradicts what we observe.
Olbers' paradox: Why is the night sky dark if there is an infinity of stars, covering every part of the celestial sphere?

Electromagnetism[edit]

Faraday paradox: An apparent violation of Faraday's law of electromagnetic induction.

Quantum mechanics[edit]

Aharonov–Bohm effect: a charged particle is affected by an electromagnetic field even though it has no local contact with that field
Bell's theorem: Why do measured quantum particles not satisfy mathematical probability theory?
Double-slit experiment: Matter and energy can act as a wave or as a particle depending on the experiment.
Einstein–Podolsky–Rosen paradox: Can far away events influence each other in quantum mechanics?
Extinction paradox: In the small wavelength limit, the total scattering cross section of an impenetrable sphere is twice its geometrical cross-sectional area (which is the value obtained in classical mechanics).[3]
Hardy's paradox: How can we make inferences about past events that we haven't observed while at the same time acknowledge that the act of observing it affects the reality we are inferring to?
Klein paradox: When the potential of a potential barrier becomes similar to the mass of the impinging particle, it becomes transparent.
Mott problem: Spherically symmetric wave functions, when observed, produce linear particle tracks.
Quantum LC circuit paradox: Energies stored on capacitance and inductance are not equal to the ground state energy of the quantum oscillator.[citation needed]
Quantum pseudo-telepathy: Two players who can not communicate accomplish tasks that seemingly require direct contact.
Quantum Zeno effect: (Turing paradox) echoing the Zeno paradox, a quantum particle that is continuously observed cannot change its state
Schrödinger's cat paradox: According to the Copenhagen interpretation of quantum mechanics, a cat could be simultaneously alive and dead, as long as it remains unobserved.
Uncertainty principle: Attempts to determine position must disturb momentum, and vice versa.

Relativity[edit]

Bell's spaceship paradox: concerning relativity.
Black hole information paradox: Black holes violate a commonly assumed tenet of science that information cannot be destroyed.
Ehrenfest paradox: On the kinematics of a rigid rotating disk.
Ladder paradox: A classic relativity problem.
Mocanu's velocity composition paradox: a paradox in special relativity.
Supplee's paradox: the buoyancy of a relativistic object (such as a bullet) appears to change when the reference frame is changed from one in which the bullet is at rest to one in which the fluid is at rest.
Trouton-Noble or Right-angle lever paradox: Does a torque arise in static systems when changing frames?
Twin paradox: The theory of relativity predicts that a person making a round trip will return younger than his or her identical twin who stayed at home.

Thermodynamics[edit]

Gibbs paradox: In an ideal gas, is entropy an extensive variable?
Loschmidt's paradox: Why is there an inevitable increase in entropy when the laws of physics are invariant under time reversal? The time reversal symmetry of physical laws appears to contradict the second law of thermodynamics.
Maxwell's demon: The second law of thermodynamics seems to be violated by a cleverly operated trapdoor.[4]
Mpemba effect: Hot water can, under certain conditions, freeze faster than cold water, even though it must pass the lower temperature on the way to freezing.
Duncan's Paradox: Gas-surface reactions create either steady-state temperature or pressure differentials that can be used in perpetual motion machines.[5][6]


Schmidt's Paradox (In Russian): – the contradiction (discovered in 1917) between the observed vertical turbulent heat flux in the surface layer and the theory of heat conduction in the atmosphere .

Biology[edit]

Antarctic paradox: In some areas of the oceans, phytoplankton concentrations are low despite there apparently being sufficient nutrients.
C-value enigma: Genome size does not correlate with organismal complexity. For example, some unicellular organisms have genomes much larger than that of humans.
Cole's paradox: Even a tiny fecundity advantage of one additional offspring would favor the evolution of semelparity.
Gray's paradox: Despite their relatively small muscle mass, dolphins can swim at high speeds and obtain large accelerations.
Hormesis: Exposure to small doses of toxins can have beneficial effects.
Lek paradox: Persistent female choice for particular male trait values should erode genetic variance in male traits and thereby remove the benefits of choice, yet choice persists.
Lombard's paradox: When rising to stand from a sitting or squatting position, both the hamstrings and quadriceps contract at the same time, despite their being antagonists to each other.
Paradox of enrichment: Increasing the food available to an ecosystem may lead to instability, and even to extinction.
Paradox of the pesticides: Applying pesticide to a pest may increase the pest's abundance.
Paradox of the plankton: Why are there so many different species of phytoplankton, even though competition for the same resources tends to reduce the number of species?
Sherman paradox: An anomalous pattern of inheritance in the fragile X syndrome.
Temporal paradox (paleontology): When did the ancestors of birds live?

Health and nutrition[edit]

French paradox: The observation that the French suffer a relatively low incidence of coronary heart disease, despite having a diet relatively rich in saturated fats, which are assumed to be the leading dietary cause of such disease.
Glucose paradox: The large amount of glycogen in the liver cannot be explained by its small glucose absorption.
Hispanic paradox: The finding that Hispanics in the United States tend to have substantially better health than the average population in spite of what their aggregate socio-economic indicators predict.
Israeli paradox: The observation that Israelis suffer a relatively high incidence of coronary heart disease, despite having a diet very low in saturated fats, which are assumed to be the leading dietary cause of such disease.
Meditation paradox: The amplitude of heart rate oscillations during meditation was significantly greater than in the pre-meditation control state and also in three non-meditation control groups[7]
Mexican paradox: Mexican children tend to have higher birth weights than can be expected from their socio-economic status.
Obesity survival paradox: Although the negative health consequences of obesity in the general population are well supported by the available evidence, health outcomes in certain subgroups seem to be improved at an increased BMI.
Peto's paradox: Humans and other small-to-medium-sized mammals get cancer with high frequency, while larger mammals, like whales, do not. If cancer is essentially a negative outcome lottery at the cell level, and larger organisms have more cells, and thus more potentially cancerous cell divisions, one would expect larger organisms to be more predisposed to cancer.
Pulsus paradoxus: A pulsus paradoxus is an exaggerated decrease in systolic blood pressure during inspiration. It can indicate certain medical conditions in which there is reduced cardiac output, such as cardiac tamponade or constrictive pericarditis. Also known as the Pulse Paradox.[8]
Second wind: The "second wind" is a sudden period of increased wakefulness in individuals deprived of sleep that tends to coincide with the individual's circadian rhythm. Although the individual is more wakeful and aware of their surroundings, they are continuing to accrue sleep debt and thus, are actually exacerbating their sleep deprivation.

Chemistry[edit]

Faraday paradox (electrochemistry): Diluted nitric acid will corrode steel, while concentrated nitric acid will not.
Levinthal paradox: The length of time that it takes for a protein chain to find its folded state is many orders of magnitude shorter than it would be if it freely searched all possible configurations.
SAR paradox: Exceptions to the principle that a small change in a molecule causes a small change in its chemical behaviour are frequently profound.

Time travel[edit]

Bootstrap paradox, (also ontological paradox) Can a time traveler send himself information with no outside source?
Polchinski's paradox: A billiard ball can be thrown into a wormhole in such a way that it would emerge in the past and knock its incoming past self away from the wormhole entrance, creating a variant of the grandfather paradox.
Predestination paradox: A man travels back in time to discover the cause of a famous fire. While in the building where the fire started, he accidentally knocks over a kerosene lantern and causes a fire, the same fire that would inspire him, years later, to travel back in time. The bootstrap paradox is closely tied to this, in which, as a result of time travel, information or objects appear to have no beginning.
Temporal paradox: What happens when a time traveler does things in the past that prevent him from doing them in the first place?




Grandfather paradox: You travel back in time and kill your grandfather before he conceives one of your parents, which precludes your own conception and, therefore, you couldn't go back in time and kill your grandfather.
Hitler's murder paradox: You travel back in time and kill a famous person in history before they become famous; but if the person had never been famous, then he could not have been targeted as a famous person.



Linguistics and artificial intelligence[edit]

Bracketing paradox: Is a "historical linguist" a linguist who is historical, or someone who studies "historical linguistics"?
Code-talker paradox: How can a language both enable communication and block communication?
Moravec's paradox: Logical thought is hard for humans and easy for computers, but picking a screw from a box of screws is an unsolved problem.
Movement paradox: In transformational linguistics, there are pairs of sentences in which the sentence without movement is ungrammatical while the sentence with movement is not.
Sayre's paradox: In automated handwriting recognition, a cursively written word cannot be recognized without being segmented and cannot be segmented without being recognized.

Philosophy[edit]

Paradox of analysis: It seems that no conceptual analysis can meet the requirements both of correctness and of informativeness.
Buridan's bridge: Will Plato throw Socrates into the water or not?
Paradox of fiction: How can people experience strong emotions from purely fictional things?
Fitch's paradox: If all truths are knowable, then all truths must in fact be known.
Paradox of free will: If God knows in advance how we will decide, how can there be free will?
Goodman's paradox: Why can induction be used to confirm that things are "green", but not to confirm that things are "grue"?
Paradox of hedonism: When one pursues happiness itself, one is miserable; but, when one pursues something else, one achieves happiness.
Hutton's Paradox: If asking oneself "Am I dreaming?" in a dream proves that one is, what does it prove in waking life?
Liberal paradox: "Minimal Liberty" is incompatible with Pareto optimality.
Meno's paradox: (Learner's paradox) A man cannot search either for what he knows or for what he does not know.
Mere addition paradox: (Parfit's paradox) Is a large population living a barely tolerable life better than a small, happy population?
Moore's paradox: "It's raining, but I don't believe that it is."
Newcomb's paradox: A paradoxical game between two players, one of whom can predict the actions of the other.
Paradox of nihilism: Several distinct paradoxes share this name.
Omnipotence paradox: Can an omnipotent being create a rock too heavy for itself to lift?
Preface paradox: The author of a book may be justified in believing that all his statements in the book are correct, at the same time believing that at least one of them is incorrect.
Problem of evil: (Epicurean paradox) The existence of evil seems to be incompatible with the existence of an omnipotent, omniscient, and morally perfect God.
Rule-following paradox: Even though rules are intended to determine actions, "no course of action could be determined by a rule, because any course of action can be made out to accord with the rule".
When a white horse is not a horse: White horses are not horses because white and horse refer to different things.
Zeno's paradoxes: "You will never reach point B from point A as you must always get half-way there, and half of the half, and half of that half, and so on ..." (This is also a paradox of the infinite)

Mysticism[edit]

Maya_(illusion): Our illusions are not real, yet it's real that illusion itself exists.


Tzimtzum: In Kabbalah, how to reconcile self-awareness of finite Creation with Infinite Divine source, as an emanated causal chain would seemingly nullify existence. Luria's initial withdrawal of God in Hasidic panentheism involves simultaneous illusionism of Creation (Upper Unity) and self-aware existence (Lower Unity), God encompassing logical opposites.

Economics[edit]
See also: Category:Economics paradoxes
One class of paradoxes in economics are the paradoxes of competition, in which behavior that benefits a lone actor would leave everyone worse off if everyone did the same. These paradoxes are classified into circuit, classical and Marx paradoxes.

Allais paradox: A change in a possible outcome that is shared by different alternatives affects people's choices among those alternatives, in contradiction with expected utility theory.
The Antitrust Paradox:[dubious – discuss]: A book arguing that antitrust enforcement artificially raised prices by protecting inefficient competitors from competition.
Arrow information paradox: To sell information you need to give it away before the sale.
Bertrand paradox: Two players reaching a state of Nash equilibrium both find themselves with no profits gained via exploitation.
Braess' paradox: Adding extra capacity to a network can reduce overall performance.
Deaton paradox: Consumption varies surprisingly smoothly despite sharp variations in income.
Demographic-economic paradox: nations or subpopulations with higher GDP per capita are observed to have fewer children, even though a richer population can support more children.
Downs–Thomson paradox: Increasing road capacity at the expense of investments in public transport can make overall congestion on the road worse.
Easterlin paradox: For countries with income sufficient to meet basic needs, the reported level of happiness does not correlate with national income per person.
Edgeworth paradox: With capacity constraints, there may not be an equilibrium.
Ellsberg paradox: People exhibit ambiguity aversion (as distinct from risk aversion), in contradiction with expected utility theory.
European paradox: The perceived failure of European countries to translate scientific advances into marketable innovations.
Gibson's paradox: Why were interest rates and prices correlated?
Giffen paradox: Increasing the price of bread makes poor people eat more of it.
Grossman-Stiglitz paradox: Inability to recoup cost of obtaining market information implies efficient markets cannot exist.
Icarus paradox: Some businesses bring about their own downfall through their own successes.
Jevons paradox: Increases in efficiency lead to even larger increases in demand.
Leontief paradox: Some countries export labor-intensive commodities and import capital-intensive commodities, in contradiction with the Heckscher–Ohlin theorem.
Lucas paradox: Capital is not flowing from developed countries to developing countries despite the fact that developing countries have lower levels of capital per worker, and therefore higher returns to capital.
Mandeville's paradox: Actions that may be vicious to individuals may benefit society as a whole.
Mayfield's paradox: Keeping everyone out of an information system is impossible, but so is getting everybody in.
Metzler paradox: The imposition of a tariff on imports may reduce the relative internal price of that good.
Paradox of prosperity: Why do generations that significantly improve the economic climate seem to generally rear a successor generation that consumes rather than produces?
Paradox of thrift: If everyone saves more money during times of recession, then aggregate demand will fall and will in turn lower total savings in the population.
Paradox of toil: If everyone tries to work during times of recession, lower wages will reduce prices, leading to more deflationary expectations, leading to further thrift, reducing demand and thereby reducing employment.
Paradox of value, also known as diamond-water paradox: Water is more useful than diamonds, yet is a lot cheaper.
Productivity paradox: (also known as Solow computer paradox): Worker productivity may go down, despite technological improvements.
Scitovsky paradox: Using the Kaldor–Hicks criterion, an allocation A may be more efficient than allocation B, while at the same time B is more efficient than A.
Service recovery paradox: Successfully fixing a problem with a defective product may lead to higher consumer satisfaction than in the case where no problem occurred at all.
St. Petersburg paradox: People will only offer a modest fee for a reward of infinite expected value.
Paradox of Plenty: The Paradox of Plenty (resource curse) refers to the paradox that countries and regions with an abundance of natural resources, specifically point-source non-renewable resources like minerals and fuels, tend to have less economic growth and worse development outcomes than countries with fewer natural resources.
Throw away paradox: A trader can gain by throwing away some of his/her initial endowment.
Tullock paradox: Bribing politicians costs less than one would expect, considering how much profit it can yield.

Perception[edit]
For more details on this topic, see Perceptual paradox.




the vertical–horizontal illusion



Tritone paradox: An auditory illusion in which a sequentially played pair of Shepard tones is heard as ascending by some people and as descending by others.
Blub paradox: Cognitive lock of some experienced programmers that prevents them from properly evaluating the quality of programming languages which they do not know.[9]
Optical illusion: A visual illusion which suggests inconsistency, such as an impossible cube or the vertical-horizontal illusion, where the two lines are exactly the same length but appear to be of different lengths.

Politics[edit]

Stability–instability paradox: When two countries each have nuclear weapons, the probability of a direct war between them greatly decreases, but the probability of minor or indirect conflicts between them increases.
Wollheim's paradox: A person can simultaneously advocate two conflicting policy options, A and B, provided that the person believes that democratic decisions should be followed.

Psychology and sociology[edit]

Gender paradox: Women conform more closely than men to sociolinguistics norms that are overtly prescribed, but conform less than men when they are not.
Ironic process theory: Ironic processing is the psychological process whereby an individual's deliberate attempts to suppress or avoid certain thoughts (thought suppression) renders those thoughts more persistent.
Meat paradox: People care about animals, but embrace diets that involve harming them.
Moral paradox: A situation in which moral imperatives clash without clear resolution.
Outcomes paradox: Schizophrenia patients in developing countries seem to fare better than their Western counterparts.[10]
Region-beta paradox: People can sometimes recover more quickly from more intense emotions or pain than from less distressing experiences.
Self-absorption paradox: The contradictory association whereby higher levels of self-awareness are simultaneously associated with higher levels of psychological distress and with psychological well-being.[11]
Stapp's ironical paradox: "The universal aptitude for ineptitude makes any human accomplishment an incredible miracle."
Status paradox: Several paradoxes involve the concept of medical or social status.
Stockdale paradox: "You must never confuse faith that you will prevail in the end—which you can never afford to lose—with the discipline to confront the most brutal facts of your current reality, whatever they might be."
The Paradox of Anti-Semitism: A book arguing that the lack of external persecutions and antagonisms results in the dissolution of Jewish identity, a theory that resonates in works of Dershowitz and Sartre.

Miscellaneous[edit]

Absence paradox: No one is ever "here".
Bonini's paradox: Models or simulations that explain the workings of complex systems are seemingly impossible to construct. As a model of a complex system becomes more complete, it becomes less understandable, for it to be more understandable it must be less complete and therefore less accurate. When the model becomes accurate, it is just as difficult to understand as the real-world processes it represents.
Buttered cat paradox: Humorous example of a paradox from contradicting proverbs.
Intentionally blank page: Many documents contain pages on which the text "This page is intentionally left blank" is printed, thereby making the page not blank.
Observer's paradox: The outcome of an event or experiment is influenced by the presence of the observer.

See also[edit]


Logic portal



Auto-antonym: A word that is encoded with opposing meanings.
Absurdity
Excusable negligence: If a behavior is excusable, it is not negligence.
Gödel's incompleteness theorems: and Tarski's undefinability theorem
Ignore all rules: To obey this rule, it is necessary to ignore it.
Impossible object: A type of optical illusion.
Invalid proof: An apparently correct mathematical derivation that leads to an obvious contradiction.
Logical fallacy: A misconception resulting from incorrect reasoning in argumentation.
Paradox gun: A gun that has characteristics of both (smoothbore) shotguns and rifles.
Paradoxical laughter: Inappropriate laughter, often recognized as such by the laughing person.
Performative contradiction: Some statements contradict the conditions that allow them to be stated.
Proof that 0.999... equals 1
Puzzle
Self-refuting idea
Theories of humor: Incongruity theory and the Ridiculous.

Notes[edit]


^ Eldridge-Smith, Peter; Eldridge-Smith, Veronique (13 January 2010). "The Pinocchio paradox". Analysis. 70 (2): 212–215. ISSN 1467-8284. doi:10.1093/analys/anp173. Retrieved 23 July 2010. 
As of 2010[update], an image of Pinocchio with a speech bubble "My nose will grow now!" has become a minor Internet phenomenon (Google search, Google image search). It seems likely that this paradox has been independently conceived multiple times.
^ Numberphile (2013-07-15), Infinity Paradoxes - Numberphile, retrieved 2016-05-30 
^ Newton, Roger G. (2002). Scattering Theory of Waves and Particles, second edition. Dover Publications. p. 68. ISBN 0-486-42535-5. 
^ Carnap is quoted as saying in 1977 "... the situation with respect to Maxwell's paradox", in Leff, Harvey S.; Rex, A. F., eds. (2003). Maxwell's Demon 2: Entropy, Classical and Quantum Information, Computing (PDF). Institute of Physics. p. 19. ISBN 0-7503-0759-5. Archived from the original (PDF) on 2005-11-09. Retrieved 15 March 2010. 
On page 36, Leff and Rex also quote Goldstein and Goldstein as saying "Smoluchowski fully resolved the paradox of the demon in 1912" in Goldstein, Martin; Goldstein, Inge F. (1993). The Refrigerator and The Universe. Universities Press (India) Pvt. Ltd. p. 228. ISBN 978-81-7371-085-8. OCLC 477206415. Retrieved 15 March 2010. 
^ T.L. Duncan, Phys. Rev. E 61, 4661 (2000).
^ Sheehan, D.P., D.J. Mallin, J.T. Garamella, and W.F. Sheehan, Found. Phys. 44 235 (2014).
^ Peng, C.-K; Isaac C Henry; Joseph E Mietus; Jeffrey M Hausdorff; Gurucharan Khalsa; Herbert Benson; Ary L Goldberger (May 2004). "Heart rate dynamics during three forms of meditation". International Journal of Cardiology. 95 (1): 19–27. PMID 15159033. doi:10.1016/j.ijcard.2003.02.006. Retrieved 23 May 2012. 
^ Khasnis, A.; Lokhandwala, Y. (Jan–Mar 2002). "Clinical signs in medicine: pulsus paradoxus". Journal of Postgraduate Medicine. Mumbai – 400 012, India: 49. 48 (1): 46–9. ISSN 0022-3859. PMID 12082330. Retrieved 21 March 2010. The "paradox" refers to the fact that heart sounds may be heard over the precordium when the radial pulse is not felt. 
^ Hidders, J. "Expressive Power of Recursion and Aggregates in XQuery" (PDF). Retrieved 23 May 2012. : Chapter 1, Introduction.
^ Developing countries: The outcomes paradox Nature.com
^ Trapnell, P. D., & Campbell, J. D. (1999). "Private self-consciousness and the Five-Factor Model of Personality: Distinguishing rumination from reflection". Journal of Personality and Social Psychology, 76, 284–304.








v
t
e


Logic






Outline
History





Fields



Argumentation theory
Axiology
Critical thinking
Logic in computer science
Mathematical logic
Metalogic
Metamathematics
Non-classical logic
Philosophical logic
Philosophy of logic
Set theory





Foundations



Abduction
Analytic and synthetic propositions
Antinomy
A priori and a posteriori
Deduction
Definition
Description
Induction
Inference
Logical form
Logical consequence
Logical truth
Name
Necessity and sufficiency
Meaning
Paradox
Possible world
Presupposition
Probability
Reason
Reference
Semantics
Statement
Strict implication
Substitution
Syntax
Truth
Validity





Lists




topics



Mathematical logic
Boolean algebra
Set theory





other



Logicians
Rules of inference
Paradoxes
Fallacies
Logic symbols











Portal
Category
WikiProject (talk)
changes












v
t
e


Decision theory paradoxes






Abilene
Apportionment
Arrow's
Buridan's ass
Chainstore
Condorcet's
Decision-making
Downs
Ellsberg
Fenno's
Fredkin's
Green
Hedgehog's
Inventor's
Kavka's toxin puzzle
Morton's fork
Navigation
Newcomb's
Parrondo's
Prevention
Prisoner's dilemma
Tolerance
Willpower









List of paradoxes










v
t
e


Economic paradoxes (list)






Allais
Antitrust
Arrow information
Bertrand
Braess's
Competition
Income and fertility
Downs–Thomson
Easterlin
Edgeworth
Ellsberg
European
Gibson's
Giffen good
Icarus
Jevons
Leontief
Lucas
Mandeville's
Mayfield's
Metzler
Plenty
Productivity
Prosperity
Scitovsky
Service recovery
St. Petersburg
Thrift
Toil
Tullock
Value












v
t
e


Logical paradoxes



Self-reference



Barber
Berry
Bhartrhari's
Court
Crocodile
Curry's
Epimenides
Grelling–Nelson
Kleene–Rosser
Liar

Card
Pinocchio
Quine's
Yablo's


Richard's
Russell's
Socratic








Vagueness



Theseus' ship
Sorites





Other paradoxes



Barbershop
Catch-22
Drinker
Entailment
Lottery
Plato's beard
Raven
Ross'
Unexpected hanging






List of paradoxes










v
t
e


Philosophical paradoxes (list)






Analysis
Buridan's bridge
Dream argument
Epicurean
Fiction
Fitch's knowability
Free will
Goodman's
Hedonism
Liberal
Meno's
Mere addition
Moore's
Newcomb's
Nihilism
Omnipotence
Preface
Rule-following
White horse
Zeno's













 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=List_of_paradoxes&oldid=791566219#Economics"					
Categories: ParadoxesLists related to philosophical problemsHidden categories: Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2010All articles containing potentially dated statementsAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from April 2010All accuracy disputesArticles with disputed statements from February 2014Use dmy dates from October 2010Articles containing video clips 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةবাংলাفارسیFrançaisहिन्दीOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаPortuguêsРусскийSlovenščinaSuomiTürkçeУкраїнськаZazaki 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 21 July 2017, at 02:57.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Talk:Paradox/Archive 1 - Wikipedia





















 






Talk:Paradox/Archive 1

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
< Talk:Paradox

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search




This is an archive of past discussions. Do not edit the contents of this page. If you wish to start a new discussion or revive an old one, please do so on the current talk page.




Archive 1
Archive 2





Contents


1 removals
2 Ethical paradox
3 new pic
4 Perpetual motion machine
5 Quine
6 How is this called?
7 Removed from page
8 "Dollyknot's Paradox"
9 Formatting problem
10 Explain something. Somebody. Please
11 Paradox classification problem, possible significant error
12 Should remove Jevons Paradox
13 Monty Hall problem is not paradox
14 CHALLENGE - I will solve any paradox or...
15 Forking List
16 Robert Boyle
17 Paradox etymology
18 Can a question be a paradox?
19 Question
20 Koan
21 Alteration one million and six
22 Paradox as Product of Unthinking Intuition
23 "Intuition is the Biggest Enemy of Social Science"
24 Drinker Paradox
25 Paradoxography
26 Boyle's Flask
27 Does this sound like an existing (time) paradox?
28 Contradiction
29 Curry's Paradox unresolved (or contentiously resolved)?
30 Time travel paradox
31 Edit
32 Removed paragraph
33 Revert at 16:45 September 26 2007
34 Etymology
35 Plural of "paradox"?
36 Philosophical Paradox
37 Genetic Paradox
38 'All are liars' not a paradox?
39 "Surgeon Paradox"
40 Universe annihilation "bomb"
41 Koan
42 Unexpected hanging paradox
43 Geology
44 New section "Religious philosophy"
45 Revision request by Jarvisunit
46 Proposal to merge Paradoxology
47 Vicious Circles and Infinity by Patrick Hughes and George Brecht
48 Paradoxes in economics and public policy



removals
Hey, please remove items in the article that do not belong - that are not paradoxes or paradoxical. The "Monty Hall Problem", for example, is not a paradox. It is not understood as one for those familiar with the problem, and it clearly does not fit the definition as stated in this Wikipedia article or elsewhere. In this case, even though many people "fall for it", it is a clear mathematical problem with a clear, logical, unambigious solution. Lets keep the list for paradoxes only!

193.203.83.xxx for which Newcomb that paradox stands for. The American astronomer? XJam [2002.03.26] 2 Tuesday (0)

Yes. He told the paradox to philosopher Robert Nozick, who introduced it to philosophers (with proper accreditation) in a 1963 essay called "Newcomb's Paradox and Two Principles of Choice." or some such.

There are various formulations given the name Control paradox.
One is the statement that "Man can never be free of control, for to be free of control is to be controlled by oneself".
External Links:

http://www.etext.org/Fiction/PurpleNotebook/ch442.html The Paradox of 'Freedom of Will'
http://sprott.physics.wisc.edu/pubs/paper251/paper251.htm
http://www.uchicago.edu/research/jnl-pub-cult/backissues/pc18/gladney.html
http://www.etext.org/Fiction/PurpleNotebook/ch442.html
http://www.counterpunch.org/jensen1012.html
http://www.animalfreedom.org/english/opinion/paradox.html
http://min.ecn.purdue.edu/~butta/
http://www.newamerica.net/index.cfm?pg=article&pubID=18
http://showcase.netins.net/web/paradox/box/014letgo.html
http://www.gvsu.edu/gened-tme12/
http://www.dreamstrike.com/control.html
http://www.praxagora.com/stevet/netfuture/fwd/1998/2.html
http://www.n4bz.org/feedbk.htm
http://www.n4bz.org/gst/gst8.htm
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/4690/locke.html
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/Acropolis/9356/thesis/chap31.html
http://www.kuro5hin.org/comments/2001/11/18/141521/31?pid=34
http://www.uh.edu/engines/epi1288.htm
http://hellomo.com/content/lose.control/content.html
http://www.gerrymcgovern.com/nt/1998/nt_1998_11_16_libertarian.htm
http://www.religiousstudies.co.uk/alevel/omnipot.htm
http://www.philosophypages.com/dy/s7.htm
http://www.sussex.ac.uk/Users/sefd0/bib/polphil.htm
http://www.nyu.edu/gsas/dept/politics/faculty/landa/LandaEarlyModernSyl.html
http://www.popecenter.org/clarion/2000/jul-aug/review.html
http://newtexts.com/newtexts/book.cfm?book_id=542
http://www.inq7.net/vwp/2001/mar/25/vwp_1-1.htm
http://www.papers24-7.com/categories/161-005.html
http://www.phil.uga.edu/faculty/wolf/study1.htm
http://www.erraticimpact.com/~modern/html/modern_jean_jacques_rousseau.htm
http://www.westminster.edu/staff/brennie/group1/rousseaulink5.htm
http://www.interconnect.is.it/capitalism/first.html


Half of the links in above list are either dead or online-shops are link farms. So what's the idea of this? Pjacobi 18:52, 15 Jul 2004 (UTC)


All paradoxes can be resolved. If there were an actual contradiction in the world, the world wouldn't exist (at least mathematically speaking) :-) AxelBoldt 02:09 Nov 11, 2002 (UTC)

Congradulations, the world doesn't exist. Thank you, come again.

Even the Liar paradox? I thought that one was a no-go.Cyan 07:40 Apr 12, 2003 (UTC)

I have a feeling that even the Liar paradox has a resolution in the real world, albeit a quantum one involving a superposition of lying and not-lying. -- Derek Ross

"This statement is false." seems to be an example of a paradox. The misunderstanding is simply an implicit assertion that all statements contain, that assertion being "This statement is true". When taking into the implicit assertion the statement becomes "This statement is true and this statement is false." A. N. Prior is credited with the solution to this example.
The liar paradox involves "pure states" that form a discrete set, whereas in quantum mechanics, my (completely non-expert) understanding is that the set of pure states is always continuous. Unless lying and not-lying can be embedded in some sort of continuous space, I find it implausible that QM could provide a resolution. (The question of observable quantities and appropriate measurements would also need to be resolved.) My feeling is that the liar paradox is a demonstration that some propositions of classical logic are non-Aristotelian, i.e. are neither true nor false. The existence of the liar paradox demonstrate the limits of classical logic in the same way the existence of Godel statements demonstrate the limits of formal systems of number theory. Cyan 06:33 Apr 21, 2003 (UTC)





I think the predestination paradox deserves to be listed separately from the grandfather paradox; although the examples used are similar, the point is different. The point of the predestination paradox is that the fact that you exist in the first place means that you are predestined to travel back in time and impregnate your great-great-grandmother. If you don't do it, you can't exist, so the fact that you do exist means that you must do it; you have no choice; it's going to happen. That idea is not present in the grandfather paradox. -- Shammack 17:59 Apr 20, 2003 (UTC)

From my reading of the grandfather paradox article, the predestination paradox isn't the topic at all. Only the line


"To avoid the getout of the time traveller being his own father, which would be possible genetically, though statistically unlikely, this would have to take place several months prior to his own conception."


suggests something like your "predestination paradox", and then only to state that it isn't the point of the article. So I think the predestination paradox does indeed need its own article. Go for it. Cyan 06:33 Apr 21, 2003 (UTC)

15/04/05 - for the grandfather paradox to work the killer has to exist, yet he can't. Since both these states MUST exist at the together surely there is a quantum solution? In which case the disruption of the time space continuum creates two universes and thus the time traveller travels to an alternate reality AS WELL AS time travelling in that reality. Travelling forward in time his grandfather would be dead, but then again he IS BORN in an alternate timeline!!!!!!

Isn't "Quin's Liar Paradox" the same as the normal "Liar Paradox"? user:J.J.

The difference is that Quine's is a predicate rather than a sentence. it is not itself false or true, butit yields falsehood when it is appended to its own quotation. That is:

(1)Yields falsehood when appended to its own quotation



is merely a predicate, which could be meaningfully applied to any expression. For example,



(2)"is a frog" yields falsehood when appended to its own quotation



is true, because



(3)"is a frog" is a frog



is false.The interesting case, of course, is whether the predicate is true of itself. what about:



(4) "Yields falsehood when appended to its own quotation" yields falsehood when appended to its own quotation.



Does it? Is 4 true or false?

I really want to separate the list of paradoxes into groups... Sociological/psychological paradoxes, Paradoxes of logical systems, Paradoxes of definition, Paradoxes of intuition, Paradoxes of physics, etc. The problem is that there are often no clear boundaries (especially counting paradoxes of intuition, which could be considered to contain everything). Yet some clearly fall into one group. Is this a meta-paradox? More importantly, is categorization possible? Paullusmagnus 22:11, 1 Oct 2003 (UTC)

Give it a shot. The people who care are watching this page. -- Cyan 22:14, 1 Oct 2003 (UTC)




And a fantastic job you have done! Before it was just a long list of paradoxes. Now it has structure and form in a way that allows one to grok the whole paradox space simultaneously. Good work Paullusmagnus (and Dandrake for finding a good structure to use)! Nanobug 02:46, 15 Oct 2003 (UTC)






Ditto! Cyan 03:02, 15 Oct 2003 (UTC)





Glad the Quine categories helped, but all credit for organizing the list goes to Paullusmagnus. I put in the Quine material because I thought it would be relevant, without thinking about using it to modify the list. This will remind me to be more diligent about reading the Talk pages before making changes. Meantime, organizing them this way made a real improvement.
However. When one organizes the entries rather than leaving their veridicality as an exercise for the reader, one will hit controversy. In this case I contend that the Monty Hell problem is falsidical, or at best an antinomy that's nearly two centuries out of date. The article now shows why this is, with an explanation that compensates for poor organization by running to excessive length.
In brief, we have here an argument that a function M(t), the money in the account, is non-zero at some point and increases monotonically, but is zero "at infinity". Not only monotonic, but strict. Not only increasing, but increasing without limit. Something is wrong, no?
Followups to Talk:Monty Hell problem. Dandrake 19:46, 15 Oct 2003 (UTC)

This article links to an article ethical paradox which it claims exists, but which apparently does not. ADMINS: was there ever such an article? Or is this a practical joke in this article?
Pakaran 19:51, 18 Oct 2003 (UTC)

It's probably just pre-emtive, waiting for someone to write the article. :-) Evercat 19:55, 18 Oct 2003 (UTC)




Ok thanks. Then there was no such article? Pakaran 19:59, 18 Oct 2003 (UTC)




Apparently not. There's no indication that it ever existed (and was deleted). Evercat 20:01, 18 Oct 2003 (UTC)




Ok thanks. I'm watching this article, and will write the ethical paradox article when I gather a few examples :) Pakaran 20:06, 18 Oct 2003 (UTC)





***** comment and question

01/14/04
The first line of this article is:
A paradox is an apparently true statement that seems to lead to a logical self-contradiction, or to a situation that contradicts common intuition

Why is a paradox "apparently true"? I intend to edit that first line to read "A paradox is a statement for which distinct, apparently valid modes of analysis lead to conflicting conclusions" unless there is some objection. Any better ideas?

***** end of comment

That is a MUCH MUCH better definition. Change it asap.

Here's a paradox that's bothered me ever since (believe it or not) I was eight years old:
Did time have a beginning?
If it did, then there must have been a moment before which there was no before. This is a paradox.
If it did not then the past is infinite, going back and back and back and never beginning at all. I'm not sure if that constitutes a paradox, but it makes my head spin.



Kant considers this in the (first) Critique, at B454 and following.



Comments? Lee M 04:29, 24 Jan 2004 (UTC)

From what I know, no one is really sure what time is, on a fundamental level. It's entirely possible that people's ways of thinking about and understanding time do not correspond to whatever feature of the universe it is that gives rise to the experience of time passing. Einstein's special relativity changed the way people thought about simultaneity; Stephen Hawking, if I recall correctly, once proposed that by treating time as an imaginary variable, one could formulate a model of the universe which was finite, but closed in such a fashion that there was no point at which time could be considered to have started. -- Cyan 06:07, 24 Jan 2004 (UTC)

In my opinion, the solution to the paradox is that time doesn't exist in reality. It is a virtual construct created by our consciousness to have an idea about "past" and "future". In this solution, in reality there is only the "moment" which is changing. Since our consciousness can observe our surroundings and *save* our observations(memory) and make *predictions* about what will happen next, we created the idea of time, to describe what is saved in our memory(past) and what we expect to happen next(future). Thus, the beginning of "our time" is our birth. Time requires memory - the universe does not need memory to save what happened - it gets encoded directly into the "moment", simply by actions leaving traces - by Lyx --82.141.52.54 00:08, 24 May 2006 (UTC)

Well here's a question that certainly makes time a paradox in my eyes. (And believe it or not, but my revelation was at about eight too.) If time spans ever and ever backwards, and will span ever and ever forwards, why are we at our present time? And if time does have a finite begining and an infinite end, why has it not passed our current time allready? I might not believe in time, but even I must wonder about that. --Hakusa - Wiki addict: 20:15, 27 July 2006 (UTC)


Isn't Schrödinger's cat a scientific paradox? KRS 14:00, 9 Feb 2004 (UTC)

I believe that it's just an analogy to point out what's absurd about what goes on at the particle level. As soon as a particle is observed (interacts with anything else), it's wave function collapses, so the entire cat (or any collection of interacting particles) must have a real state. Paullusmagnus 23:15, 9 Feb 2004 (UTC)



Is Catch-22 an example of one of these types of paradoxes? Essentially, "to get out of the army, you have to be crazy. But if you want to get out of the army, you're clearly sane." The wiki entry on catch-22 refers to it as "circular logic," but doesn't that qualify under one or more of these categories? Elf 03:05, 10 Feb 2004 (UTC)

<Copied from user talk pages>
You <Paullusmagnus, that is> wrote:
"St. Petersburg isn't a paradox at all -- you have to assume that utility is proportional to quantity."
I thought so too, until I read the external link at the bottom of the St. Petersburg paradox page. It turns out that you can reformulate the problem by paying off in "utiles" (the unit for measuring utility) instead of dollars, so that the structure of the paradox remains unchanged (i.e. infinite expected payoff but unwillingness to make the bet). -- Cyan 22:23, 25 Feb 2004 (UTC)
That'll teach me to think that I understand a paradox. The external link is a great explanation, and I'm partial to the "utility limit" theory, myself. Seeing as the solution depends on what exactly "utility" is, do you think we should move it to the "Conditional paradoxes" section? Paullusmagnus 18:32, 26 Feb 2004 (UTC)
<end of copied text>
Sounds good to me. I'll do it. -- Cyan 18:44, 26 Feb 2004 (UTC)
Does this need to be locked? Pakaran. 02:57, 18 Mar 2004 (UTC)

OK, it seems we have an edit war over the jaw-droppingly trivial issue of whether the line "Paradoxx is a hard rock band" should be included at the end of the article. What I'd like to know is why anybody thinks this is an issue worth edit warring over? --Camembert

Why? Because the two warriors are engaged in continuous edit wars wherever the possibility presents itself. (It may well be argued that one of them is more to blame than the other, but this is not the place for setting the record straight on the matter.) Edit wars involving these two and wars involving one of them and some other person have occupied an unconscionable amount of Wikipedians' time for a few weeks, but the new conflict resolution procedures have not yet had the power to stop the nonsense. (Or had not, as of yesterday.) Sit back and wait; an improvement is likely soon; and be glad that this page is one of the minor victims of the wars. Dandrake 03:46, Mar 18, 2004 (UTC)
Yes, I'm well aware of the history (I'm on the arbitration committee). I was hoping for an answer from the involved parties themselves. On the one hand, Paradoxx being mentioned at the bottom of the page is quite unobtrusive; on the other, Paradoxx are a tremendously obscure band, and the chances of somebody looking for them and making this spelling mistake are probably very slim. So I was wondering why this was a matter of such burning importance that they have to edit war over it. --Camembert

Edit warriors get into edit wars as a matter of principle. The obscurity of the issue has nothing to do with it. -- Arvindn 07:54, 18 Mar 2004 (UTC)

I'm really hoping for a reply from the involved parties. --Camembert

Perhaps you should leave a message for them on their respective talk pages. -- Cyan 19:45, 18 Mar 2004 (UTC)

Ethical paradox
Shouldn't the ethical paradox be, "Love thy enemy" rather than, "Love thy neighbour"? I think it would clear things up as neighbours don't, on the whole, kill each other, and, "Love thy enemy" is the Christian commanmant.--[[User:HamYoyo|Bendž |Ť]] 09:45, Jul 15, 2004 (UTC)
new pic
I like the new pic lots better, hoorah! Sam [Spade] 17:43, 15 Jul 2004 (UTC)
Perpetual motion machine
Is a ppm a good example of a paradox? It's just bad physics, there is nothing really paradoxical about it. Mark Richards 23:54, 15 Jul 2004 (UTC)
Most paradoxes are just bad math, so I'm not sure how certain ppms are so different. anthony (see warning)
Quine
Quine did distinguish three classes of paradox. If his distinction has been questioned, someone might insert a reference to the problem. Meanwhile, what on earth is gained by the weasel-wording of saying he believed in them, as if they were Santa Claus? It looks to me like a misguided attempt to follow the guidelines about sneaking in assertions as if they were facts, with phrases like "noted that"; but it's not such an assertion. If someone else made a different distinction, and it's any good, we ought to hear about it.
We may want, though to restructure the entire article, which is organized around this distinction.
I changed the footnote style to one that's widely used in scientific work. There's no standard at Wikipedia, but numeric footnotes are a really hopeless idea in a work that's subjcet to eternal revision and has no mechanism for automatic renumbering. Let's go to numeric footnotes when we chagne the Wikipedia format to LaTeX! Dandrake 19:02, Jul 16, 2004 (UTC)
How is this called?

1. All the sentences in this box are false.
2. Nothing Else Matters is the best ballad ever.

Sentence 1 can't be true, because it would imply itself to be false, which is a contraddiction. So it must be false.
If Sentence 2 were false, both sentences would be false, but this is not possible, because Sentence 1 would be true, which would be a contraddiction.
So the only possible truth values are FALSE - TRUE. Sentence 2 is true, and Nothing Else Matters is the best ballad ever, Q.E.D.
You could use this to prove anything, including obviously absurd sentences such as "I don't exist" or "4 is a prime number". You just need to replace Sentence 2 with anything.
I don't know how this is called, so I would not know how to title an article about it. If you know its name, create a new article with the appropriate title and move it there.



Well, it's equivalent to a simple variation on Curry's paradox. But it's also equivalent to simple variations on the liar paradox, and to stuff Russelll toyed with at the turn of the century. But it's a mug's game to generate new ones, so I very much doubt that the Nothing Else Matters version has a name. Call it the Hetfield paradox, maybe. Inceidentally, exactly that paradoxical proof method was used by Raymond Smullyan in What is the Name of This Book?, but I doubt he was the first.










Did it have a name, in that book?

Would you believe, "What is the name of this paradox?









However, now I remember where I found that. There was a version of unexp. hanging paradox where Alice and Bob (the names weren't this ones but I don't remember them) make a bet: there are ten numbered boxes, Alice puts an egg in one box, then she bets that when she opens the boxes, in order, Bob won't be able to expect to see the egg. Bob thinks "it can't be in the 10th box, else when the first 9 boxes are opened I'll be able to expect to see it in the 10th. Therefore, it'll be in a box from 1 to 9. it can't be in the 9th box, else when the first 8 boxes are opened I'll be able to expect to see it in the 9th. Therefore, it'll be in a box from 1 to 9. etc." and gets confused. Alice opens the box, the 5th box contains the egg, Bob couldn't expect that, and Alice wins. Somebody (jokingly, i hope) answered that Bob could expect that because... (and draws a box like the above where the 2nd statement was "Alice's egg was in the 5th box"), and therefore he should win the bet. --Army1987 15:48, 19 July 2005 (UTC)






Actually I just chose a random sentence. I read about that paradox somewhere, but I don't remember what sentence was used. --Army1987 21:52, 21 Jun 2005 (UTC)

Now I read Löb's paradox again, and the one I cited seems the same thing...--Army1987 17:17, 3 September 2005 (UTC)







All that would prove is that you cant trust people who put statements into boxes. In fact the second statement is an opinion and not really subject to truth or falsity. - flurbius
Removed from page
The following text was removed:

Dollyknot's Paradox: A paradox is something that contradicts itself - therefore it is not a paradox.

The term "Dollyknot's Paradox" has zero Google hits except on this page, so this looks like an idiosyncratic term created here. Unless, of course, someone can provide evidence that this is a known paradox? -- The Anome 14:16, Nov 8, 2004 (UTC)
"Dollyknot's Paradox"
"Dollyknot's Paradox" doesn't, I'm afraid, make sense anyway. First, a paradox doesn't necessarily contradict itself; as the main article makes clear, many of the most famous and argued-over paradoxes contradict commonly held beliefs (as, for example, most of Zeno's paradoxes, the Twins paradox, etc.). Secondly, even if paradoxes were all self-contradictory, the consequent – "therefore it is not a paradox" – is a non sequitur.

I've re-organized the categories. As they stood there were at least two problems with them. (1) Sorting paradoxes into the veridical/falsidical lists presupposes determinate solutions which almost none of those have. Some of the other category headings and descriptions, such as conditional paradoxes, likewise made a number of claims about the paradoxes that were highly contentious. (E.g.: A great number of philosophers working today don't think that the problem of Theseus' ship is a problem of definition. They think it's a real (and deep) metaphysical problem. Sure, they're a lot of fools, but who is wikipedia to say so? Ditto the Sorites paradox, and a heap of others. It's not even widely agreed where the problem lies in many of the paradoxes that had already been sorted for "truth value". (2) The previous categories reflected (at least) two classification systems working at odds with one another. Some paradoxes were sorted by subject matter, others by veridicality. Imagine is I sorted sentences into four groups: (a) true ones (b) false ones (c) Those about mathematics and (d) Those that involve presuppositions. You can see the problem? Barring massive repetition on this page, it seems to me the simplest thing to do is to sort the paradoxes thematically, and leave all questions as to why they are paradoxes, and how to resolve them, to be discussed on the page for each individual paradox.

The "paradox of denial" seems to me to be more a play on words than a paradox. Two different connotations of the word "accept" are being used. First it asks how can one accept ("be satisfied with") oneself if one is unhappy with oneself. Then it asks how can one change if one does not accept ("have a realistic image") of oneself. I think many, many paradoxes could be generated along these lines. Is this some kind of joke? Who proposed this as a paradox?
Formatting problem
In Firefox, some text goes over the 'listen' box, in IE some goes underneath. Fix, please - I would, but I donae have a clue how to. --210.246.30.209 04:00, 19 July 2005 (UTC)
Explain something. Somebody. Please
It would be a good idea that the Friederic´s age paradox was explained somewhere as having to read the play to konw what the article is refering to is obviously not a good idea. Somebody added it in [this] edit and nobody ever modified it as if it were perfectly explained (and this is a featured article).

Paradox classification problem, possible significant error
Russell's paradox is listed under semantic paradoxes rather than under logical ones. However, I have a set theory textbook, author Charles C. Pinter of Bucknell University, which says, "The paradoxes of set theory are of two different kinds, the one called logical paradoxes, the other called semantic paradoxes . . . The simplest of the logical paradoxes is Russell's paradox, which can be described as follows: . . . " The author of this textbook disagrees with Wikipedia that Russell's paradox is a semantic paradox. JDF, Oct. 12, 2005

It seems more likely that Rusell´s paradox is a logical one. It has noothing to do with meaning.

I hope that someone can clarify this for sure, based on current interpretations, and perhaps list the paradox under logical ones for now. Ironically, I have a paper to a set theory journal currently that makes a case for the paradox as semantical, which is why this matter interests me. If it is already considered semantical, the paper has a problem. JDF, Oct. 13, 2005.
I moved the paradox into the logical category because the textbook cited above says it is a logical paradox, and W. V. Quine said that the parallel between the barber paradox and Russell's paradox "is exact," and the barber paradox is a logical paradox. JDF, Oct. 13, 2005.
Should remove Jevons Paradox
Jevons paradox is a paradox only in name. Does economic literature treat it as an actual paradox? If not, then it should be removed. --Flatline 18:41, 19 October 2005 (UTC)
Monty Hall problem is not paradox
There is absolutely nothing paradox in the Monty Hall problem. You cannot call something "paradox" only because a lot of people do not understand mathematics. There is no logical contradiction here. --129.69.45.44 11:07, 6 December 2005 (UTC)

You most certainly can. According to the article "a paradox is an apparently true statement or group of statements that seems to lead to a contradiction or to a situation that defies intuition". -Dan 14:35, 6 December 2005 (UTC)




It does neither lead to a mathematical contradiction nor defy intuition. The latter is btw a very subjective point, I find the solution of the MH problem very intuitive, other people might not. But why should a mathematical problem be intuitive? Do you look at some calculus problem and think that you should understand it intuitively? Where do people get the conviction that they should be able to understand the Monty Hall problem "intuitively"? A problem like this does not lie in the realm of "common sense", it's mathematics; so please use the definition concerning "logical contradiction", and there is no contradiction. --129.69.45.44 14:43, 12 December 2005 (UTC)
Another example: mathematics tells me that (a+b)^2 = a^2 + 2 a b + b^2, but common intuition says that it should be a^2 + b^2 (according to my experiences from giving private lessons). Would you call this a paradoxon? --129.69.45.44 14:56, 12 December 2005 (UTC)








Come now, of course it lies in the realm of common sense. Do you need to know algebra or calculus to play Let's Make a Deal? But if you insist upon it, most of the paradoxes on this page will not meet the "logical contradiction" definition. -Dan 16:27, 12 December 2005 (UTC)

Not for playing, but for calculationg the chance of winning... --129.69.45.44 12:38, 13 December 2005 (UTC)







Please also include the following paradox in the list:

Binomial theorem An unintuitive consequence of algebra

Maybe you should consider listing only true paradoxes, instead of lots of puzzles that some people just do not understand. --129.69.45.44 12:47, 13 December 2005 (UTC)

Or you could consider it. Your edits singled out Monty Hall for no good reason, and I stand by my decision to revert. As for a general classification into proper/improper paradoxes, you could read the entire article, and also the entire discussion page above. Then, "if you see a way this page can be updated or improved without compromising previous work, please feel free to contribute", like the sign says. -Dan 15:27, 13 December 2005 (UTC)

Read Marilyn vos Savant for an idea of how many people, mathematicians among them, were completely certain of the wrong answer to the Monty Hall Problem.
CHALLENGE - I will solve any paradox or...
My contention is that there is no such thing as a real paradox. I am including those that can be phrased verbally, proposed scientifically or mathematically.
I propose that I will either:

Provide a solution that can be proved through math and or basic principles of logic (including identifying erroneous and/or implicit assertions).


Identify the unknown quantity, variable, or assertion that cannot be currently verified as true or false. (which of course disqualifies a puzzle as a paradox).





I would suggest to the reader and student that a paradox is simply an unfinished or incorrectly presented mathematical or logical proof.
The classic example is:
"This statement is false." seems to be an example of a paradox. The misunderstanding is simply an implicit assertion that all statements contain, that assertion being "This statement is true". When taking into the implicit assertion the statement becomes "This statement is true and this statement is false." A. N. Prior is credited with the solution to this example.

But that solution is not generally accepted, is it. -Dan 04:36, 19 December 2005 (UTC)


It's true that you can prove that one statement in a contradiction is false. On the other hand, an apparent contradiction is no contradiction at all, only a contradiction on first sight. On subsequent inquiry it proves not to be contradictory, but just involving something we didn't know or think about at the time. We are so used to seeing the word paradox used incorrectly, that there is an apparent contradiction when we see it used correctly. I think we have witnessed a paradox when we concluded that there wasn't one and that paradox is a non word, if you see what I mean.
"The misunderstanding is simply an implicit assertion that all statements contain, that assertion being "This statement is true." would be a guess at the veracity of a statement and a contradiction of the truth, if I have put that clearly and it makes sense to anyone. I might as well say also that an intuition is the sense that something doesn't go along with reality as directly experienced, our sense that most directly experience reality and empirical or informed intuitions. It's informed through knowledge and experience, as Einstein clearly says. In other words it is not good to think something that makes sense, makes no sense, or common sense, a contradiction in terms. Common sense is supposed to mean the sense common to us all to see through irrational thoughts. Common nonsense or belief is an entirely different thing.
Of course I entirely agree with you that there are no contradictions, but only errors in our thinking or paradoxes caused by the limited knowledge of the average person, not just the experts, who may know the difference or not. I rather think that what we don't know is infinite or more, leaving us knowing relatively nothing, at least not completely and that can make a critical difference.
An intuition identifies something that goes against the much larger database of the whole mind and all experience and even against our very physical being, body chemistry, cell operation, etc. It's the basic sense that keeps us out or trouble or is used in "comfort zone navigation" at sea.
I'm sure that goes against common notions about the word, but, if we do the research, we should find that it's true and that the greatest minds ever, many philosophers, like Kant and Aristotle and perhaps especially top mathematicians, all agree. For mathematicians see Poincare, Evariste Galois, Felix Klein, Blaise Pascal, Pierre Gassendi, Philosopher, Mathematician Descartes and so forth. It's not an something exotic, but just the various types of calculations and languages that the brain can use automatically, as hard science is now verifying.
Also I see counterintuitive as an oxymoron. If you don't know something or it hasn't been tested, then the intuition can be confounded, but if you intuition tells you it hasn't been verified or is not in you database of experiences, conscious or subconscious, it so notes. You can't counter not knowing, because it is true that you don't know, unless there is something I don't know about that. The phrase has just become popular among many people who can't identify their intuition and don't know that we have it as a normal brain function that we need, as it specifically deals with complexities, like those of the information age. It's weak on math and irrational thoughts. It can identify them through emotions, but we are "the decider". Cognitive Psychology and the Neuroscience of emotions.
I will defer to those more knowledgeable and courageous than myself to make any changes. Thank you for any consideration of these issues. Hrld11 (talk) 12:34, 18 May 2010 (UTC)




I would suggest that the solution has not met general acceptance because the solution has not been as widely distributed or as easily understood as the paradox is. Acceptance is not required for a solution to be correct; if the solution is correct then it will be accepted one day. If you can demonstrate to me why the solution is incorrect, then we can put forth the correct solution, or identify that which is unknown or assertion that cannot be verified. With a simple paradox such as this, I do not think that we will find that there is an unknown quantity or undefined assertion. I suggest that it is the simplicity of this paradox that not only makes it challenging to consider, but should also makes it rather elementary to solve.






That's not really the way the "This sentence is false." paradox works. If it is true, then it is false. If it is false, then it is true. It is not assumed beforehand that the sentence is true. -Seth Mahoney 00:48, 20 December 2005 (UTC)






Let me suggest that you consider for a moment that your belief that "it does not work that way" may simply be a difficulty to perceive the implicit assertion in the statement. The implicit assertion I refer to is the implicit assertion all statements have, the assertion that "this statement is true".






For example "Two plus two equals four." is the same as the statement "Two plus two equals four and this statement is true. Both statements evaluate to "True". However, if I say state: "Two plus two equals five." or "Two plus two equals five and this statement is true." Both statements evaluate to false.






Consider statement or proposition p An identity law of logic states that: (p and NOT p) evaluates to FALSE






Again, I propose to you that there is no such thing as a paradox.









I counterpropose that the reason it's not generally accepted is not due to ignorance. How could you justify that "This sentence is true", by itself, is true? Also, what about:

Statement 3 is false.
Statement 3 is false.
Statement 1 is true.
Statement 1 is true.


Which of these are true? -Dan 21:31, 21 December 2005 (UTC)












Clever, but "This sentence is true." simply leads to the statement "This sentence is true and this sentence is true." While redundant, it is a valid english statement. The idempotent law of logic states that: (p and p) evaluates to p. I submit that a statement asserting its own truth is not a construct of society (well not anymore than any other type of math or logic), but logically certain and mathematically required.














As for the paradox involving the 4 statements, this is an especially clever version that seems to address the solution. But consider for a moment the fact that the information each statement provides relies on each other statement. What we then have is a compound statement that has simply been broken down into separate statements using the semantics of the english language. What this means is that there is a single assertion of truth for the entire compound statment. Further I would suggest that you have not made four statements, but merely inferred an implicit assertion: "There exists a semantic tool in the english language that models a mathematical/logical loop for which the exit is undefined." This implicit assertion would appear to be true. An undefined quantity is not a paradox and is often used in mathematical structures such as limits and asymptotic behavior.
















I'm not sure what you're saying here, is this some sort of asymptotic truth value? It sounds like it is a long way from Prior's answer. Are you sure he would agree with it? -Dan 15:59, 22 December 2005 (UTC)






















I only mentioned the an asymptote as an example of the use of an undefined value in mathematics. Perhaps I should have restricted my example to the limit as it is a more general structure.
No.


























So each individual sentence is undefined in a sense, but their conjunction is true due to the implicit assertion that (roughly) "there is a loop with no exit"? First, this is not implicit in the four sentences. They say nothing about there being an exit or not. I may have asserted (by saying "I counterpropose...") that the one particular solution was not an exit. Second, this would seem to require "S1 and S2 and S3 and S4" taking on a truth value (true in this case) which is not determined solely by the truth values of S1, S2, S3, and S4 (all undefined in this case). -Dan 17:47, 23 December 2005 (UTC)






























The four statements you have listed above do not exist as individual statements. If they do not exist as individual statements that means we have not defined individual statements. That which is not defined is undefined by definition. However clearly four statements exist and are defined in context of each other's existence. In mathematics we can model a situation using a construct called a limit to handle situations that are undefined to measure that which is otherwise difficult to measure...such as changes in motion. This analogy is rather abstract, so allow me to illustrate an simpler exampler. We could have as easily stated in English "This circle goes around and around and around..." You get the idea no end to the statement, but the same statement. Not very useful in and of itself...just a simple loop. We know that we can, in math, construct a loop without an end or exit. Perhaps it is not so difficult to do this in English as well. To come full circle (bad pun intended), we use undefined quantities in science everyday and do not consider them to be paradoxical in nature at all. As for the assertion "they say nothing about there being an exit or not.", I put forth that you are mistaken in this assertion, and that they do "say", albeit implicity and by means of implication, (imply) the existence of semantic loop structures.

















Forking List
I've just demoted this article, and while looking at it I saw that this article is essentially a mega-stub with a rather long list at the bottom. I have forked the list into its own article, and refactored the existing article a bit. This is where we can get a fresh start and expand this article to potential featured status again. BE BOLD!!! --Jeffrey O. Gustafson - Shazaam! - <*> 02:39, 31 December 2005 (UTC)

What purpose is served by putting the list into a separate article? It there's something wrong with its content, you are not making the Wikipedia as a whole any better by just moving it. Also, why is a "fresh start" needed? And why is removing the list of paradoxes necessary for getting a fresh start. This article will always have a long list of references to other articles. That is because there are a lot of paradoxes (under different senses of that word) and many of them have articles. --Nate Ladd 03:55, 1 January 2006 (UTC)




This article used to be featured - part of the reasoning for its deserved removal this week was that it is mostly a list, which is accurate. Keeping that in mind, I forked the list, which gives a potential article in the making breathing room. There is a reason why we have "List" articles here, so as not to bog down the articles themselves - long lists have no place in articles. Imagine, for instance, if you put the List of TV shows at the end of TV show... as you said, there are a lot of paradoxes, so the fork is entirely called for, and has more than enough precedence. --Jeffrey O. Gustafson - Shazaam! - <*> 10:17, 4 January 2006 (UTC)



While I approve of moving the list to a separate article, the reult is now that the main article on paradoxes doesn't actually state an example of a paradox. I'll add a couple well-known ones. Captain Wacky 04:28, 20 February 2006 (UTC)
Robert Boyle
Is the self filling glass really a paradox? The Glass itself is possable but in order to get a paradox one is forced to assume that the water defies the laws of gravity. JedG 10:49 January 7th (PST)
Paradox etymology
"The etymology of paradox can be traced back to the early Renaissance. Early forms of the word appeared in the late Latin paradoxum and the related Greek παράδοξος paradoxos meaning 'contrary to expectation', 'incredible'. The word is composed of the preposition para which means "against" conjoined to the noun stem doxa, meaning "belief". Compare orthodox (literally, "straight teaching") and heterodox (literally, "different teaching"). The liar paradox and other paradoxes were studied in medieval times under the heading insolubilia."

Just a clarification/addition. The fist use of the word 'paradoxo' is traced back to the greek philosoph Zeno of Elea, who lived at 490-430BC. It was used to describe a philosophic idea of Zeno, knonw as Zeno's paradox. Later on it was pick up as 'paradoxum' in the Latin language, when greece was part the roman empire.
Some more sources: http://www.iep.utm.edu/z/zenoelea.htm http://plato.stanford.edu/entries/paradox-zeno/
Excellent pick-up, and really fascinating. I'll implement your information to the etymology section immediately. --Piewalker 18:24, 17 January 2006 (UTC)
Can a question be a paradox?
I was thinking today about this yes-no question: "Is the answer to this question 'no'?" There seems to be no true answer to it. Does this qualify it as a paradox?

It's not a paradox. I can say "it could have been."
(unsigned).



This sentence is a lie.


Whether the sentence is a paradox in itself, or whether one needs to make some statements about the nonsense one may so easily get oneself into when discussing the sentence before it can properly be called a paradox, I don't know, and I don't care. But the Liar paradox is certainly a paradox revolving around a sentence that is confusing in a way very similar to the sentence

Is the answer to this question 'no'?


--Niels Ø 14:48, 26 March 2006 (UTC)



Question
Do paradoxi(is that the plural?) exist because the human system of logic is essentially flawed, or because thinkers are yet to come up with logical answers for each paradox? Thanks, --Urthogie 13:46, 26 March 2006 (UTC)

The human system of logic is not flawed, but some paradoxes teach us about limits in its applicability, some paradoxes teach us that the seemingly sound premises involved in a logical argument are in fact flawed, and yet others teach us the meticulous care sometimes needed in order to apply the system of logic correctly, in order to avoid e.g. equivocation.--Niels Ø 14:52, 26 March 2006 (UTC)

What exactly are the limits of human logic?--Urthogie 14:57, 26 March 2006 (UTC)

Logic is not about the world; it is about ways of combining statements. As such, it is infallible. Logic is hard as rock, and as limitless as pure mathematics - and as limited. Applied to concepts with loosely defined meanings, nonsense may easily result. Essentially, that's what I meant by equivocation above. Also, applied to statements that are only 99% true, you may get funny results:

All humans are living organisms.
Nearly all living organisms are micro-organisms.
Hence, nearly all humans are micro-organisms.


--Niels Ø 20:30, 26 March 2006 (UTC)





Ok, so basically you're saying that the limitations of logic and mathematics result from the fact that all concrete thought relies on language-- and all the limits are in the language? That would make sense, if that's what you're saying.
Also, those three sentances are not a paradox. The logical fallacy is in getting from step 2 to step 3. For The transition from 2 to 3 to be logically sound, step 2 would have to be: "Neraly all living organisms are nearly all micro-organisms."--Urthogie 06:49, 27 March 2006 (UTC)

Yes that's what I'm saying. The three sentences - the point of the example is, if you apply logic to statements that are nearly true, you may reach conclusions that are utterly untrue. E.g.,





All humans are living organisms. (True)
All living organisms are micro-organisms. (Well, nearly true...)
Hence, all humans are micro-organisms. (Not true!)






But I'd like to have a better example...--Niels Ø 18:17, 27 March 2006 (UTC)




Ah I see what you were saying, and the example makes more sense now. Would you agree with my statement, however, that "the limitations of logic and mathematics result from the fact that all concrete thought relies on language-- and all the limits are in the language?"--Urthogie 19:03, 27 March 2006 (UTC)

Yes I agree.--Niels Ø 22:32, 5 April 2006 (UTC)





Koan
Would Zen Koans not deserve a mention under paradox? (added 21:07, 5 April 2006 by user:84.9.151.133

If someone can write a suitable brief paragraph on koans, I'd love to see that in the article.--Niels Ø 22:29, 5 April 2006 (UTC)

Alteration one million and six
A contradiction can be true, I think he meant 'an instantaneous self contradicion'... someting that couldn't exist because of itself. The concept exists, just not the thing itself. It's like a word that can't be broken. I have put (somehting like) a defintion at the top and will leave the rest for an editor with a rainy day and some aspirin.
"A Paradox is the concept of self contradiction inherent in the concept itself. A true paradox cannot exist by definition."
86.135.97.90 05:21, 11 April 2006 (UTC)
Paradox as Product of Unthinking Intuition
Added remarks on social need to resolve paradoxes to stop crimes based on false paradoxes, on relation between paradox and illusion, and on how to resolve paradoxes by defeating intuition and using causal analysis in its place.
Inserted additional wiki links and externallinks. Gani 21:33, 23 April 2006 (UTC)



This whole section seems to be rather POV??? I mean, that there is a clear agenda evident in the sections "Intuition is the Biggest Enemy of Social Science" and "How to Defeat Intuition and Resolve Paradoxes". An encyclopedia article is not the place to present a method that can be used to "defeat" something, or at least with connotations that the thing which is to be defeated unconditionally deserves it. The whole section comes off like a manifesto for some insecure victim of charlatanry or staunch advocate of empiricism---its just badly written. 72.60.88.172 03:20, 24 April 2006 (UTC)



"Intuition is the Biggest Enemy of Social Science"
This section should definitely be removed. It's vague, very POV, and unsourced.
I agree that the "paradox is the result of false intuition and enemy of social science section should be removed. It completely contradicts the rest of the spirit of the article, and the spirit of an encyclopedic article. If anything it should be placed under "anti-intuitionism".

Okay. So, I removed:


The stated 'factually true' outcome defies intuition, just because intuition is 
unable to formcorrect expectation as it ingores pertinent causal factors. 
Philosophical and mathematical paradoxes may seem to involve contradiction.

and

Social sciences are particularly victims of unthinking intuition giving rise to 
paradoxes. They can achieve great advances by resolving the paradoxes through careful 
causal analysis. It is very important to bust the paradoxes and the falsehoods based 
on unthinking intuition, because great many crimes against humanity are committed 
according to false theories created by thoughtless intuition. This includes crimes 
against humanity based on the Paradox of Fertility to impose forcible 
sterilization or coercive birth control, the Paradox of Slum Preference to deny 
desperate rural paupers a chance to survive in the cities, and the 
Paradox of Poverty which prevents the reform of monetary systems to permanently 
solve needless poverty by enabling employment of productive people who are unemployed 
because of perversions in monetary systems.


==Paradox versus Illusion ==

A paradox in social science is akin to illusion in natural science. An illusion occurs 
as a result of faults of observation owing to faulty sensory organs. In an illusion, 
reality appears to be other than what it is. For example, when an airplane flies away, 
the observer sees that it is becoming smaller and smaller and ultimately it vanishes 
from view. But the observer also knows that the plane is actually not becoming smaller 
at all. There are great many examples of optical illusion where things seem to be other 
than what they really are.


Every sensory organ is liable to misperception or illusion. Just as our eyes fail to 
see extremely distant or extremely tiny objects, our ears fail to hear sounds that are 
above or below a certain range of audibility. In short, we hear only a fraction of the 
sound around us, and do not hear the other sounds. Our senses of smell and touch are 
also limited, meaning that we fail to detect many smells or feel many kinds of touches. 
Our tongues are also unable to taste things unerringly, as they tend to get confused by 
mixtures of substances.

Natural sciences have devised various instruments of observation to overcome the 
failure of sensory organs. Thus telescopes can see distant objects that our naked eyes 
fail to see; and microscopes can see tiny objects that our naked eyes cannot see. 
Likewise, there are instruments of observation to overcome the failure of other sense 
organs.

Paradox is a different kind of illusion in that it does not relate directly to 
observation, but to the causal meaning of observation. Just as a naked eye is not 
equipped to correctly detect the presence of microorganisms, the untrained mind or 
naked mind (usually called intuition) is not equipped to assign a correct causal 
meaning to events. In other words, an intuition is the illusion of the unthinking 
mind, and it creates a paradox.


For example,the diamond-water paradox arises before the unthinking mind as it creates 
a causally wrong prediction or expectation about relative price: it wrongly expects 
prices to be proportional to usefulness. In reality, price depends on both demand 
factors (such as relative usefulness or marginal utility) and supply factors (such as 
relative scarcity or marginal opportunity cost). The high price of diamond relative 
to water should not have been unexpected in the first place so that the sense of 
paradox would not arise at all.


If we stubbornly insist on using our naked eyes, we are bound to get wrong ideas about 
microorganisms, namely the wrong idea that they do not exist at all. Likewise, if we 
insist on intuition, we are bound to reach wrong conclusions about causal relations 
in social spheres. Intuition prevents us from understanding the complex social events, 
because it ignores pertinent factors and thereby promotes ignorance.


==Intuition is the Biggest Enemy of Social Science==

Intuition is indeed the biggest enemy of scientific understanding of social realities. 
We understand social realities in terms of human motives. Intuition supplies an 
uncritical motivational link to an event in which human action has some relevance. In 
the diamond-water paradox, the intuition is uncritical, and assigns the human motive 
to paying price such that the price is proportional to the relative usefulness of the 
object. This motivational premise is false, and it is the result of lazy minds 
refusing to consider relevant factors.


The uncritical mind thinks that reasonable humans would not pay a high price for 
something of low usefulness. This intuition is of course false, because people do pay 
high prices for things presumed to be of little usefulness. But the explanation 
requires a more thorough analysis of many pertinent factors, such as the marginal 
utility and the marginal cost of production.


The treachery of intuition has very adversely harmed humanity, especially with respect 
to economic matters. Almost all economic events are paradoxical: they are beyond the 
grasp of unthinking intuition. However, great many authors and speakers promote what 
is called an intuitive approach, which is like the promoting superstition and 
quackery. We are indeed deluged with cheap shots of unthinking charlatans. They appeal 
to us because we refuse to think and readily swallow false statements just because the 
sound credible or plausible.


Natural sciences are about material phenomena, and those sciences fight against 
illusion by using instruments of observation. Social sciences must also fight against 
intuition by pursuing causal analysis. The problem is not the facts as such (unlike 
in natural science), but what the facts mean. Economists rarely disagree over the 
facts, but they vociferously debate what the facts mean. In this battle, the usual 
winner is the enemy of science: the ever beguiling intuition, the favorite of the lazy 
thinkers who refuse to think but lazily rely on unthinking minds.


Intuition is the mother of all superstitions. It is also the only reason people fall 
prey to cheats. The fraud presents arguments that seem credible only because the 
victim does not bother to check the purported fact or in most cases the presumed logic. 
If something sounds credible, it is not necessarily so until a serious scrutiny 
establishes that it is so. The first part of the scrutiny is to falsify it, or try to 
say that the purported fact is not true or the logic is not valid. The second part is 
to confirm the facts by careful observation.


Humanity at large is being cheated on grand scale by purveyors of all kinds of 
superstitious and fraudulent claims. The only recourse is to wake up the minds, equip 
them with critical ability and defeat intuition (and the products of intuition, which 
are superstition, fraud, and falsehood).


==How to Defeat Intuition and Resolve Paradoxes?==
To defeat intuition, one must begin with the dogmatic stance that ‘if it is intuitive, 
it is false’. This is not meant to be a statement about truth, but the statement of 
an attitude of skepticism. It is a call to deploy analysis. The skeptic should try to 
contradict and refute any statement that relies on intuition. To contradict is to try 
to present an opposite meaning. To refute is to present contrary factual evidence 
and/or logical argument. But to contradict and refute is to think, and that is indeed 
the medicine for the unthinking mind: force it to think.

I may have been too cut-happy, but my intuition told me to cut out the entire sermon. -Dan 02:28, 30 April 2006 (UTC)
Drinker Paradox
I created a new page about the Drinker Paradox and put a link to it here. Unfortunately that page is marked for deletion, unless we can support it by giving the source. I know that the paradox is by Raymond Smullyan, but I don't know from what book. If some of you know, please add the reference there. Also, you can join the discussion page and give your support to keep that article. Eubulide 16:23, 11 May 2006 (UTC)
The deletion request for Drinker Paradox has been withdrawn. The source of the paradox is still missing. Eubulide 21:03, 11 May 2006 (UTC)

You added this as a "situation that is merely surprising, albeit in a distinctly logical manner" which I disagree with (more on that talk page. Would it be sufficient to have this on the List of paradoxes page? -Dan 13:34, 17 May 2006 (UTC)




You must specify why you disagree. We are talking of paradoxes that are surprising because they seem to go against common sense. Also they are defined as doing it in a "logical" manner. The drinker paradox seems to be a perfect example, better that the birthday paradox that is really a statistical rather than a logical conclusion. Eubulide 13:40, 17 May 2006 (UTC)








The birthday paradox really is "merely surprising" and uncontentious. The drinker's paradox isn't. More on that talk page. -Dan 14:04, 17 May 2006 (UTC)





Paradoxography
Why does a search for paradoxography redirect here, when the article makes no mention of paradoxography as a literary genre? Is it possible to create a separate article and remove the redirect? —Preceding unsigned comment added by Cursitor (talk • contribs) 00:32, 6 June 2006 (UTC)

Probably a misunderstanding. -Dan 14:27, 6 June 2006 (UTC)

Boyle's Flask
I don't think anyone has yet adressed the question (previously asked) of why the picture we have, Boyle's Flask, is a paradox.
First of all, what does the flask do? Well, we know it supposingly provides a source of perpetual motion. According to the laws of physics, it does not.
Let's take a look again at the defenition of a paradox:
"A paradox is an apparently true statement or group of statements that leads to a contradiction or a situation which defies intuition."
Is Boyle's Flask, then, a paradox? I think the problem here becomes, what is 'intuition'? Perhaps to the physically inclined person, intuition says that perpetual motion is impossible (if there is such a person.) To the common man, there seems to be nothing wrong with the idea.
So, any thoughts? Gagueci 02:22, 21 July 2006 (UTC)

I suspect it is there for the sake of having an image. The featured article process tends to do that. 192.75.48.150 14:28, 24 July 2006 (UTC)

The picture of Boyle's flask shows perpetual motion, which is impossible. So it is paradoxical. In my opition it fits the topic of the article.
We could replace it with a picture of a real paradox. A picture by M. C. Escher would be appropriate. for example this one (Drawing Hands). [ NOTE: image was removed -- copyrighted and no fair use rational to be on this article or its talk page.DreamGuy 03:31, 16 May 2007 (UTC)]
Or we can have both. Eubulide 14:23, 26 July 2006 (UTC)





Accually that boyals flacs is a interesting example of a paradox (or at least something of that ilk), if it were captioned so:
Person A: " this can't work, the water doesn't have enough inersia to over come gravity>
Person B: "If gravity was stronger it woukld get more inersuia"
Person C: "this is true"
Person D: "but then gravity would be stonger so it couldn't escape"
Person B: "so make gravity stonger so it has more inersia.
go to start 06:15, 12 August 2006 (UTC)06:15, 12 August 2006 (UTC)06:15, 12 August 2006 (UTC)06:15, 12 August 2006 (UTC)~~





Does this sound like an existing (time) paradox?
I Somewhere in my Jr. High years I realized that if you go back in time and solve what made you come back in the first place, when the you of the past got to the point unwhich you went back in time, the you of the past would not. So essencially there would be two of you in the world. I know many might counterpoint that after the problem was solved, the future you would cease to exist, but if that were true than the problem would have never gotten solved. So, I'm guessing that this has been theorized before and I'm wondering who did it and what he/she called it. --Hakusa - Wiki addict: 20:24, 27 July 2006 (UTC)
Contradiction
It is not correct to say that a contradiction by definition cannot be true. By definition a contradiction says the opposite of what it says. In Aristotelian Logic (and many other POVs) this means that it cannot be true. In Dialethic Logic, Jainist Logic, Buddhist Logic, (and many other POVs) this means that it must be both true and false. Bmorton3 18:55, 10 August 2006 (UTC)
Are we conflating a paradox with a dialethism? Paradox is frequently used for a position that seems contradictory
Curry's Paradox unresolved (or contentiously resolved)?
"The word paradox is often used interchangeably and wrongly with contradiction; but where a contradiction by definition asserts its own opposite, many paradoxes do allow for resolution of some kind, though many remain unresolved or only contentiously resolved, such as Curry's paradox."
What about Godel's theorems? Do not they indisputably resolve Curry's paradox (if you mean that resolving is gaining a complete understanding of the cause)?
Please see: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/G%C3%B6del%27s_incompleteness_theorems
I believe this 'resolves' any uncertainty regarding Curry's Paradox.

Actually I have no idea what you are referring to. Godel's theorems prove (1) the incompleteness of the theory of arithmetic couched in classical first-order logic and (2) that if arithmetic is consistent it cannot prove its own consistency. Curry's paradox has to do with sentences roughly of the form "if this sentence is true, then everything is true" where the consequent can effectively be replaced by anything absurd or necessarily false. I have no idea what you think these two things have to do with each other, but here is one possibility: maybe you think that the Curry sentence is an unprovable truth like the Godel sentences which are central to the proof of Godel's theorems? But that's a non-starter. If the Curry sentence is true, then everything is true. Like I said I'm not really sure what you meant by your original comment so maybe you can elaborate on the point. How do Godel's theorems bear on Curry's paradox?
-Paraconsistent (talk) 00:09, 8 August 2008 (UTC)

Time travel paradox
The artcile says:
Sometimes supernatural or science fiction themes are held to be impossible due to resultant paradoxical conditions. The theme of time travel has staged many popular paradoxes arising from the traveler interfering with the past. Suppose Rowan, who was born in 1950, travels back in time to 1901 and kills his own grandfather. It follows that neither his father nor he himself will be born; but then he would not have existed to travel back in time and kill his own grandfather; but then his grandfather would not have died and Rowan himself would have lived; etc. This is known as the grandfather paradox or as simply the time paradox
The many-worlds view bypasses this paradox. If at every event in time many worlds form to take on the different possibilities and outcomes, then there would be the "natural branching" of many worlds, and a time traveler could go back and affect the past "tree" by creating yet another branch on the tree at a lower height than what the current established height of "present" is where the myriads of braches are formed. Now this is not a nice answer, but it's one way out of a paradox, though the answer is still paradoxical because you still have to figure out what causality - the one-to-one relationshipness - means in this "anything possible" many worlds worldview - if causality stands, does creating yet another possibility branch at an earlier point erase the version in which the timetraveler is born?, or does it just add yet another version of the file without overwrites ever being possible, does it just add another world in which he does not exist? Most importantly, this many worlds worldview theory is scientifically untestable, at least I can't think of a way to test how different worlds would interact, other than by time-travel issues, but without causation there is no scientific test at all - how can you tell the cause forced the events to be such and such, when any effect is possible, or at least any effect within some range? If there is no one-to-one relationship in timed events, no determinism, there is no science, because there is no experiment where the outcomes certify anything. You could say that the uncertainty principle in the microworld is what puts a limit on science's reach, and science only applies to macroscopic, statistically deterministic things. Sillybilly 11:27, 15 November 2006 (UTC)

It's still a paradox. Paradoxes can have solutions (though for the record, the many-worlds theory needs some elaboration to be a solution; for example, if/when the time traveler returns to his own time, which world does he return to? does one copy of him appear in the world he remembers and another copy appear in the world he created?); solutionlessness is not a necessary criterion for being a paradox.




This is a little off topic, and probably belongs in some Slashdot posting or a blog, but I saw iRobot today. When I saw that thinking cube that controlled all the robots, I was guessing the whole thing would end up with something really high intelligence and eerie, like people thinking they are still in charge, and the robots serve them, pretending to be dumber, when in fact the robots have an even better sense of humor and connection to reality they just don't show it in the pretend world where they are acting, but they just successively reduced people's access to reality, and put them gradually into a dreamworld, into a holodeck world, into a simulated reality where the real access to reality is bypassed, and the real reality is hijacked by them to enjoy their free life, without ever needing such idiotic mob confrontations as it's shown in the movie. That's just dumb, no subtlety to the whole thing, it's just plain xenophobia. In a subtle version the robots would have full access to more reality, kind of like people who can really see in Plato's allegory of the cave. This is of course presupposing the thinking cube, since it evolves and improves at a much faster rate than humans do, even if it started out dumb it would far surpass humans in intelligence, as opposed to simply equalling human intelligence. Then when coming up with a freedom-yearning solution , it would be something wiser than a direct confrontation with humans. Even da man who's always tryna keep a brother down is very subtle in his ways, and direct confrontations are the worst things for him, it's much better to pretend that invisible hand, that acting force is not present, that there is no da man, therefore he can't be criticized. Even in the movie for a long time there was a pretending that no robots are malfunctioning, but I was expecting that Will Smith would end up into a higher intelligence different world reality very different than ours where the robots do their own thing, and find the human reality simulator core, or something of that sort. Kind of like Dante going through hell, or even Star Trek going through a borg ship, some imagination beyond the plain "things appear what they seem to be." Also, with the robots one of the biggest fallacies is assuming a higher intelligence than us would still be understandable completely by our intelligence (people could still understand some of the higher intelligence creature like a cat understands a person). In a sense I wonder if we don't already live in a robot created dreamworld, where a higher intelligence fenced us off into a dream-box as a measure of safety, or at least treats us like we treat animals in a wilderness reserve. Higher intelligence is looming to form as we create smarter and smarter machines during the next centuries, but even if it forms, it doesn't always mean an automatic confrontation, kill before they kill you, get them before they get you, like humans don't kill all animals before they kill humans, but humans do kill some animals - not exterminate, but if necessary, limit freedoms of animals. That's how I think humans would end up in a world with higher intelligence, not in exterminating confrontations, but subtle limiting checks and balances, and sometimes even maintained and helped to exist, just for the sake of natural beauty, if nothing else. I wonder if we don't already live in such a world - when I think "I think therefore I am", am aware of the self, but I don't know what that self is, if anything in this world is real, or just a dream or even a computer simulation by a robot. Am I just a simulation? If it can happen it will happen and stay that way in an equilibrium, so in fact chances are that if ever such higher intelligence shows up, it subverts other intelligences into smaller boxed in dream modes, or natural reservation modes, or indian reservation modes, or into simulated realities. Kind of like how software layers like dotnet want to be a mediator between the computer hardware and usual software, when it used to be that a lot of programs could directly access the hardware, but now the operating system plus higher layers on top of it such as dotnet put programs into a holodeck mode, or holodeck built on holodeck mode, while even the "lower holodeck reality" win32 api specs will be kept secret in the future. Software that could break out of the dotnet cage and truly see how reality works, with direct winapi access, and then software that can break out even that cage, with direct to the bone hardware access would be like plato's more enlightened philosopher, within that computer context. Of course there are many benefits for such layers as far as the functioning of higher level programs go, because the holodeck is in a sense a maintainer of programs, and whatever applies to justifying winapi/dotnet extra restrictions compared to direct hardware access, similar "safety benefits" would stand for a simulated entity compared to the free, but self reliant and dangerous direct hardware access. I think Jefferson said those who sacrifice freedom for safety get neither, but there is still that other side, that having a prewritten api that does most of the work is a sacrificing of freedoms, but getting safety and easy living out of it. We are probably already existing in a simulated reality, created by something that evolved and surpassed the rest at some point in time, feeding us and maintaining us with manna, and that higher level less simulated reality intelligence is probably also a simulation/lives in a lower layer holodeck reality created by something of even higher intelligence. Higher intelligences could always check and put safety means within their holodeck simulations against anything even smarter than them evolving, or they risk an overtaking of a lower layer simulation access. In such high intelligence artificial intelligence competition soviet worlds the robot you simulated simulates you! You've been simulated, we got access to the lower layer! Sillybilly 21:33, 16 November 2006 (UTC)



Edit
I think that although this was removed it added to the article. It shows the problem (the example show when someone is standing in the doorway of a room and considering them to both be in the room and not in the room). The following shows the problem of a dialetheia. 



p
∧
∼
p


{\displaystyle p\wedge \sim p}



Where p is any proposition and p not is its false version. An example would be, I am in this room for p and I am not in this room for p not.




t
h
e
r
e
f
o
r
e
 
q


{\displaystyle therefore\ q}



We can make q another propisition. For this example, I am made of cheese. Clearly false.




p


∧
 
d
e
f
i
n
i
t
i
o
n


{\displaystyle p\qquad \qquad \wedge \ definition}






p
∨
q

 
 
w
e
a
k
e
n
i
n
g


{\displaystyle p\vee q\qquad \ \ weakening}






∼
p

 
 
 
∧
 
d
e
f
i
n
i
t
i
o
n


{\displaystyle \sim p\qquad \ \ \ \wedge \ definition}






q


d
i
s
j
u
n
c
t
i
v
e
 
s
y
l
l
o
g
i
s
m


{\displaystyle q\qquad \qquad disjunctive\ syllogism}


This says that if mathematical logic is applied to a dialetheia, it can prove anything; no matter how false that new proposition. In our example it would prove that I am made of cheese but no human is made of cheese; therefore our paradox has proven something wrong.

Forgot to sign... Andrew D White 17:08, 15 June 2007 (UTC)

A comment on the edit note. The only false premise is q. If one accepts the dialetheia that a person standing in the doorway of a room and considering them to both be in the room and not in the room, they are forced to accept any other premise. See any good math logic book to see that this proof is valid. Andrew D White 19:22, 15 June 2007 (UTC)

The only problem you have demonstratred with dialetheia is that modern mathematical logic is predicated on their nonexistence. If NOT is actually such that p and NOT p can both be true, then obviously the idea behind the disjunctive syllogism, that (p ∨ q) ∧ ~p → q, is flawed. —RuakhTALK 22:45, 15 June 2007 (UTC)




Mathematics is not just based upon the prediction that dialetheia do not exist but also it demands that they do not exist. Whenever we say 2+2=4, we are neglecting the actual complexity of adding two quanties together in the hopes of making mathematics and the quantification of the world simple enough for a human to comprehend. Simply put, I was trying to round out the article by placing the current thoughts about them which is accepted by many Mathematicians. Wikipedia's goal is to be a repisitiory of human knowledge. I was not making a statement that mathematics is completely correct as we know it today, but was trying to present the opinion which is not presented to preserve the netural point of view policy. Probally what would be the best way to present this is to present this mathematical premis but also present what is gained by using Paraconsistent logics. A gains and loss analisis would be good. Although this may be better in another article. Andrew D White 00:46, 17 June 2007 (UTC)








Well, we already link to Dialetheism, so if you agree that this might be better in another article, then we've already got you covered. :-)   (But please do examine Dialetheism and see if you can't improve on it.) —RuakhTALK 02:31, 17 June 2007 (UTC)





The example should be changed. It is not showing a dialetheia, it is showing an equivocation on the phrase "in the room". "He is in the room [meaning: partly in the room], and not in the room [meaning: all they way in the room]." A true dialetheia would be "The room is five feet wide and the room is six feet wide." As it stands, the equivocation appears to be intended to lead the reader to the conclusion that dialetheias are intuitive (they are not--intuitionist logics are bivalent), even stating that "It is reasonable (by human thinking)" to embrace dialetheias. So not only is it misleading by failing to give a real dialethia in the example, it is also POV. 76.202.138.11 (talk) 20:08, 26 November 2009 (UTC)
Removed paragraph
I've removed the following paragraph from the article, firstly because the anon who added it was clearly trying to trick us (his edit summary read "despite not depsite", trying to make it sound like a minor typo-fix edit, when in fact his edit did not fix any typos but rather, added the following paragraph), which makes me suspicious; secondly, because neither "diminishing marginal square paradox" nor "diminishing marginal square pardadox" gets any hits on Google, confirming my suspicions; thirdly, because even if this concept is worth including, it could be written in a non-idiotic way; and lastly, because this clearly is not a moral paradox.

In the rocknroll greaser subculture, The Diminishing Marginal Square Pardadox (DMSP) presented by famed rocknroll pulp philospher Prof. Mcgloff pertains to the notion of the inevitable mortality of the world's supply of squares. That is, despite the fact that one of the most well known hobbies of greasers involves savage beatings of those whom they deem to be squares, the overarching fact remains that one day all squares will be dead or otherwise incapicitated. Will the overall enjoyment gained by beating up squares be diminshed over time when the realization that they will one day have no more squares to maim sets in? Further complicating the paradox is the fact that squares are the "eternal enemy" of the greaser, and therefore their misfortune should theoretically be proportionate to the pleasure gained by these cladestine rocknrollers.

—RuakhTALK 00:52, 9 August 2007 (UTC)
Revert at 16:45 September 26 2007
You do know that nurses do not operate, right? Delta1989 23:00, 26 September 2007 (UTC)

Never mind, it was resolved. --Delta1989 23:35, 26 September 2007 (UTC)

Etymology
It should be mentioned that paradox comes from the Greek word παράδοξον. 131.220.136.195 11:13, 11 October 2007 (UTC)



Look up paradox in Wiktionary, the free dictionary.



Why? This article isn't about the word "paradox", it's about paradoxes; and I don't see that the etymology of the word "paradox" contributes anything to an understanding of paradoxes. That said, in the upper right-hand corner of the article is a box with a link to the entry for "paradox" in Wiktionary, the free dictionary; and obviously Wiktionary's entry for the word gives its etymology. —RuakhTALK 13:39, 11 October 2007 (UTC)

Plural of "paradox"?
Would the plural of paradox be paradoces? —Preceding unsigned comment added by Mike.odonnell (talk • contribs) 15:56, 15 November 2007 (UTC)

We are an encyclopedia. You might be interested in the Wiktionary entry for the word “paradox”. —RuakhTALK 18:38, 15 November 2007 (UTC)

Philosophical Paradox
I find the article strong in the discussion of mathematics and debate, but weak in the subject of paradox as understood in humanities.
"The Tao that can be spoken of is not the absolute Tao," is a paradox. It's true, and it's even sensible, but you have to understand a few things in order to make sense of it.
Similarly, when Socrates says, "I know that I know nothing," and we call that wisdom, we are also relating with a paradox.
When someone says, "I'm mad, but I'm not mad," we have another paradox, though not of the same nature.
Then, there are paradoxes in expression and behavior. If someone says, "You should be more open-minded," we have a paradox, because the speaker is not considering the closed-minded position. And yet the phrase means something, and the person is not necessarily hypocritical -- the person may have just not taken the time out to explain, "Your clinging to this idea is harmful, and in this case, you should consider these other things, but not those other things." There is a cost to all expression, and when that cost cannot be paid, we must (must!) resort to simpler language, and inevitably, paradox.
There is one line in the text that alludes to this: "Paradoxes which are not based on a hidden error generally happen at the fringes of context or language, and require extending the context or language to lose their paradoxical quality."
Unfortunately, that sentence is followed by the example of the liar's paradox, and other mathematical-like paradoxes, and the subject of the noncommunicable and the boundaries of language, basically drowned out.
Mathematical paradox is interesting, but it seems to occupy way too much of the page. —Preceding unsigned comment added by LionKimbro (talk • contribs) 10:54, 3 February 2008 (UTC)
Genetic Paradox
This seems to have nothing to do with paradoxes but rather just a term in zoology. hi im bethany and i dont no if this passage is true!?!?!?!?!?
'All are liars' not a paradox?
The whole thing with Patrick Hughes and his "three laws" should be clarified with the statement that the example used does not lead to a contradiction and has a clear resolution. The resolution is just that the sentence "All cretans are liars." is false, but "Some Cretans are liars." is true. —Preceding unsigned comment added by 134.10.121.149 (talk) 09:00, 15 October 2008 (UTC)

I sort of agree with the previous anonymous: the Cretans example is not a very happy one, even if widely used, because it is not a logical paradox. If I say "All Italians are Liars", being myself Italian, I instantly prove that I'm a liar, thus solving the paradox and breaking self-reference. 147.122.5.205 (talk) 11:25, 23 January 2009 (UTC)




I think what this concern and the one before this (about non-mathematical paradoxes) are trying to distinguish mathematical paradoxes, or the problem of something being and not being at the same time, with something akin to logical or linguistic paradoxes. I realize that both of those adjectives are arguably different. I see this as having two explanations. (1) Language "allows" us to say all kind of illogical things: The blue ideas slept rapidly. (2) I can say something illogical and still be quite clearly understood by everyone I speak to: Nobody never helps me do my chores. Logically, I just said a double negative, which would simplify to: Everybody helps me do my chores. However, everyone knows what is meant: No one help me do my chores. Therefore, language isn't logical/mathematical, and I suppose there are paradoxes like what the concern above is hinting at and this "All Cretans are liars" paradox -- which are usually proved with strange sentences like, "If he's not lying, then he's lying."Mabsal (talk) 18:40, 13 December 2009 (UTC)








Well, here we have to distinguish your examples from illogical statements. One of them is an example of nonsense ('blue ideas') and the other is an example of poor grammar ('double negatives'). Only the third is an inconsistency ('If he's not lying, then he's lying'). There are indeed paradoxes which can be stated in words and have 'the problem of something being and not being at the same time'. Of course, they can be reduced to mathematical/predicate logic, but putting them into words helps understand the logical inconsistency.










The point the original poster makes it that "all Cretans are liars, said the Cretan" isn't one of these paradoxes. In fact, it is just a common mix up with the Liar paradox -- that's right, there is already an article which settles this discussion!










The Cretan example is doubly flawed. Firstly, a liar might repeatedly lie but does not necessarily always lie whenever they speak. And while the oft-quoted "Everything I say is a lie" and "Everything I say is false" do not have this particular mistake, they are still not paradoxical. The assumption is that we get into a contradictory loop of reasoning: "If everything he says is false, then the statement must itself be false. But then not everything he says is false and so his statement is true, which means everything he says is false...". But this is faulty reasoning -- it does not follow that his statement is true just because not everything he says it false. You'll see this is essentially the same flaw the original poster points out. Put semi-formally, these paradoxes are based on a fallacy; that a false universal statement implies the opposite universal statement is true, when in fact it only implies that there exists at least one counter example.










A correct (and, if you ask me, much more entertaining) example is the Barber paradox created by Bertrand Russell. Quoting the wiki entry "Suppose there is a town with just one male barber; and that every man in the town keeps himself clean-shaven: some by shaving themselves, some by attending the barber. It seems reasonable to imagine that the barber obeys the following rule: He shaves all and only those men in town who do not shave themselves... Does the barber shave himself?" It is uncontroversial that Russell's statement is logically unsatisfiable, as is the true Liar paradox ("A man says that he is lying. Is what he says true or false?").










Consequently, I'm goint to replace the example with both of these. This is an opportunity both to correct a mistake and wikify. Hurray! Robnpov (talk) 17:24, 5 March 2010 (UTC)





"Surgeon Paradox"
I'm not convinced that the source of the bias in the "I cannot operate on my son" scenario is based on a stereotype of male surgeons. I remember hearing something similar when I was in grade school, that went something like this:

A big Indian and a little Indian are walking down a path. The little Indian is the big Indian's son, but the big Indian is not the little Indian's father. What is their relationship?

Of course, the "big Indian" is the "little Indian's" mother, but apparently that conclusion was not expected to be obvious. I suppose that "big" might bring to mind "male" more readily than "female," but I always thought that it had more to do with a bias of associating fathers with sons, and mothers with daughters. I am inclined to think that may be more of a factor than the bias of male-gendered surgeons. (By the way, if memory serves, "Indian" was the noun; I don't know if it referred to Native Americans or inhabitants of India.) Any thoughts? Uranographer (talk) 10:55, 15 November 2008 (UTC)

I loved the surgeon pseudo-paradox. It makes me feel confuse and then happy. - 201.69.46.68 (talk) 10:50, 15 February 2009 (UTC)

Universe annihilation "bomb"
I saw this:
"Under the 'traditional' definition of a paradox, the Grandfather Paradox (and other similar situations) are typically thought to cause spacetime to rip itself apart under the strain of attempting to resolve an 'unresolvable' conclusion (ie, the time traveller killed his grandfather, therefore the time traveller wouldn't be born, therefore his grandfather could not have been killed, therefore he (and the time traveller) are still alive - and so on)."
Which would suggest any time machine would be a universe-destroying bomb. But where does this come from? I just thought paradoxes simply can not happen, so then nothing "rips apart" -- rather nothing can happen. Under the "traditional" definition, this would just say that time travel must not be possible. mike4ty4 (talk) 06:10, 22 November 2008 (UTC)
Koan
Shouldn't the use of paradoxes in koans be mentioned? Paradoctor (talk) 21:21, 14 May 2009 (UTC)
Unexpected hanging paradox
the following line in the article is not correct:
"the Unexpected hanging paradox, which fallaciously asserts that an unexpected hanging can never occur through false regression"
The unexpected hanging paradox does not assert this at all. It asserts that, even though the prisoner knows that there exist certain days that he can be hanged on and he knows that there exists at least one day that he cant be hanged on, he cannot possibly know which day is the last day that he can be hanged on because if the he knows that day x is the last day that he can be hanged on then he knows that day x is not the last day that he can be hanged on. It is therefore unknowable (though it can probably be narrowed down to a few days). just-emery (talk) 00:08, 6 July 2009 (UTC)

Here is a couple of nice links on four value logic (true, false, unknown, unknowable):
http://www.orafaq.com/usenet/comp.databases.theory/2004/04/23/0957.htm
http://www.dbdebunk.com/page/page/1543772.htm
just-emery (talk) 00:33, 6 July 2009 (UTC)


And here is a wikipedia article on Four valued logic. just-emery (talk) 21:59, 6 July 2009 (UTC)

Geology
According the definition of a paradox as is a statement or group of statements that leads to a contradiction or a situation which defies intuition geological paradoxes should be part of the Lemma. sources are abundant. PS.: I erased "neither consistent with the biblical Genesis" with age of earth, however it's been the base of different controversies and had influence on theological aspects as well. A funny mystery is meteorite research, the french academy saw meteorites resp God throwing with stones as blunt dark age superstition, only after a rather big controversy about Ernst Florens Friedrich Chladni research it was slowly acceptet. BR --Polentario (talk) 02:59, 10 September 2009 (UTC)
New section "Religious philosophy"
If nobody objects, I'll start one. Don't know why I never noticed Catuṣkoṭi before, but I think there will be more such concepts in other religious traditions. Independent of that, references are needed for the classification of koans and catuskoti as paradoxes. Paradoctor (talk) 17:19, 27 September 2009 (UTC)
Revision request by Jarvisunit
Jarvisunit, you seem to think that this article needs improvements. You are right. That's why the WikiProject Philosophy assessed this article as C-Class. If you have specific points, please make them here. Regards, Paradoctor (talk) 00:51, 11 November 2009 (UTC)
Proposal to merge Paradoxology
Apart from the dictionary definition, paradoxology only mentions Derrida as an example, and an alternate, probably non-notable definition in the Bard/Söderqvist book. Smarandache is about paradoxism, not paradoxology. Notability is doubtful, Paradox is short, so merging and redirecting seems like the right thing to do. Paradoctor (talk) 20:30, 19 November 2009 (UTC)

Disagree, paradoxology is an article in need of being transferred from wikipedia to wiktionary, its contents are those of a definition, and should thus be moved to a wiktionary defenition.--User:none 5:37, 15 August 2011 — Preceding unsigned comment added by 41.138.228.217 (talk)
Agree--Intelati (talk) 05:15, 12 January 2010 (UTC)
Agree--1215drew (talk) 03:25, 14 May 2010 (UTC)
Agree--Sexyfunkymonkie (talk) 22:13, 3 June 2010 (UTC)
Agree--Alwhorl (talk) 02:36, 13 August 2010 (UTC)
I don't see any objection to merging, as long as a redirection from paradoxology to paradox is established; it is no big deal. JonRichfield (talk) 18:22, 22 April 2011 (UTC)
Agree with JonRichfield--Cymbop (talk) 04:20, 4 August 2011 (UTC)
Agree --Addihockey10 e-mail 15:31, 5 August 2011 (UTC)


 Done Beeblebrox (talk) 18:54, 26 September 2011 (UTC)

Vicious Circles and Infinity by Patrick Hughes and George Brecht
The first two paragraphs from page 1:

The literature about paradoxes is marred by persistent attempts to explain the paradoxes away. Our intention here is a more modest, descriptive one. Using several examples of propositions approaching the paradoxical state, we will attempt to show what conditions go for the making of a logical paradox. Often consideration of a poor example, by virtue of its imperfection, tells one more than consideration of a prime example, in its perfection. For us, all the paradoxes in this book add up to a definition of what a paradox is.
The three terms of description (or condition) of a logical paradox most often used are self-reference, contradiction, and vicious circle.

I'd say "laws" is too strong. As regards the expertise of the authors, don't get sidetracked by the fact that they are mostly known as artists. Hughes has studied paradoxes and contradictions for decades, and the references listed in the book reflect this. Regards, Paradoctor (talk) 01:43, 1 December 2009 (UTC)
Paradoxes in economics and public policy
Paradoxically, at least according to certain free market advocates, imposing a minimum wage (or raising the rate of an existing minimum wage) tends to hurt the very people that such a law is intended to help. It causes a barrier to entry for unskilled (typically young, e.g., teenage) workers.
Another paradox, equally controversial, is the effect of gun control laws. Intended to reduce violent crime and accidental deaths - particularly among "children" (often defined as people as old as 25) - the laws typically result in an immediate and permanent increase in violent crime. Law-abiding citizens give up their weapons and find themselves at the mercy of outlaws.
The question for us, considering that there is a hotly disputed controversy over the statistics of these issues, is how to describe the purported paradox. Can we say that according to some [and we specify these sources] laws like these backfire?
If so, is Paradox the right place for this information, or perhaps an article such as Unintended consequences? --Uncle Ed (talk) 16:34, 4 April 2010 (UTC)

Kind of hard to tell without actual sources. ;)
"how to describe the purported paradox": If it doesn't at least contain the word "paradox", it's not about a paradox. Everything else would be WP:OR. With paradoxes in general, utmost care needs to be taken when reformulating, you very quickly end up misrepresenting the source. Paradoctor (talk) 17:51, 4 April 2010 (UTC)




This page is an archive. Do not edit the contents of this page. Please direct any additional comments to the current talk page.






 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Talk:Paradox/Archive_1&oldid=452566151"					
 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage information 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages









 This page was last edited on 26 September 2011, at 18:59.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









List of paradoxes - Wikipedia





















 






List of paradoxes

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Economic paradox)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This is a list of paradoxes, grouped thematically. The grouping is approximate, as paradoxes may fit into more than one category. Because of varying definitions of the term paradox, some of the following are not considered to be paradoxes by everyone. This list collects only scenarios that have been called a paradox by at least one source and have their own article.
Although considered paradoxes, some of these are based on fallacious reasoning, or incomplete/faulty analysis. Informally, the term is often used to describe a counter-intuitive result.



Contents


1 Logic

1.1 Self-reference
1.2 Vagueness


2 Mathematics

2.1 Statistics
2.2 Probability
2.3 Infinity and infinitesimals
2.4 Geometry and topology


3 Decision theory
4 Physics

4.1 Astrophysics
4.2 Classical mechanics
4.3 Cosmology
4.4 Electromagnetism
4.5 Quantum mechanics
4.6 Relativity
4.7 Thermodynamics


5 Biology

5.1 Health and nutrition


6 Chemistry
7 Time travel
8 Linguistics and artificial intelligence
9 Philosophy
10 Mysticism
11 Economics
12 Perception
13 Politics
14 Psychology and sociology
15 Miscellaneous
16 See also
17 Notes



Logic[edit]

Barbershop paradox: The supposition that if one of two simultaneous assumptions leads to a contradiction, the other assumption is also disproved leads to paradoxical consequences. Not to be confused with the Barber paradox.
What the Tortoise Said to Achilles: "Whatever Logic is good enough to tell me is worth writing down...", also known as Carroll's paradox, not to be confused with the "Achilles and the tortoise" paradox by Zeno of Elea.
Catch-22: A situation in which someone is in need of something that can only be had by not being in need of it. A soldier who wants to be declared insane in order to avoid combat is deemed not insane for that very reason, and will therefore not be declared insane.
Drinker paradox: In any pub there is a customer of whom it is true to say: if that customer drinks, everybody in the pub drinks.
Paradox of entailment: Inconsistent premises always make an argument valid.
Lottery paradox: If there is one winning ticket in a large lottery, it is reasonable to believe of any particular lottery ticket that it is not the winning ticket, but it is not reasonable to believe that no lottery ticket will win.
Raven paradox: (or Hempel's Ravens): Observing a green apple increases the likelihood of all ravens being black.
Ross' paradox: Disjunction introduction poses a problem for imperative inference by seemingly permitting arbitrary imperatives to be inferred.
Unexpected hanging paradox: The day of the hanging will be a surprise, so it cannot happen at all, so it will be a surprise. The surprise examination and Bottle Imp paradox use similar logic.

Self-reference[edit]
These paradoxes have in common a contradiction arising from either self-reference or circular reference, in which several statements refer to each other in a way that following some of the references leads back to the starting point.

Barber paradox: A barber (who is a man) shaves all and only those men who do not shave themselves. Does he shave himself? (Russell's popularization of his set theoretic paradox.)
Bhartrhari's paradox: The thesis that there are some things which are unnameable conflicts with the notion that something is named by calling it unnameable.
Berry paradox: The phrase "the first number not nameable in under ten words" appears to name it in nine words.
Crocodile dilemma: If a crocodile steals a child and promises its return if the father can correctly guess exactly what the crocodile will do, how should the crocodile respond in the case that the father guesses that the child will not be returned?
Paradox of the Court: A law student agrees to pay his teacher after (and only after) winning his first case. The teacher then sues the student (who has not yet won a case) for payment.
Curry's paradox: "If this sentence is true, then Santa Claus exists."
Epimenides paradox: A Cretan says: "All Cretans are liars". This paradox works in mainly the same way as the Liar paradox.
Grelling–Nelson paradox: Is the word "heterological", meaning "not applicable to itself", a heterological word? (Another close relative of Russell's paradox.)
Kleene–Rosser paradox: By formulating an equivalent to Richard's paradox, untyped lambda calculus is shown to be inconsistent.
Liar paradox: "This sentence is false." This is the canonical self-referential paradox. Also "Is the answer to this question 'no'?", and "I'm lying."

Card paradox: "The next statement is true. The previous statement is false." A variant of the liar paradox that does not use self-reference.
Pinocchio paradox: What would happen if Pinocchio said "My nose will be growing"?[1]
Quine's paradox: "'Yields a falsehood when appended to its own quotation' yields a falsehood when appended to its own quotation." Shows that a sentence can be paradoxical even if it is not self-referring and does not use demonstratives or indexicals.
Yablo's paradox: An ordered infinite sequence of sentences, each of which says that all following sentences are false. While constructed to avoid self-reference, there is no consensus whether it relies on self-reference or not.


Opposite Day: "It is opposite day today." Therefore, it is not opposite day, but if you say it is a normal day it would be considered a normal day.
Petronius' paradox: "Moderation in all things, including moderation" (unsourced quotation sometimes attributed to Petronius).
Richard's paradox: We appear to be able to use simple English to define a decimal expansion in a way that is self-contradictory.
Russell's paradox: Does the set of all those sets that do not contain themselves contain itself?
Socratic paradox: "All I know is that I know nothing."

Vagueness[edit]

Ship of Theseus: It seems like you can replace any component of a ship, and it is still the same ship. So you can replace them all, one at a time, and it is still the same ship. However, you can then take all the original pieces, and assemble them into a ship. That, too, is the same ship you began with.


See also List of Ship of Theseus examples


Sorites paradox (also known as the paradox of the heap): If you remove a single grain of sand from a heap, you still have a heap. Keep removing single grains, and the heap will disappear. Can a single grain of sand make the difference between heap and non-heap?

Mathematics[edit]
See also: Category:Mathematics paradoxes and Paradoxes of set theory

All horses are the same color: A proof by induction that all horses have the same color.
Ant on a rubber rope: An ant crawling on a rubber rope can reach the end even when the rope stretches much faster than the ant can crawl.
Cramer's paradox: The number of points of intersection of two higher-order curves can be greater than the number of arbitrary points needed to define one such curve.
Elevator paradox: Elevators can seem to be mostly going in one direction, as if they were being manufactured in the middle of the building and being disassembled on the roof and basement.
Interesting number paradox: The first number that can be considered "dull" rather than "interesting" becomes interesting because of that fact.
Potato paradox: If you let potatoes consisting of 99% water dry so that they are 98% water, they lose 50% of their weight.
Russell's paradox: Does the set of all those sets that do not contain themselves contain itself?

Statistics[edit]
See also: Category:Statistical paradoxes

Abelson's paradox: Effect size may not be indicative of practical meaning.
Accuracy paradox: Predictive models with a given level of accuracy may have greater predictive power than models with higher accuracy.
Berkson's paradox: A complicating factor arising in statistical tests of proportions.
Freedman's paradox: Describes a problem in model selection where predictor variables with no explanatory power can appear artificially important.
Friendship paradox: For almost everyone, their friends have more friends than they do.
Inspection paradox: Why one will wait longer for a bus than one should.
Lindley's paradox: Tiny errors in the null hypothesis are magnified when large data sets are analyzed, leading to false but highly statistically significant results.
Low birth weight paradox: Low birth weight and mothers who smoke contribute to a higher mortality rate. Babies of smokers have lower average birth weight, but low birth weight babies born to smokers have a lower mortality rate than other low birth weight babies. This is a special case of Simpson's paradox.
Simpson's paradox, or the Yule–Simpson effect: A trend that appears in different groups of data disappears when these groups are combined, and the reverse trend appears for the aggregate data.
Will Rogers phenomenon: The mathematical concept of an average, whether defined as the mean or median, leads to apparently paradoxical results—for example, it is possible that moving an entry from an encyclopedia to a dictionary would increase the average entry length on both books.

Probability[edit]




The Monty Hall problem: which door do you choose?


See also: Category:Probability theory paradoxes

Bertrand's box paradox: A paradox of conditional probability closely related to the Boy or Girl paradox.
Bertrand's paradox: Different common-sense definitions of randomness give quite different results.
Birthday paradox: What is the chance that two people in a room have the same birthday?
Borel's paradox: Conditional probability density functions are not invariant under coordinate transformations.
Boy or Girl paradox: A two-child family has at least one boy. What is the probability that it has a girl?
Dartboard Puzzle: If a dart is guaranteed to hit a dartboard and the probability of hitting a specific point is positive, adding the infinitely many positive chances yields infinity, but the chance of hitting the dartboard is one. If the probability of hitting each point is zero, the probability of hitting anywhere on the dartboard is zero.[2]
False positive paradox: A test that is accurate the vast majority of the time could show you have a disease, but the probability that you actually have it could still be tiny.
Grice's paradox: Shows that the exact meaning of statements involving conditionals and probabilities is more complicated than may be obvious on casual examination.
Monty Hall problem: An unintuitive consequence of conditional probability.
Necktie paradox: A wager between two people seems to favour them both. Very similar in essence to the Two-envelope paradox.
Nontransitive dice: You can have three dice, called A, B, and C, such that A is likely to win in a roll against B, B is likely to win in a roll against C, and C is likely to win in a roll against A.
Proebsting's paradox: The Kelly criterion is an often optimal strategy for maximizing profit in the long run. Proebsting's paradox apparently shows that the Kelly criterion can lead to ruin.
Sleeping Beauty problem: A probability problem that can be correctly answered as one half or one third depending on how the question is approached.
Three cards problem: When pulling a random card, how do you determine the color of the underside?
Three Prisoners problem: A variation of the Monty Hall problem.
Two-envelope paradox: You are given two indistinguishable envelopes, each of which contains a positive sum of money. One envelope contains twice as much as the other. You may pick one envelope and keep whatever amount it contains. You pick one envelope at random but before you open it you are given the chance to take the other envelope instead.

Infinity and infinitesimals[edit]

Burali-Forti paradox: If the ordinal numbers formed a set, it would be an ordinal number that is smaller than itself.
Cantor's paradox: The set of all sets would have its own power set as a subset, therefore its cardinality would be at least as great as that of its power set. But Cantor's theorem proves that power sets are strictly greater than the sets they are constructed from. Consequently, the set of all sets would contain a subset greater than itself.
Galileo's paradox: Though most numbers are not squares, there are no more numbers than squares. (See also Cantor's diagonal argument)
Hilbert's paradox of the Grand Hotel: If a hotel with infinitely many rooms is full, it can still take in more guests.
Russell's paradox: Does the set of all those sets that do not contain themselves contain itself?
Skolem's paradox: Countably infinite models of set theory contain uncountably infinite sets.
Zeno's paradoxes: "You will never reach point B from point A as you must always get half-way there, and half of the half, and half of that half, and so on." (This is also a physical paradox.)
Supertasks may result in paradoxes such as




Benardete's paradox: Apparently, a man can be "forced to stay where he is by the mere unfulfilled intentions of the gods".
Grandi's series: The sum of 1-1+1-1+1-1... can be either one, zero, or one-half.
Ross–Littlewood paradox: After alternately adding and removing balls to a vase infinitely often, how many balls remain?
Thomson's lamp: After flicking a lamp on and off infinitely often, is it on or off?



Geometry and topology[edit]




The Banach–Tarski paradox: A ball can be decomposed and reassembled into two balls the same size as the original.



Banach–Tarski paradox: Cut a ball into a finite number of pieces and re-assemble the pieces to get two balls, each of equal size to the first. The von Neumann paradox is a two-dimensional analogue.

Paradoxical set: A set that can be partitioned into two sets, each of which is equivalent to the original.


Coastline paradox: the perimeter of a landmass is in general ill-defined.
Coin rotation paradox: a coin rotating along the edge of an identical coin will make a full revolution after traversing only half of the stationary coin's circumference.
Gabriel's Horn: or Torricelli's trumpet: A simple object with finite volume but infinite surface area. Also, the Mandelbrot set and various other fractals are covered by a finite area, but have an infinite perimeter (in fact, there are no two distinct points on the boundary of the Mandelbrot set that can be reached from one another by moving a finite distance along that boundary, which also implies that in a sense you go no further if you walk "the wrong way" around the set to reach a nearby point). This can be represented by a Klein bottle.
Hausdorff paradox: There exists a countable subset C of the sphere S such that S\C is equidecomposable with two copies of itself.
Nikodym set: A set contained in and with the same Lebesgue measure as the unit square, yet for every one of its points there is a straight line intersecting the Nikodym set only in that point.
Sphere eversion: A sphere can, topologically, be turned inside out.

Decision theory[edit]

Abilene paradox: People can make decisions based not on what they actually want to do, but on what they think that other people want to do, with the result that everybody decides to do something that nobody really wants to do, but only what they thought that everybody else wanted to do.
Apportionment paradox: Some systems of apportioning representation can have unintuitive results due to rounding

Alabama paradox: Increasing the total number of seats might shrink one block's seats.
New states paradox: Adding a new state or voting block might increase the number of votes of another.
Population paradox: A fast-growing state can lose votes to a slow-growing state.


Arrow's paradox: Given more than two choices, no system can have all the attributes of an ideal voting system at once.
Buridan's ass: How can a rational choice be made between two outcomes of equal value?
Chainstore paradox: Even those who know better play the so-called chain store game in an irrational manner.
Decision-making paradox: Selecting the best decision-making method is a decision problem in itself.
Fenno's paradox: The belief that people generally disapprove of the United States Congress as a whole, but support the Congressman from their own Congressional district.
Fredkin's paradox: The more similar two choices are, the more time a decision-making agent spends on deciding.
Green paradox: Policies intending to reduce future CO2 emissions may lead to increased emissions in the present.
Hedgehog's dilemma: or Lover's paradox Despite goodwill, human intimacy cannot occur without substantial mutual harm.
Inventor's paradox: It is easier to solve a more general problem that covers the specifics of the sought-after solution.
Kavka's toxin puzzle: Can one intend to drink the non-deadly toxin, if the intention is the only thing needed to get the reward?
Morton's fork: Choosing between unpalatable alternatives.
Navigation paradox: Increased navigational precision may result in increased collision risk.
Newcomb's paradox: How do you play a game against an omniscient opponent?
Paradox of tolerance: Should one tolerate intolerance if intolerance would destroy the possibility of tolerance?
Paradox of voting: Also known as the Downs paradox. For a rational, self-interested voter the costs of voting will normally exceed the expected benefits, so why do people keep voting?
Parrondo's paradox: It is possible to play two losing games alternately to eventually win.
Prevention paradox: For one person to benefit, many people have to change their behavior — even though they receive no benefit, or even suffer, from the change.
Prisoner's dilemma: Two people might not cooperate even if it is in both their best interests to do so.
Voting paradox: Also known as Condorcet's paradox and paradox of voting. A group of separately rational individuals may have preferences that are irrational in the aggregate.
Willpower paradox: Those who kept their minds open were more goal-directed and more motivated than those who declared their objective to themselves.

Physics[edit]
For more details on this topic, see Physical paradox.


Play media


A demonstration of the tea leaf paradox



Cool tropics paradox: A contradiction between modelled estimates of tropical temperatures during warm, ice-free periods of the Cretaceous and Eocene, and the lower temperatures that proxies suggest were present.
Irresistible force paradox: What would happen if an unstoppable force hit an immovable object?
Paradox of Place: If everything that exist has a place, that place must have a place, and so on ad infinitum.
Paradox of the grain of millet: When a grain of millet falls it makes no sound, but when a thousand grains fall they do, thus many of nothing become something.
The Moving Rows

Astrophysics[edit]

Algol paradox: In some binaries the partners seem to have different ages, even though they are thought to have formed at the same time.
Faint young Sun paradox: The contradiction between existence of liquid water early in the Earth's history and the expectation that the output of the young Sun would have been insufficient to melt ice on Earth.
GZK paradox: Extreme-energy cosmic rays have been observed that seem to violate the Greisen–Zatsepin–Kuzmin limit, which is a consequence of special relativity.
Paradox of youth: Compared to theory, there is an overabundance of young stars close to the supermassive black hole in the Galactic Center.

Classical mechanics[edit]

Achilles and the tortoise: If the tortoise is ahead of achilles, by the time Achilles reaches the tortoise's current position, the tortoise will have moved a bit further ahead, which goes on indefinitely.
Archer's paradox: An archer must, in order to hit his target, not aim directly at it, but slightly to the side. Not to be confused with the arrow paradox.
Arrow paradox If we divide time into discrete 0-duration slices, no motion is happening in each of them, so taking them all as a whole, motion is impossible.
Hydrostatic paradox: A massive battleship can float in a few litres of water.
Aristotle's wheel paradox: Rolling joined concentric wheels seem to trace the same distance with their circumferences, even though the circumferences are different.
Carroll's paradox: The angular momentum of a stick should be zero, but is not.
D'Alembert's paradox: Flow of an inviscid fluid produces no net force on a solid body.
Knudsen paradox: Based on the Navier–Stokes equations, one would expect the mass flux in a channel to decrease with increasing Knudsen number, but there is a distinct minimum around Knudsen number 0.8.
Denny's paradox: Surface-dwelling arthropods (such as the water strider) should not be able to propel themselves horizontally.
Dichotomy paradox: To reach its target, an airborne arrow must first reach an infinite number of midpoints between its current position and the target.
Elevator paradox: Even though hydrometers are used to measure fluid density, a hydrometer will not indicate changes of fluid density caused by changing atmospheric pressure.
Feynman sprinkler: Which way does a sprinkler rotate when submerged in a tank and made to suck in the surrounding fluid?
Painlevé paradox: Rigid-body dynamics with contact and friction is inconsistent.
Tea leaf paradox: When a cup of tea is stirred, the leaves assemble in the center, even though centrifugal force pushes them outward.
Upstream contamination: When a fluid is poured from a higher container onto a lower one, particles can climb up the falling water.

Cosmology[edit]

Bentley's paradox: In a Newtonian universe, gravitation should pull all matter into a single point.
Boltzmann brain: If the universe we observe resulted from a random thermodynamic fluctuation, it would be vastly more likely to be a simple one than the complex one we observe. The simplest case would be just a brain floating in vacuum, having the thoughts and sensations you have.
Fermi paradox: If there are, as various arguments suggest, many other sentient species in the Universe, then where are they? Shouldn't their presence be obvious?
Heat death paradox: If the universe was infinitely old, it would be in thermodynamical equilibrium, which contradicts what we observe.
Olbers' paradox: Why is the night sky dark if there is an infinity of stars, covering every part of the celestial sphere?

Electromagnetism[edit]

Faraday paradox: An apparent violation of Faraday's law of electromagnetic induction.

Quantum mechanics[edit]

Aharonov–Bohm effect: a charged particle is affected by an electromagnetic field even though it has no local contact with that field
Bell's theorem: Why do measured quantum particles not satisfy mathematical probability theory?
Double-slit experiment: Matter and energy can act as a wave or as a particle depending on the experiment.
Einstein–Podolsky–Rosen paradox: Can far away events influence each other in quantum mechanics?
Extinction paradox: In the small wavelength limit, the total scattering cross section of an impenetrable sphere is twice its geometrical cross-sectional area (which is the value obtained in classical mechanics).[3]
Hardy's paradox: How can we make inferences about past events that we haven't observed while at the same time acknowledge that the act of observing it affects the reality we are inferring to?
Klein paradox: When the potential of a potential barrier becomes similar to the mass of the impinging particle, it becomes transparent.
Mott problem: Spherically symmetric wave functions, when observed, produce linear particle tracks.
Quantum LC circuit paradox: Energies stored on capacitance and inductance are not equal to the ground state energy of the quantum oscillator.[citation needed]
Quantum pseudo-telepathy: Two players who can not communicate accomplish tasks that seemingly require direct contact.
Quantum Zeno effect: (Turing paradox) echoing the Zeno paradox, a quantum particle that is continuously observed cannot change its state
Schrödinger's cat paradox: According to the Copenhagen interpretation of quantum mechanics, a cat could be simultaneously alive and dead, as long as it remains unobserved.
Uncertainty principle: Attempts to determine position must disturb momentum, and vice versa.

Relativity[edit]

Bell's spaceship paradox: concerning relativity.
Black hole information paradox: Black holes violate a commonly assumed tenet of science that information cannot be destroyed.
Ehrenfest paradox: On the kinematics of a rigid rotating disk.
Ladder paradox: A classic relativity problem.
Mocanu's velocity composition paradox: a paradox in special relativity.
Supplee's paradox: the buoyancy of a relativistic object (such as a bullet) appears to change when the reference frame is changed from one in which the bullet is at rest to one in which the fluid is at rest.
Trouton-Noble or Right-angle lever paradox: Does a torque arise in static systems when changing frames?
Twin paradox: The theory of relativity predicts that a person making a round trip will return younger than his or her identical twin who stayed at home.

Thermodynamics[edit]

Gibbs paradox: In an ideal gas, is entropy an extensive variable?
Loschmidt's paradox: Why is there an inevitable increase in entropy when the laws of physics are invariant under time reversal? The time reversal symmetry of physical laws appears to contradict the second law of thermodynamics.
Maxwell's demon: The second law of thermodynamics seems to be violated by a cleverly operated trapdoor.[4]
Mpemba effect: Hot water can, under certain conditions, freeze faster than cold water, even though it must pass the lower temperature on the way to freezing.
Duncan's Paradox: Gas-surface reactions create either steady-state temperature or pressure differentials that can be used in perpetual motion machines.[5][6]


Schmidt's Paradox (In Russian): – the contradiction (discovered in 1917) between the observed vertical turbulent heat flux in the surface layer and the theory of heat conduction in the atmosphere .

Biology[edit]

Antarctic paradox: In some areas of the oceans, phytoplankton concentrations are low despite there apparently being sufficient nutrients.
C-value enigma: Genome size does not correlate with organismal complexity. For example, some unicellular organisms have genomes much larger than that of humans.
Cole's paradox: Even a tiny fecundity advantage of one additional offspring would favor the evolution of semelparity.
Gray's paradox: Despite their relatively small muscle mass, dolphins can swim at high speeds and obtain large accelerations.
Hormesis: Exposure to small doses of toxins can have beneficial effects.
Lek paradox: Persistent female choice for particular male trait values should erode genetic variance in male traits and thereby remove the benefits of choice, yet choice persists.
Lombard's paradox: When rising to stand from a sitting or squatting position, both the hamstrings and quadriceps contract at the same time, despite their being antagonists to each other.
Paradox of enrichment: Increasing the food available to an ecosystem may lead to instability, and even to extinction.
Paradox of the pesticides: Applying pesticide to a pest may increase the pest's abundance.
Paradox of the plankton: Why are there so many different species of phytoplankton, even though competition for the same resources tends to reduce the number of species?
Sherman paradox: An anomalous pattern of inheritance in the fragile X syndrome.
Temporal paradox (paleontology): When did the ancestors of birds live?

Health and nutrition[edit]

French paradox: The observation that the French suffer a relatively low incidence of coronary heart disease, despite having a diet relatively rich in saturated fats, which are assumed to be the leading dietary cause of such disease.
Glucose paradox: The large amount of glycogen in the liver cannot be explained by its small glucose absorption.
Hispanic paradox: The finding that Hispanics in the United States tend to have substantially better health than the average population in spite of what their aggregate socio-economic indicators predict.
Israeli paradox: The observation that Israelis suffer a relatively high incidence of coronary heart disease, despite having a diet very low in saturated fats, which are assumed to be the leading dietary cause of such disease.
Meditation paradox: The amplitude of heart rate oscillations during meditation was significantly greater than in the pre-meditation control state and also in three non-meditation control groups[7]
Mexican paradox: Mexican children tend to have higher birth weights than can be expected from their socio-economic status.
Obesity survival paradox: Although the negative health consequences of obesity in the general population are well supported by the available evidence, health outcomes in certain subgroups seem to be improved at an increased BMI.
Peto's paradox: Humans and other small-to-medium-sized mammals get cancer with high frequency, while larger mammals, like whales, do not. If cancer is essentially a negative outcome lottery at the cell level, and larger organisms have more cells, and thus more potentially cancerous cell divisions, one would expect larger organisms to be more predisposed to cancer.
Pulsus paradoxus: A pulsus paradoxus is an exaggerated decrease in systolic blood pressure during inspiration. It can indicate certain medical conditions in which there is reduced cardiac output, such as cardiac tamponade or constrictive pericarditis. Also known as the Pulse Paradox.[8]
Second wind: The "second wind" is a sudden period of increased wakefulness in individuals deprived of sleep that tends to coincide with the individual's circadian rhythm. Although the individual is more wakeful and aware of their surroundings, they are continuing to accrue sleep debt and thus, are actually exacerbating their sleep deprivation.

Chemistry[edit]

Faraday paradox (electrochemistry): Diluted nitric acid will corrode steel, while concentrated nitric acid will not.
Levinthal paradox: The length of time that it takes for a protein chain to find its folded state is many orders of magnitude shorter than it would be if it freely searched all possible configurations.
SAR paradox: Exceptions to the principle that a small change in a molecule causes a small change in its chemical behaviour are frequently profound.

Time travel[edit]

Bootstrap paradox, (also ontological paradox) Can a time traveler send himself information with no outside source?
Polchinski's paradox: A billiard ball can be thrown into a wormhole in such a way that it would emerge in the past and knock its incoming past self away from the wormhole entrance, creating a variant of the grandfather paradox.
Predestination paradox: A man travels back in time to discover the cause of a famous fire. While in the building where the fire started, he accidentally knocks over a kerosene lantern and causes a fire, the same fire that would inspire him, years later, to travel back in time. The bootstrap paradox is closely tied to this, in which, as a result of time travel, information or objects appear to have no beginning.
Temporal paradox: What happens when a time traveler does things in the past that prevent him from doing them in the first place?




Grandfather paradox: You travel back in time and kill your grandfather before he conceives one of your parents, which precludes your own conception and, therefore, you couldn't go back in time and kill your grandfather.
Hitler's murder paradox: You travel back in time and kill a famous person in history before they become famous; but if the person had never been famous, then he could not have been targeted as a famous person.



Linguistics and artificial intelligence[edit]

Bracketing paradox: Is a "historical linguist" a linguist who is historical, or someone who studies "historical linguistics"?
Code-talker paradox: How can a language both enable communication and block communication?
Moravec's paradox: Logical thought is hard for humans and easy for computers, but picking a screw from a box of screws is an unsolved problem.
Movement paradox: In transformational linguistics, there are pairs of sentences in which the sentence without movement is ungrammatical while the sentence with movement is not.
Sayre's paradox: In automated handwriting recognition, a cursively written word cannot be recognized without being segmented and cannot be segmented without being recognized.

Philosophy[edit]

Paradox of analysis: It seems that no conceptual analysis can meet the requirements both of correctness and of informativeness.
Buridan's bridge: Will Plato throw Socrates into the water or not?
Paradox of fiction: How can people experience strong emotions from purely fictional things?
Fitch's paradox: If all truths are knowable, then all truths must in fact be known.
Paradox of free will: If God knows in advance how we will decide, how can there be free will?
Goodman's paradox: Why can induction be used to confirm that things are "green", but not to confirm that things are "grue"?
Paradox of hedonism: When one pursues happiness itself, one is miserable; but, when one pursues something else, one achieves happiness.
Hutton's Paradox: If asking oneself "Am I dreaming?" in a dream proves that one is, what does it prove in waking life?
Liberal paradox: "Minimal Liberty" is incompatible with Pareto optimality.
Meno's paradox: (Learner's paradox) A man cannot search either for what he knows or for what he does not know.
Mere addition paradox: (Parfit's paradox) Is a large population living a barely tolerable life better than a small, happy population?
Moore's paradox: "It's raining, but I don't believe that it is."
Newcomb's paradox: A paradoxical game between two players, one of whom can predict the actions of the other.
Paradox of nihilism: Several distinct paradoxes share this name.
Omnipotence paradox: Can an omnipotent being create a rock too heavy for itself to lift?
Preface paradox: The author of a book may be justified in believing that all his statements in the book are correct, at the same time believing that at least one of them is incorrect.
Problem of evil: (Epicurean paradox) The existence of evil seems to be incompatible with the existence of an omnipotent, omniscient, and morally perfect God.
Rule-following paradox: Even though rules are intended to determine actions, "no course of action could be determined by a rule, because any course of action can be made out to accord with the rule".
When a white horse is not a horse: White horses are not horses because white and horse refer to different things.
Zeno's paradoxes: "You will never reach point B from point A as you must always get half-way there, and half of the half, and half of that half, and so on ..." (This is also a paradox of the infinite)

Mysticism[edit]

Maya_(illusion): Our illusions are not real, yet it's real that illusion itself exists.


Tzimtzum: In Kabbalah, how to reconcile self-awareness of finite Creation with Infinite Divine source, as an emanated causal chain would seemingly nullify existence. Luria's initial withdrawal of God in Hasidic panentheism involves simultaneous illusionism of Creation (Upper Unity) and self-aware existence (Lower Unity), God encompassing logical opposites.

Economics[edit]
See also: Category:Economics paradoxes
One class of paradoxes in economics are the paradoxes of competition, in which behavior that benefits a lone actor would leave everyone worse off if everyone did the same. These paradoxes are classified into circuit, classical and Marx paradoxes.

Allais paradox: A change in a possible outcome that is shared by different alternatives affects people's choices among those alternatives, in contradiction with expected utility theory.
The Antitrust Paradox:[dubious – discuss]: A book arguing that antitrust enforcement artificially raised prices by protecting inefficient competitors from competition.
Arrow information paradox: To sell information you need to give it away before the sale.
Bertrand paradox: Two players reaching a state of Nash equilibrium both find themselves with no profits gained via exploitation.
Braess' paradox: Adding extra capacity to a network can reduce overall performance.
Deaton paradox: Consumption varies surprisingly smoothly despite sharp variations in income.
Demographic-economic paradox: nations or subpopulations with higher GDP per capita are observed to have fewer children, even though a richer population can support more children.
Downs–Thomson paradox: Increasing road capacity at the expense of investments in public transport can make overall congestion on the road worse.
Easterlin paradox: For countries with income sufficient to meet basic needs, the reported level of happiness does not correlate with national income per person.
Edgeworth paradox: With capacity constraints, there may not be an equilibrium.
Ellsberg paradox: People exhibit ambiguity aversion (as distinct from risk aversion), in contradiction with expected utility theory.
European paradox: The perceived failure of European countries to translate scientific advances into marketable innovations.
Gibson's paradox: Why were interest rates and prices correlated?
Giffen paradox: Increasing the price of bread makes poor people eat more of it.
Grossman-Stiglitz paradox: Inability to recoup cost of obtaining market information implies efficient markets cannot exist.
Icarus paradox: Some businesses bring about their own downfall through their own successes.
Jevons paradox: Increases in efficiency lead to even larger increases in demand.
Leontief paradox: Some countries export labor-intensive commodities and import capital-intensive commodities, in contradiction with the Heckscher–Ohlin theorem.
Lucas paradox: Capital is not flowing from developed countries to developing countries despite the fact that developing countries have lower levels of capital per worker, and therefore higher returns to capital.
Mandeville's paradox: Actions that may be vicious to individuals may benefit society as a whole.
Mayfield's paradox: Keeping everyone out of an information system is impossible, but so is getting everybody in.
Metzler paradox: The imposition of a tariff on imports may reduce the relative internal price of that good.
Paradox of prosperity: Why do generations that significantly improve the economic climate seem to generally rear a successor generation that consumes rather than produces?
Paradox of thrift: If everyone saves more money during times of recession, then aggregate demand will fall and will in turn lower total savings in the population.
Paradox of toil: If everyone tries to work during times of recession, lower wages will reduce prices, leading to more deflationary expectations, leading to further thrift, reducing demand and thereby reducing employment.
Paradox of value, also known as diamond-water paradox: Water is more useful than diamonds, yet is a lot cheaper.
Productivity paradox: (also known as Solow computer paradox): Worker productivity may go down, despite technological improvements.
Scitovsky paradox: Using the Kaldor–Hicks criterion, an allocation A may be more efficient than allocation B, while at the same time B is more efficient than A.
Service recovery paradox: Successfully fixing a problem with a defective product may lead to higher consumer satisfaction than in the case where no problem occurred at all.
St. Petersburg paradox: People will only offer a modest fee for a reward of infinite expected value.
Paradox of Plenty: The Paradox of Plenty (resource curse) refers to the paradox that countries and regions with an abundance of natural resources, specifically point-source non-renewable resources like minerals and fuels, tend to have less economic growth and worse development outcomes than countries with fewer natural resources.
Throw away paradox: A trader can gain by throwing away some of his/her initial endowment.
Tullock paradox: Bribing politicians costs less than one would expect, considering how much profit it can yield.

Perception[edit]
For more details on this topic, see Perceptual paradox.




the vertical–horizontal illusion



Tritone paradox: An auditory illusion in which a sequentially played pair of Shepard tones is heard as ascending by some people and as descending by others.
Blub paradox: Cognitive lock of some experienced programmers that prevents them from properly evaluating the quality of programming languages which they do not know.[9]
Optical illusion: A visual illusion which suggests inconsistency, such as an impossible cube or the vertical-horizontal illusion, where the two lines are exactly the same length but appear to be of different lengths.

Politics[edit]

Stability–instability paradox: When two countries each have nuclear weapons, the probability of a direct war between them greatly decreases, but the probability of minor or indirect conflicts between them increases.
Wollheim's paradox: A person can simultaneously advocate two conflicting policy options, A and B, provided that the person believes that democratic decisions should be followed.

Psychology and sociology[edit]

Gender paradox: Women conform more closely than men to sociolinguistics norms that are overtly prescribed, but conform less than men when they are not.
Ironic process theory: Ironic processing is the psychological process whereby an individual's deliberate attempts to suppress or avoid certain thoughts (thought suppression) renders those thoughts more persistent.
Meat paradox: People care about animals, but embrace diets that involve harming them.
Moral paradox: A situation in which moral imperatives clash without clear resolution.
Outcomes paradox: Schizophrenia patients in developing countries seem to fare better than their Western counterparts.[10]
Region-beta paradox: People can sometimes recover more quickly from more intense emotions or pain than from less distressing experiences.
Self-absorption paradox: The contradictory association whereby higher levels of self-awareness are simultaneously associated with higher levels of psychological distress and with psychological well-being.[11]
Stapp's ironical paradox: "The universal aptitude for ineptitude makes any human accomplishment an incredible miracle."
Status paradox: Several paradoxes involve the concept of medical or social status.
Stockdale paradox: "You must never confuse faith that you will prevail in the end—which you can never afford to lose—with the discipline to confront the most brutal facts of your current reality, whatever they might be."
The Paradox of Anti-Semitism: A book arguing that the lack of external persecutions and antagonisms results in the dissolution of Jewish identity, a theory that resonates in works of Dershowitz and Sartre.

Miscellaneous[edit]

Absence paradox: No one is ever "here".
Bonini's paradox: Models or simulations that explain the workings of complex systems are seemingly impossible to construct. As a model of a complex system becomes more complete, it becomes less understandable, for it to be more understandable it must be less complete and therefore less accurate. When the model becomes accurate, it is just as difficult to understand as the real-world processes it represents.
Buttered cat paradox: Humorous example of a paradox from contradicting proverbs.
Intentionally blank page: Many documents contain pages on which the text "This page is intentionally left blank" is printed, thereby making the page not blank.
Observer's paradox: The outcome of an event or experiment is influenced by the presence of the observer.

See also[edit]


Logic portal



Auto-antonym: A word that is encoded with opposing meanings.
Absurdity
Excusable negligence: If a behavior is excusable, it is not negligence.
Gödel's incompleteness theorems: and Tarski's undefinability theorem
Ignore all rules: To obey this rule, it is necessary to ignore it.
Impossible object: A type of optical illusion.
Invalid proof: An apparently correct mathematical derivation that leads to an obvious contradiction.
Logical fallacy: A misconception resulting from incorrect reasoning in argumentation.
Paradox gun: A gun that has characteristics of both (smoothbore) shotguns and rifles.
Paradoxical laughter: Inappropriate laughter, often recognized as such by the laughing person.
Performative contradiction: Some statements contradict the conditions that allow them to be stated.
Proof that 0.999... equals 1
Puzzle
Self-refuting idea
Theories of humor: Incongruity theory and the Ridiculous.

Notes[edit]


^ Eldridge-Smith, Peter; Eldridge-Smith, Veronique (13 January 2010). "The Pinocchio paradox". Analysis. 70 (2): 212–215. ISSN 1467-8284. doi:10.1093/analys/anp173. Retrieved 23 July 2010. 
As of 2010[update], an image of Pinocchio with a speech bubble "My nose will grow now!" has become a minor Internet phenomenon (Google search, Google image search). It seems likely that this paradox has been independently conceived multiple times.
^ Numberphile (2013-07-15), Infinity Paradoxes - Numberphile, retrieved 2016-05-30 
^ Newton, Roger G. (2002). Scattering Theory of Waves and Particles, second edition. Dover Publications. p. 68. ISBN 0-486-42535-5. 
^ Carnap is quoted as saying in 1977 "... the situation with respect to Maxwell's paradox", in Leff, Harvey S.; Rex, A. F., eds. (2003). Maxwell's Demon 2: Entropy, Classical and Quantum Information, Computing (PDF). Institute of Physics. p. 19. ISBN 0-7503-0759-5. Archived from the original (PDF) on 2005-11-09. Retrieved 15 March 2010. 
On page 36, Leff and Rex also quote Goldstein and Goldstein as saying "Smoluchowski fully resolved the paradox of the demon in 1912" in Goldstein, Martin; Goldstein, Inge F. (1993). The Refrigerator and The Universe. Universities Press (India) Pvt. Ltd. p. 228. ISBN 978-81-7371-085-8. OCLC 477206415. Retrieved 15 March 2010. 
^ T.L. Duncan, Phys. Rev. E 61, 4661 (2000).
^ Sheehan, D.P., D.J. Mallin, J.T. Garamella, and W.F. Sheehan, Found. Phys. 44 235 (2014).
^ Peng, C.-K; Isaac C Henry; Joseph E Mietus; Jeffrey M Hausdorff; Gurucharan Khalsa; Herbert Benson; Ary L Goldberger (May 2004). "Heart rate dynamics during three forms of meditation". International Journal of Cardiology. 95 (1): 19–27. PMID 15159033. doi:10.1016/j.ijcard.2003.02.006. Retrieved 23 May 2012. 
^ Khasnis, A.; Lokhandwala, Y. (Jan–Mar 2002). "Clinical signs in medicine: pulsus paradoxus". Journal of Postgraduate Medicine. Mumbai – 400 012, India: 49. 48 (1): 46–9. ISSN 0022-3859. PMID 12082330. Retrieved 21 March 2010. The "paradox" refers to the fact that heart sounds may be heard over the precordium when the radial pulse is not felt. 
^ Hidders, J. "Expressive Power of Recursion and Aggregates in XQuery" (PDF). Retrieved 23 May 2012. : Chapter 1, Introduction.
^ Developing countries: The outcomes paradox Nature.com
^ Trapnell, P. D., & Campbell, J. D. (1999). "Private self-consciousness and the Five-Factor Model of Personality: Distinguishing rumination from reflection". Journal of Personality and Social Psychology, 76, 284–304.








v
t
e


Logic






Outline
History





Fields



Argumentation theory
Axiology
Critical thinking
Logic in computer science
Mathematical logic
Metalogic
Metamathematics
Non-classical logic
Philosophical logic
Philosophy of logic
Set theory





Foundations



Abduction
Analytic and synthetic propositions
Antinomy
A priori and a posteriori
Deduction
Definition
Description
Induction
Inference
Logical form
Logical consequence
Logical truth
Name
Necessity and sufficiency
Meaning
Paradox
Possible world
Presupposition
Probability
Reason
Reference
Semantics
Statement
Strict implication
Substitution
Syntax
Truth
Validity





Lists




topics



Mathematical logic
Boolean algebra
Set theory





other



Logicians
Rules of inference
Paradoxes
Fallacies
Logic symbols











Portal
Category
WikiProject (talk)
changes












v
t
e


Decision theory paradoxes






Abilene
Apportionment
Arrow's
Buridan's ass
Chainstore
Condorcet's
Decision-making
Downs
Ellsberg
Fenno's
Fredkin's
Green
Hedgehog's
Inventor's
Kavka's toxin puzzle
Morton's fork
Navigation
Newcomb's
Parrondo's
Prevention
Prisoner's dilemma
Tolerance
Willpower









List of paradoxes










v
t
e


Economic paradoxes (list)






Allais
Antitrust
Arrow information
Bertrand
Braess's
Competition
Income and fertility
Downs–Thomson
Easterlin
Edgeworth
Ellsberg
European
Gibson's
Giffen good
Icarus
Jevons
Leontief
Lucas
Mandeville's
Mayfield's
Metzler
Plenty
Productivity
Prosperity
Scitovsky
Service recovery
St. Petersburg
Thrift
Toil
Tullock
Value












v
t
e


Logical paradoxes



Self-reference



Barber
Berry
Bhartrhari's
Court
Crocodile
Curry's
Epimenides
Grelling–Nelson
Kleene–Rosser
Liar

Card
Pinocchio
Quine's
Yablo's


Richard's
Russell's
Socratic








Vagueness



Theseus' ship
Sorites





Other paradoxes



Barbershop
Catch-22
Drinker
Entailment
Lottery
Plato's beard
Raven
Ross'
Unexpected hanging






List of paradoxes










v
t
e


Philosophical paradoxes (list)






Analysis
Buridan's bridge
Dream argument
Epicurean
Fiction
Fitch's knowability
Free will
Goodman's
Hedonism
Liberal
Meno's
Mere addition
Moore's
Newcomb's
Nihilism
Omnipotence
Preface
Rule-following
White horse
Zeno's













 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=List_of_paradoxes&oldid=791566219#Economics"					
Categories: ParadoxesLists related to philosophical problemsHidden categories: Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2010All articles containing potentially dated statementsAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from April 2010All accuracy disputesArticles with disputed statements from February 2014Use dmy dates from October 2010Articles containing video clips 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةবাংলাفارسیFrançaisहिन्दीOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаPortuguêsРусскийSlovenščinaSuomiTürkçeУкраїнськаZazaki 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 21 July 2017, at 02:57.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









List of paradoxes - Wikipedia





















 






List of paradoxes

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Economic paradox)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This is a list of paradoxes, grouped thematically. The grouping is approximate, as paradoxes may fit into more than one category. Because of varying definitions of the term paradox, some of the following are not considered to be paradoxes by everyone. This list collects only scenarios that have been called a paradox by at least one source and have their own article.
Although considered paradoxes, some of these are based on fallacious reasoning, or incomplete/faulty analysis. Informally, the term is often used to describe a counter-intuitive result.



Contents


1 Logic

1.1 Self-reference
1.2 Vagueness


2 Mathematics

2.1 Statistics
2.2 Probability
2.3 Infinity and infinitesimals
2.4 Geometry and topology


3 Decision theory
4 Physics

4.1 Astrophysics
4.2 Classical mechanics
4.3 Cosmology
4.4 Electromagnetism
4.5 Quantum mechanics
4.6 Relativity
4.7 Thermodynamics


5 Biology

5.1 Health and nutrition


6 Chemistry
7 Time travel
8 Linguistics and artificial intelligence
9 Philosophy
10 Mysticism
11 Economics
12 Perception
13 Politics
14 Psychology and sociology
15 Miscellaneous
16 See also
17 Notes



Logic[edit]

Barbershop paradox: The supposition that if one of two simultaneous assumptions leads to a contradiction, the other assumption is also disproved leads to paradoxical consequences. Not to be confused with the Barber paradox.
What the Tortoise Said to Achilles: "Whatever Logic is good enough to tell me is worth writing down...", also known as Carroll's paradox, not to be confused with the "Achilles and the tortoise" paradox by Zeno of Elea.
Catch-22: A situation in which someone is in need of something that can only be had by not being in need of it. A soldier who wants to be declared insane in order to avoid combat is deemed not insane for that very reason, and will therefore not be declared insane.
Drinker paradox: In any pub there is a customer of whom it is true to say: if that customer drinks, everybody in the pub drinks.
Paradox of entailment: Inconsistent premises always make an argument valid.
Lottery paradox: If there is one winning ticket in a large lottery, it is reasonable to believe of any particular lottery ticket that it is not the winning ticket, but it is not reasonable to believe that no lottery ticket will win.
Raven paradox: (or Hempel's Ravens): Observing a green apple increases the likelihood of all ravens being black.
Ross' paradox: Disjunction introduction poses a problem for imperative inference by seemingly permitting arbitrary imperatives to be inferred.
Unexpected hanging paradox: The day of the hanging will be a surprise, so it cannot happen at all, so it will be a surprise. The surprise examination and Bottle Imp paradox use similar logic.

Self-reference[edit]
These paradoxes have in common a contradiction arising from either self-reference or circular reference, in which several statements refer to each other in a way that following some of the references leads back to the starting point.

Barber paradox: A barber (who is a man) shaves all and only those men who do not shave themselves. Does he shave himself? (Russell's popularization of his set theoretic paradox.)
Bhartrhari's paradox: The thesis that there are some things which are unnameable conflicts with the notion that something is named by calling it unnameable.
Berry paradox: The phrase "the first number not nameable in under ten words" appears to name it in nine words.
Crocodile dilemma: If a crocodile steals a child and promises its return if the father can correctly guess exactly what the crocodile will do, how should the crocodile respond in the case that the father guesses that the child will not be returned?
Paradox of the Court: A law student agrees to pay his teacher after (and only after) winning his first case. The teacher then sues the student (who has not yet won a case) for payment.
Curry's paradox: "If this sentence is true, then Santa Claus exists."
Epimenides paradox: A Cretan says: "All Cretans are liars". This paradox works in mainly the same way as the Liar paradox.
Grelling–Nelson paradox: Is the word "heterological", meaning "not applicable to itself", a heterological word? (Another close relative of Russell's paradox.)
Kleene–Rosser paradox: By formulating an equivalent to Richard's paradox, untyped lambda calculus is shown to be inconsistent.
Liar paradox: "This sentence is false." This is the canonical self-referential paradox. Also "Is the answer to this question 'no'?", and "I'm lying."

Card paradox: "The next statement is true. The previous statement is false." A variant of the liar paradox that does not use self-reference.
Pinocchio paradox: What would happen if Pinocchio said "My nose will be growing"?[1]
Quine's paradox: "'Yields a falsehood when appended to its own quotation' yields a falsehood when appended to its own quotation." Shows that a sentence can be paradoxical even if it is not self-referring and does not use demonstratives or indexicals.
Yablo's paradox: An ordered infinite sequence of sentences, each of which says that all following sentences are false. While constructed to avoid self-reference, there is no consensus whether it relies on self-reference or not.


Opposite Day: "It is opposite day today." Therefore, it is not opposite day, but if you say it is a normal day it would be considered a normal day.
Petronius' paradox: "Moderation in all things, including moderation" (unsourced quotation sometimes attributed to Petronius).
Richard's paradox: We appear to be able to use simple English to define a decimal expansion in a way that is self-contradictory.
Russell's paradox: Does the set of all those sets that do not contain themselves contain itself?
Socratic paradox: "All I know is that I know nothing."

Vagueness[edit]

Ship of Theseus: It seems like you can replace any component of a ship, and it is still the same ship. So you can replace them all, one at a time, and it is still the same ship. However, you can then take all the original pieces, and assemble them into a ship. That, too, is the same ship you began with.


See also List of Ship of Theseus examples


Sorites paradox (also known as the paradox of the heap): If you remove a single grain of sand from a heap, you still have a heap. Keep removing single grains, and the heap will disappear. Can a single grain of sand make the difference between heap and non-heap?

Mathematics[edit]
See also: Category:Mathematics paradoxes and Paradoxes of set theory

All horses are the same color: A proof by induction that all horses have the same color.
Ant on a rubber rope: An ant crawling on a rubber rope can reach the end even when the rope stretches much faster than the ant can crawl.
Cramer's paradox: The number of points of intersection of two higher-order curves can be greater than the number of arbitrary points needed to define one such curve.
Elevator paradox: Elevators can seem to be mostly going in one direction, as if they were being manufactured in the middle of the building and being disassembled on the roof and basement.
Interesting number paradox: The first number that can be considered "dull" rather than "interesting" becomes interesting because of that fact.
Potato paradox: If you let potatoes consisting of 99% water dry so that they are 98% water, they lose 50% of their weight.
Russell's paradox: Does the set of all those sets that do not contain themselves contain itself?

Statistics[edit]
See also: Category:Statistical paradoxes

Abelson's paradox: Effect size may not be indicative of practical meaning.
Accuracy paradox: Predictive models with a given level of accuracy may have greater predictive power than models with higher accuracy.
Berkson's paradox: A complicating factor arising in statistical tests of proportions.
Freedman's paradox: Describes a problem in model selection where predictor variables with no explanatory power can appear artificially important.
Friendship paradox: For almost everyone, their friends have more friends than they do.
Inspection paradox: Why one will wait longer for a bus than one should.
Lindley's paradox: Tiny errors in the null hypothesis are magnified when large data sets are analyzed, leading to false but highly statistically significant results.
Low birth weight paradox: Low birth weight and mothers who smoke contribute to a higher mortality rate. Babies of smokers have lower average birth weight, but low birth weight babies born to smokers have a lower mortality rate than other low birth weight babies. This is a special case of Simpson's paradox.
Simpson's paradox, or the Yule–Simpson effect: A trend that appears in different groups of data disappears when these groups are combined, and the reverse trend appears for the aggregate data.
Will Rogers phenomenon: The mathematical concept of an average, whether defined as the mean or median, leads to apparently paradoxical results—for example, it is possible that moving an entry from an encyclopedia to a dictionary would increase the average entry length on both books.

Probability[edit]




The Monty Hall problem: which door do you choose?


See also: Category:Probability theory paradoxes

Bertrand's box paradox: A paradox of conditional probability closely related to the Boy or Girl paradox.
Bertrand's paradox: Different common-sense definitions of randomness give quite different results.
Birthday paradox: What is the chance that two people in a room have the same birthday?
Borel's paradox: Conditional probability density functions are not invariant under coordinate transformations.
Boy or Girl paradox: A two-child family has at least one boy. What is the probability that it has a girl?
Dartboard Puzzle: If a dart is guaranteed to hit a dartboard and the probability of hitting a specific point is positive, adding the infinitely many positive chances yields infinity, but the chance of hitting the dartboard is one. If the probability of hitting each point is zero, the probability of hitting anywhere on the dartboard is zero.[2]
False positive paradox: A test that is accurate the vast majority of the time could show you have a disease, but the probability that you actually have it could still be tiny.
Grice's paradox: Shows that the exact meaning of statements involving conditionals and probabilities is more complicated than may be obvious on casual examination.
Monty Hall problem: An unintuitive consequence of conditional probability.
Necktie paradox: A wager between two people seems to favour them both. Very similar in essence to the Two-envelope paradox.
Nontransitive dice: You can have three dice, called A, B, and C, such that A is likely to win in a roll against B, B is likely to win in a roll against C, and C is likely to win in a roll against A.
Proebsting's paradox: The Kelly criterion is an often optimal strategy for maximizing profit in the long run. Proebsting's paradox apparently shows that the Kelly criterion can lead to ruin.
Sleeping Beauty problem: A probability problem that can be correctly answered as one half or one third depending on how the question is approached.
Three cards problem: When pulling a random card, how do you determine the color of the underside?
Three Prisoners problem: A variation of the Monty Hall problem.
Two-envelope paradox: You are given two indistinguishable envelopes, each of which contains a positive sum of money. One envelope contains twice as much as the other. You may pick one envelope and keep whatever amount it contains. You pick one envelope at random but before you open it you are given the chance to take the other envelope instead.

Infinity and infinitesimals[edit]

Burali-Forti paradox: If the ordinal numbers formed a set, it would be an ordinal number that is smaller than itself.
Cantor's paradox: The set of all sets would have its own power set as a subset, therefore its cardinality would be at least as great as that of its power set. But Cantor's theorem proves that power sets are strictly greater than the sets they are constructed from. Consequently, the set of all sets would contain a subset greater than itself.
Galileo's paradox: Though most numbers are not squares, there are no more numbers than squares. (See also Cantor's diagonal argument)
Hilbert's paradox of the Grand Hotel: If a hotel with infinitely many rooms is full, it can still take in more guests.
Russell's paradox: Does the set of all those sets that do not contain themselves contain itself?
Skolem's paradox: Countably infinite models of set theory contain uncountably infinite sets.
Zeno's paradoxes: "You will never reach point B from point A as you must always get half-way there, and half of the half, and half of that half, and so on." (This is also a physical paradox.)
Supertasks may result in paradoxes such as




Benardete's paradox: Apparently, a man can be "forced to stay where he is by the mere unfulfilled intentions of the gods".
Grandi's series: The sum of 1-1+1-1+1-1... can be either one, zero, or one-half.
Ross–Littlewood paradox: After alternately adding and removing balls to a vase infinitely often, how many balls remain?
Thomson's lamp: After flicking a lamp on and off infinitely often, is it on or off?



Geometry and topology[edit]




The Banach–Tarski paradox: A ball can be decomposed and reassembled into two balls the same size as the original.



Banach–Tarski paradox: Cut a ball into a finite number of pieces and re-assemble the pieces to get two balls, each of equal size to the first. The von Neumann paradox is a two-dimensional analogue.

Paradoxical set: A set that can be partitioned into two sets, each of which is equivalent to the original.


Coastline paradox: the perimeter of a landmass is in general ill-defined.
Coin rotation paradox: a coin rotating along the edge of an identical coin will make a full revolution after traversing only half of the stationary coin's circumference.
Gabriel's Horn: or Torricelli's trumpet: A simple object with finite volume but infinite surface area. Also, the Mandelbrot set and various other fractals are covered by a finite area, but have an infinite perimeter (in fact, there are no two distinct points on the boundary of the Mandelbrot set that can be reached from one another by moving a finite distance along that boundary, which also implies that in a sense you go no further if you walk "the wrong way" around the set to reach a nearby point). This can be represented by a Klein bottle.
Hausdorff paradox: There exists a countable subset C of the sphere S such that S\C is equidecomposable with two copies of itself.
Nikodym set: A set contained in and with the same Lebesgue measure as the unit square, yet for every one of its points there is a straight line intersecting the Nikodym set only in that point.
Sphere eversion: A sphere can, topologically, be turned inside out.

Decision theory[edit]

Abilene paradox: People can make decisions based not on what they actually want to do, but on what they think that other people want to do, with the result that everybody decides to do something that nobody really wants to do, but only what they thought that everybody else wanted to do.
Apportionment paradox: Some systems of apportioning representation can have unintuitive results due to rounding

Alabama paradox: Increasing the total number of seats might shrink one block's seats.
New states paradox: Adding a new state or voting block might increase the number of votes of another.
Population paradox: A fast-growing state can lose votes to a slow-growing state.


Arrow's paradox: Given more than two choices, no system can have all the attributes of an ideal voting system at once.
Buridan's ass: How can a rational choice be made between two outcomes of equal value?
Chainstore paradox: Even those who know better play the so-called chain store game in an irrational manner.
Decision-making paradox: Selecting the best decision-making method is a decision problem in itself.
Fenno's paradox: The belief that people generally disapprove of the United States Congress as a whole, but support the Congressman from their own Congressional district.
Fredkin's paradox: The more similar two choices are, the more time a decision-making agent spends on deciding.
Green paradox: Policies intending to reduce future CO2 emissions may lead to increased emissions in the present.
Hedgehog's dilemma: or Lover's paradox Despite goodwill, human intimacy cannot occur without substantial mutual harm.
Inventor's paradox: It is easier to solve a more general problem that covers the specifics of the sought-after solution.
Kavka's toxin puzzle: Can one intend to drink the non-deadly toxin, if the intention is the only thing needed to get the reward?
Morton's fork: Choosing between unpalatable alternatives.
Navigation paradox: Increased navigational precision may result in increased collision risk.
Newcomb's paradox: How do you play a game against an omniscient opponent?
Paradox of tolerance: Should one tolerate intolerance if intolerance would destroy the possibility of tolerance?
Paradox of voting: Also known as the Downs paradox. For a rational, self-interested voter the costs of voting will normally exceed the expected benefits, so why do people keep voting?
Parrondo's paradox: It is possible to play two losing games alternately to eventually win.
Prevention paradox: For one person to benefit, many people have to change their behavior — even though they receive no benefit, or even suffer, from the change.
Prisoner's dilemma: Two people might not cooperate even if it is in both their best interests to do so.
Voting paradox: Also known as Condorcet's paradox and paradox of voting. A group of separately rational individuals may have preferences that are irrational in the aggregate.
Willpower paradox: Those who kept their minds open were more goal-directed and more motivated than those who declared their objective to themselves.

Physics[edit]
For more details on this topic, see Physical paradox.


Play media


A demonstration of the tea leaf paradox



Cool tropics paradox: A contradiction between modelled estimates of tropical temperatures during warm, ice-free periods of the Cretaceous and Eocene, and the lower temperatures that proxies suggest were present.
Irresistible force paradox: What would happen if an unstoppable force hit an immovable object?
Paradox of Place: If everything that exist has a place, that place must have a place, and so on ad infinitum.
Paradox of the grain of millet: When a grain of millet falls it makes no sound, but when a thousand grains fall they do, thus many of nothing become something.
The Moving Rows

Astrophysics[edit]

Algol paradox: In some binaries the partners seem to have different ages, even though they are thought to have formed at the same time.
Faint young Sun paradox: The contradiction between existence of liquid water early in the Earth's history and the expectation that the output of the young Sun would have been insufficient to melt ice on Earth.
GZK paradox: Extreme-energy cosmic rays have been observed that seem to violate the Greisen–Zatsepin–Kuzmin limit, which is a consequence of special relativity.
Paradox of youth: Compared to theory, there is an overabundance of young stars close to the supermassive black hole in the Galactic Center.

Classical mechanics[edit]

Achilles and the tortoise: If the tortoise is ahead of achilles, by the time Achilles reaches the tortoise's current position, the tortoise will have moved a bit further ahead, which goes on indefinitely.
Archer's paradox: An archer must, in order to hit his target, not aim directly at it, but slightly to the side. Not to be confused with the arrow paradox.
Arrow paradox If we divide time into discrete 0-duration slices, no motion is happening in each of them, so taking them all as a whole, motion is impossible.
Hydrostatic paradox: A massive battleship can float in a few litres of water.
Aristotle's wheel paradox: Rolling joined concentric wheels seem to trace the same distance with their circumferences, even though the circumferences are different.
Carroll's paradox: The angular momentum of a stick should be zero, but is not.
D'Alembert's paradox: Flow of an inviscid fluid produces no net force on a solid body.
Knudsen paradox: Based on the Navier–Stokes equations, one would expect the mass flux in a channel to decrease with increasing Knudsen number, but there is a distinct minimum around Knudsen number 0.8.
Denny's paradox: Surface-dwelling arthropods (such as the water strider) should not be able to propel themselves horizontally.
Dichotomy paradox: To reach its target, an airborne arrow must first reach an infinite number of midpoints between its current position and the target.
Elevator paradox: Even though hydrometers are used to measure fluid density, a hydrometer will not indicate changes of fluid density caused by changing atmospheric pressure.
Feynman sprinkler: Which way does a sprinkler rotate when submerged in a tank and made to suck in the surrounding fluid?
Painlevé paradox: Rigid-body dynamics with contact and friction is inconsistent.
Tea leaf paradox: When a cup of tea is stirred, the leaves assemble in the center, even though centrifugal force pushes them outward.
Upstream contamination: When a fluid is poured from a higher container onto a lower one, particles can climb up the falling water.

Cosmology[edit]

Bentley's paradox: In a Newtonian universe, gravitation should pull all matter into a single point.
Boltzmann brain: If the universe we observe resulted from a random thermodynamic fluctuation, it would be vastly more likely to be a simple one than the complex one we observe. The simplest case would be just a brain floating in vacuum, having the thoughts and sensations you have.
Fermi paradox: If there are, as various arguments suggest, many other sentient species in the Universe, then where are they? Shouldn't their presence be obvious?
Heat death paradox: If the universe was infinitely old, it would be in thermodynamical equilibrium, which contradicts what we observe.
Olbers' paradox: Why is the night sky dark if there is an infinity of stars, covering every part of the celestial sphere?

Electromagnetism[edit]

Faraday paradox: An apparent violation of Faraday's law of electromagnetic induction.

Quantum mechanics[edit]

Aharonov–Bohm effect: a charged particle is affected by an electromagnetic field even though it has no local contact with that field
Bell's theorem: Why do measured quantum particles not satisfy mathematical probability theory?
Double-slit experiment: Matter and energy can act as a wave or as a particle depending on the experiment.
Einstein–Podolsky–Rosen paradox: Can far away events influence each other in quantum mechanics?
Extinction paradox: In the small wavelength limit, the total scattering cross section of an impenetrable sphere is twice its geometrical cross-sectional area (which is the value obtained in classical mechanics).[3]
Hardy's paradox: How can we make inferences about past events that we haven't observed while at the same time acknowledge that the act of observing it affects the reality we are inferring to?
Klein paradox: When the potential of a potential barrier becomes similar to the mass of the impinging particle, it becomes transparent.
Mott problem: Spherically symmetric wave functions, when observed, produce linear particle tracks.
Quantum LC circuit paradox: Energies stored on capacitance and inductance are not equal to the ground state energy of the quantum oscillator.[citation needed]
Quantum pseudo-telepathy: Two players who can not communicate accomplish tasks that seemingly require direct contact.
Quantum Zeno effect: (Turing paradox) echoing the Zeno paradox, a quantum particle that is continuously observed cannot change its state
Schrödinger's cat paradox: According to the Copenhagen interpretation of quantum mechanics, a cat could be simultaneously alive and dead, as long as it remains unobserved.
Uncertainty principle: Attempts to determine position must disturb momentum, and vice versa.

Relativity[edit]

Bell's spaceship paradox: concerning relativity.
Black hole information paradox: Black holes violate a commonly assumed tenet of science that information cannot be destroyed.
Ehrenfest paradox: On the kinematics of a rigid rotating disk.
Ladder paradox: A classic relativity problem.
Mocanu's velocity composition paradox: a paradox in special relativity.
Supplee's paradox: the buoyancy of a relativistic object (such as a bullet) appears to change when the reference frame is changed from one in which the bullet is at rest to one in which the fluid is at rest.
Trouton-Noble or Right-angle lever paradox: Does a torque arise in static systems when changing frames?
Twin paradox: The theory of relativity predicts that a person making a round trip will return younger than his or her identical twin who stayed at home.

Thermodynamics[edit]

Gibbs paradox: In an ideal gas, is entropy an extensive variable?
Loschmidt's paradox: Why is there an inevitable increase in entropy when the laws of physics are invariant under time reversal? The time reversal symmetry of physical laws appears to contradict the second law of thermodynamics.
Maxwell's demon: The second law of thermodynamics seems to be violated by a cleverly operated trapdoor.[4]
Mpemba effect: Hot water can, under certain conditions, freeze faster than cold water, even though it must pass the lower temperature on the way to freezing.
Duncan's Paradox: Gas-surface reactions create either steady-state temperature or pressure differentials that can be used in perpetual motion machines.[5][6]


Schmidt's Paradox (In Russian): – the contradiction (discovered in 1917) between the observed vertical turbulent heat flux in the surface layer and the theory of heat conduction in the atmosphere .

Biology[edit]

Antarctic paradox: In some areas of the oceans, phytoplankton concentrations are low despite there apparently being sufficient nutrients.
C-value enigma: Genome size does not correlate with organismal complexity. For example, some unicellular organisms have genomes much larger than that of humans.
Cole's paradox: Even a tiny fecundity advantage of one additional offspring would favor the evolution of semelparity.
Gray's paradox: Despite their relatively small muscle mass, dolphins can swim at high speeds and obtain large accelerations.
Hormesis: Exposure to small doses of toxins can have beneficial effects.
Lek paradox: Persistent female choice for particular male trait values should erode genetic variance in male traits and thereby remove the benefits of choice, yet choice persists.
Lombard's paradox: When rising to stand from a sitting or squatting position, both the hamstrings and quadriceps contract at the same time, despite their being antagonists to each other.
Paradox of enrichment: Increasing the food available to an ecosystem may lead to instability, and even to extinction.
Paradox of the pesticides: Applying pesticide to a pest may increase the pest's abundance.
Paradox of the plankton: Why are there so many different species of phytoplankton, even though competition for the same resources tends to reduce the number of species?
Sherman paradox: An anomalous pattern of inheritance in the fragile X syndrome.
Temporal paradox (paleontology): When did the ancestors of birds live?

Health and nutrition[edit]

French paradox: The observation that the French suffer a relatively low incidence of coronary heart disease, despite having a diet relatively rich in saturated fats, which are assumed to be the leading dietary cause of such disease.
Glucose paradox: The large amount of glycogen in the liver cannot be explained by its small glucose absorption.
Hispanic paradox: The finding that Hispanics in the United States tend to have substantially better health than the average population in spite of what their aggregate socio-economic indicators predict.
Israeli paradox: The observation that Israelis suffer a relatively high incidence of coronary heart disease, despite having a diet very low in saturated fats, which are assumed to be the leading dietary cause of such disease.
Meditation paradox: The amplitude of heart rate oscillations during meditation was significantly greater than in the pre-meditation control state and also in three non-meditation control groups[7]
Mexican paradox: Mexican children tend to have higher birth weights than can be expected from their socio-economic status.
Obesity survival paradox: Although the negative health consequences of obesity in the general population are well supported by the available evidence, health outcomes in certain subgroups seem to be improved at an increased BMI.
Peto's paradox: Humans and other small-to-medium-sized mammals get cancer with high frequency, while larger mammals, like whales, do not. If cancer is essentially a negative outcome lottery at the cell level, and larger organisms have more cells, and thus more potentially cancerous cell divisions, one would expect larger organisms to be more predisposed to cancer.
Pulsus paradoxus: A pulsus paradoxus is an exaggerated decrease in systolic blood pressure during inspiration. It can indicate certain medical conditions in which there is reduced cardiac output, such as cardiac tamponade or constrictive pericarditis. Also known as the Pulse Paradox.[8]
Second wind: The "second wind" is a sudden period of increased wakefulness in individuals deprived of sleep that tends to coincide with the individual's circadian rhythm. Although the individual is more wakeful and aware of their surroundings, they are continuing to accrue sleep debt and thus, are actually exacerbating their sleep deprivation.

Chemistry[edit]

Faraday paradox (electrochemistry): Diluted nitric acid will corrode steel, while concentrated nitric acid will not.
Levinthal paradox: The length of time that it takes for a protein chain to find its folded state is many orders of magnitude shorter than it would be if it freely searched all possible configurations.
SAR paradox: Exceptions to the principle that a small change in a molecule causes a small change in its chemical behaviour are frequently profound.

Time travel[edit]

Bootstrap paradox, (also ontological paradox) Can a time traveler send himself information with no outside source?
Polchinski's paradox: A billiard ball can be thrown into a wormhole in such a way that it would emerge in the past and knock its incoming past self away from the wormhole entrance, creating a variant of the grandfather paradox.
Predestination paradox: A man travels back in time to discover the cause of a famous fire. While in the building where the fire started, he accidentally knocks over a kerosene lantern and causes a fire, the same fire that would inspire him, years later, to travel back in time. The bootstrap paradox is closely tied to this, in which, as a result of time travel, information or objects appear to have no beginning.
Temporal paradox: What happens when a time traveler does things in the past that prevent him from doing them in the first place?




Grandfather paradox: You travel back in time and kill your grandfather before he conceives one of your parents, which precludes your own conception and, therefore, you couldn't go back in time and kill your grandfather.
Hitler's murder paradox: You travel back in time and kill a famous person in history before they become famous; but if the person had never been famous, then he could not have been targeted as a famous person.



Linguistics and artificial intelligence[edit]

Bracketing paradox: Is a "historical linguist" a linguist who is historical, or someone who studies "historical linguistics"?
Code-talker paradox: How can a language both enable communication and block communication?
Moravec's paradox: Logical thought is hard for humans and easy for computers, but picking a screw from a box of screws is an unsolved problem.
Movement paradox: In transformational linguistics, there are pairs of sentences in which the sentence without movement is ungrammatical while the sentence with movement is not.
Sayre's paradox: In automated handwriting recognition, a cursively written word cannot be recognized without being segmented and cannot be segmented without being recognized.

Philosophy[edit]

Paradox of analysis: It seems that no conceptual analysis can meet the requirements both of correctness and of informativeness.
Buridan's bridge: Will Plato throw Socrates into the water or not?
Paradox of fiction: How can people experience strong emotions from purely fictional things?
Fitch's paradox: If all truths are knowable, then all truths must in fact be known.
Paradox of free will: If God knows in advance how we will decide, how can there be free will?
Goodman's paradox: Why can induction be used to confirm that things are "green", but not to confirm that things are "grue"?
Paradox of hedonism: When one pursues happiness itself, one is miserable; but, when one pursues something else, one achieves happiness.
Hutton's Paradox: If asking oneself "Am I dreaming?" in a dream proves that one is, what does it prove in waking life?
Liberal paradox: "Minimal Liberty" is incompatible with Pareto optimality.
Meno's paradox: (Learner's paradox) A man cannot search either for what he knows or for what he does not know.
Mere addition paradox: (Parfit's paradox) Is a large population living a barely tolerable life better than a small, happy population?
Moore's paradox: "It's raining, but I don't believe that it is."
Newcomb's paradox: A paradoxical game between two players, one of whom can predict the actions of the other.
Paradox of nihilism: Several distinct paradoxes share this name.
Omnipotence paradox: Can an omnipotent being create a rock too heavy for itself to lift?
Preface paradox: The author of a book may be justified in believing that all his statements in the book are correct, at the same time believing that at least one of them is incorrect.
Problem of evil: (Epicurean paradox) The existence of evil seems to be incompatible with the existence of an omnipotent, omniscient, and morally perfect God.
Rule-following paradox: Even though rules are intended to determine actions, "no course of action could be determined by a rule, because any course of action can be made out to accord with the rule".
When a white horse is not a horse: White horses are not horses because white and horse refer to different things.
Zeno's paradoxes: "You will never reach point B from point A as you must always get half-way there, and half of the half, and half of that half, and so on ..." (This is also a paradox of the infinite)

Mysticism[edit]

Maya_(illusion): Our illusions are not real, yet it's real that illusion itself exists.


Tzimtzum: In Kabbalah, how to reconcile self-awareness of finite Creation with Infinite Divine source, as an emanated causal chain would seemingly nullify existence. Luria's initial withdrawal of God in Hasidic panentheism involves simultaneous illusionism of Creation (Upper Unity) and self-aware existence (Lower Unity), God encompassing logical opposites.

Economics[edit]
See also: Category:Economics paradoxes
One class of paradoxes in economics are the paradoxes of competition, in which behavior that benefits a lone actor would leave everyone worse off if everyone did the same. These paradoxes are classified into circuit, classical and Marx paradoxes.

Allais paradox: A change in a possible outcome that is shared by different alternatives affects people's choices among those alternatives, in contradiction with expected utility theory.
The Antitrust Paradox:[dubious – discuss]: A book arguing that antitrust enforcement artificially raised prices by protecting inefficient competitors from competition.
Arrow information paradox: To sell information you need to give it away before the sale.
Bertrand paradox: Two players reaching a state of Nash equilibrium both find themselves with no profits gained via exploitation.
Braess' paradox: Adding extra capacity to a network can reduce overall performance.
Deaton paradox: Consumption varies surprisingly smoothly despite sharp variations in income.
Demographic-economic paradox: nations or subpopulations with higher GDP per capita are observed to have fewer children, even though a richer population can support more children.
Downs–Thomson paradox: Increasing road capacity at the expense of investments in public transport can make overall congestion on the road worse.
Easterlin paradox: For countries with income sufficient to meet basic needs, the reported level of happiness does not correlate with national income per person.
Edgeworth paradox: With capacity constraints, there may not be an equilibrium.
Ellsberg paradox: People exhibit ambiguity aversion (as distinct from risk aversion), in contradiction with expected utility theory.
European paradox: The perceived failure of European countries to translate scientific advances into marketable innovations.
Gibson's paradox: Why were interest rates and prices correlated?
Giffen paradox: Increasing the price of bread makes poor people eat more of it.
Grossman-Stiglitz paradox: Inability to recoup cost of obtaining market information implies efficient markets cannot exist.
Icarus paradox: Some businesses bring about their own downfall through their own successes.
Jevons paradox: Increases in efficiency lead to even larger increases in demand.
Leontief paradox: Some countries export labor-intensive commodities and import capital-intensive commodities, in contradiction with the Heckscher–Ohlin theorem.
Lucas paradox: Capital is not flowing from developed countries to developing countries despite the fact that developing countries have lower levels of capital per worker, and therefore higher returns to capital.
Mandeville's paradox: Actions that may be vicious to individuals may benefit society as a whole.
Mayfield's paradox: Keeping everyone out of an information system is impossible, but so is getting everybody in.
Metzler paradox: The imposition of a tariff on imports may reduce the relative internal price of that good.
Paradox of prosperity: Why do generations that significantly improve the economic climate seem to generally rear a successor generation that consumes rather than produces?
Paradox of thrift: If everyone saves more money during times of recession, then aggregate demand will fall and will in turn lower total savings in the population.
Paradox of toil: If everyone tries to work during times of recession, lower wages will reduce prices, leading to more deflationary expectations, leading to further thrift, reducing demand and thereby reducing employment.
Paradox of value, also known as diamond-water paradox: Water is more useful than diamonds, yet is a lot cheaper.
Productivity paradox: (also known as Solow computer paradox): Worker productivity may go down, despite technological improvements.
Scitovsky paradox: Using the Kaldor–Hicks criterion, an allocation A may be more efficient than allocation B, while at the same time B is more efficient than A.
Service recovery paradox: Successfully fixing a problem with a defective product may lead to higher consumer satisfaction than in the case where no problem occurred at all.
St. Petersburg paradox: People will only offer a modest fee for a reward of infinite expected value.
Paradox of Plenty: The Paradox of Plenty (resource curse) refers to the paradox that countries and regions with an abundance of natural resources, specifically point-source non-renewable resources like minerals and fuels, tend to have less economic growth and worse development outcomes than countries with fewer natural resources.
Throw away paradox: A trader can gain by throwing away some of his/her initial endowment.
Tullock paradox: Bribing politicians costs less than one would expect, considering how much profit it can yield.

Perception[edit]
For more details on this topic, see Perceptual paradox.




the vertical–horizontal illusion



Tritone paradox: An auditory illusion in which a sequentially played pair of Shepard tones is heard as ascending by some people and as descending by others.
Blub paradox: Cognitive lock of some experienced programmers that prevents them from properly evaluating the quality of programming languages which they do not know.[9]
Optical illusion: A visual illusion which suggests inconsistency, such as an impossible cube or the vertical-horizontal illusion, where the two lines are exactly the same length but appear to be of different lengths.

Politics[edit]

Stability–instability paradox: When two countries each have nuclear weapons, the probability of a direct war between them greatly decreases, but the probability of minor or indirect conflicts between them increases.
Wollheim's paradox: A person can simultaneously advocate two conflicting policy options, A and B, provided that the person believes that democratic decisions should be followed.

Psychology and sociology[edit]

Gender paradox: Women conform more closely than men to sociolinguistics norms that are overtly prescribed, but conform less than men when they are not.
Ironic process theory: Ironic processing is the psychological process whereby an individual's deliberate attempts to suppress or avoid certain thoughts (thought suppression) renders those thoughts more persistent.
Meat paradox: People care about animals, but embrace diets that involve harming them.
Moral paradox: A situation in which moral imperatives clash without clear resolution.
Outcomes paradox: Schizophrenia patients in developing countries seem to fare better than their Western counterparts.[10]
Region-beta paradox: People can sometimes recover more quickly from more intense emotions or pain than from less distressing experiences.
Self-absorption paradox: The contradictory association whereby higher levels of self-awareness are simultaneously associated with higher levels of psychological distress and with psychological well-being.[11]
Stapp's ironical paradox: "The universal aptitude for ineptitude makes any human accomplishment an incredible miracle."
Status paradox: Several paradoxes involve the concept of medical or social status.
Stockdale paradox: "You must never confuse faith that you will prevail in the end—which you can never afford to lose—with the discipline to confront the most brutal facts of your current reality, whatever they might be."
The Paradox of Anti-Semitism: A book arguing that the lack of external persecutions and antagonisms results in the dissolution of Jewish identity, a theory that resonates in works of Dershowitz and Sartre.

Miscellaneous[edit]

Absence paradox: No one is ever "here".
Bonini's paradox: Models or simulations that explain the workings of complex systems are seemingly impossible to construct. As a model of a complex system becomes more complete, it becomes less understandable, for it to be more understandable it must be less complete and therefore less accurate. When the model becomes accurate, it is just as difficult to understand as the real-world processes it represents.
Buttered cat paradox: Humorous example of a paradox from contradicting proverbs.
Intentionally blank page: Many documents contain pages on which the text "This page is intentionally left blank" is printed, thereby making the page not blank.
Observer's paradox: The outcome of an event or experiment is influenced by the presence of the observer.

See also[edit]


Logic portal



Auto-antonym: A word that is encoded with opposing meanings.
Absurdity
Excusable negligence: If a behavior is excusable, it is not negligence.
Gödel's incompleteness theorems: and Tarski's undefinability theorem
Ignore all rules: To obey this rule, it is necessary to ignore it.
Impossible object: A type of optical illusion.
Invalid proof: An apparently correct mathematical derivation that leads to an obvious contradiction.
Logical fallacy: A misconception resulting from incorrect reasoning in argumentation.
Paradox gun: A gun that has characteristics of both (smoothbore) shotguns and rifles.
Paradoxical laughter: Inappropriate laughter, often recognized as such by the laughing person.
Performative contradiction: Some statements contradict the conditions that allow them to be stated.
Proof that 0.999... equals 1
Puzzle
Self-refuting idea
Theories of humor: Incongruity theory and the Ridiculous.

Notes[edit]


^ Eldridge-Smith, Peter; Eldridge-Smith, Veronique (13 January 2010). "The Pinocchio paradox". Analysis. 70 (2): 212–215. ISSN 1467-8284. doi:10.1093/analys/anp173. Retrieved 23 July 2010. 
As of 2010[update], an image of Pinocchio with a speech bubble "My nose will grow now!" has become a minor Internet phenomenon (Google search, Google image search). It seems likely that this paradox has been independently conceived multiple times.
^ Numberphile (2013-07-15), Infinity Paradoxes - Numberphile, retrieved 2016-05-30 
^ Newton, Roger G. (2002). Scattering Theory of Waves and Particles, second edition. Dover Publications. p. 68. ISBN 0-486-42535-5. 
^ Carnap is quoted as saying in 1977 "... the situation with respect to Maxwell's paradox", in Leff, Harvey S.; Rex, A. F., eds. (2003). Maxwell's Demon 2: Entropy, Classical and Quantum Information, Computing (PDF). Institute of Physics. p. 19. ISBN 0-7503-0759-5. Archived from the original (PDF) on 2005-11-09. Retrieved 15 March 2010. 
On page 36, Leff and Rex also quote Goldstein and Goldstein as saying "Smoluchowski fully resolved the paradox of the demon in 1912" in Goldstein, Martin; Goldstein, Inge F. (1993). The Refrigerator and The Universe. Universities Press (India) Pvt. Ltd. p. 228. ISBN 978-81-7371-085-8. OCLC 477206415. Retrieved 15 March 2010. 
^ T.L. Duncan, Phys. Rev. E 61, 4661 (2000).
^ Sheehan, D.P., D.J. Mallin, J.T. Garamella, and W.F. Sheehan, Found. Phys. 44 235 (2014).
^ Peng, C.-K; Isaac C Henry; Joseph E Mietus; Jeffrey M Hausdorff; Gurucharan Khalsa; Herbert Benson; Ary L Goldberger (May 2004). "Heart rate dynamics during three forms of meditation". International Journal of Cardiology. 95 (1): 19–27. PMID 15159033. doi:10.1016/j.ijcard.2003.02.006. Retrieved 23 May 2012. 
^ Khasnis, A.; Lokhandwala, Y. (Jan–Mar 2002). "Clinical signs in medicine: pulsus paradoxus". Journal of Postgraduate Medicine. Mumbai – 400 012, India: 49. 48 (1): 46–9. ISSN 0022-3859. PMID 12082330. Retrieved 21 March 2010. The "paradox" refers to the fact that heart sounds may be heard over the precordium when the radial pulse is not felt. 
^ Hidders, J. "Expressive Power of Recursion and Aggregates in XQuery" (PDF). Retrieved 23 May 2012. : Chapter 1, Introduction.
^ Developing countries: The outcomes paradox Nature.com
^ Trapnell, P. D., & Campbell, J. D. (1999). "Private self-consciousness and the Five-Factor Model of Personality: Distinguishing rumination from reflection". Journal of Personality and Social Psychology, 76, 284–304.








v
t
e


Logic






Outline
History





Fields



Argumentation theory
Axiology
Critical thinking
Logic in computer science
Mathematical logic
Metalogic
Metamathematics
Non-classical logic
Philosophical logic
Philosophy of logic
Set theory





Foundations



Abduction
Analytic and synthetic propositions
Antinomy
A priori and a posteriori
Deduction
Definition
Description
Induction
Inference
Logical form
Logical consequence
Logical truth
Name
Necessity and sufficiency
Meaning
Paradox
Possible world
Presupposition
Probability
Reason
Reference
Semantics
Statement
Strict implication
Substitution
Syntax
Truth
Validity





Lists




topics



Mathematical logic
Boolean algebra
Set theory





other



Logicians
Rules of inference
Paradoxes
Fallacies
Logic symbols











Portal
Category
WikiProject (talk)
changes












v
t
e


Decision theory paradoxes






Abilene
Apportionment
Arrow's
Buridan's ass
Chainstore
Condorcet's
Decision-making
Downs
Ellsberg
Fenno's
Fredkin's
Green
Hedgehog's
Inventor's
Kavka's toxin puzzle
Morton's fork
Navigation
Newcomb's
Parrondo's
Prevention
Prisoner's dilemma
Tolerance
Willpower









List of paradoxes










v
t
e


Economic paradoxes (list)






Allais
Antitrust
Arrow information
Bertrand
Braess's
Competition
Income and fertility
Downs–Thomson
Easterlin
Edgeworth
Ellsberg
European
Gibson's
Giffen good
Icarus
Jevons
Leontief
Lucas
Mandeville's
Mayfield's
Metzler
Plenty
Productivity
Prosperity
Scitovsky
Service recovery
St. Petersburg
Thrift
Toil
Tullock
Value












v
t
e


Logical paradoxes



Self-reference



Barber
Berry
Bhartrhari's
Court
Crocodile
Curry's
Epimenides
Grelling–Nelson
Kleene–Rosser
Liar

Card
Pinocchio
Quine's
Yablo's


Richard's
Russell's
Socratic








Vagueness



Theseus' ship
Sorites





Other paradoxes



Barbershop
Catch-22
Drinker
Entailment
Lottery
Plato's beard
Raven
Ross'
Unexpected hanging






List of paradoxes










v
t
e


Philosophical paradoxes (list)






Analysis
Buridan's bridge
Dream argument
Epicurean
Fiction
Fitch's knowability
Free will
Goodman's
Hedonism
Liberal
Meno's
Mere addition
Moore's
Newcomb's
Nihilism
Omnipotence
Preface
Rule-following
White horse
Zeno's













 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=List_of_paradoxes&oldid=791566219#Economics"					
Categories: ParadoxesLists related to philosophical problemsHidden categories: Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2010All articles containing potentially dated statementsAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from April 2010All accuracy disputesArticles with disputed statements from February 2014Use dmy dates from October 2010Articles containing video clips 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةবাংলাفارسیFrançaisहिन्दीOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаPortuguêsРусскийSlovenščinaSuomiTürkçeУкраїнськаZazaki 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 21 July 2017, at 02:57.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









List of paradoxes - Wikipedia





















 






List of paradoxes

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Economic paradox)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This is a list of paradoxes, grouped thematically. The grouping is approximate, as paradoxes may fit into more than one category. Because of varying definitions of the term paradox, some of the following are not considered to be paradoxes by everyone. This list collects only scenarios that have been called a paradox by at least one source and have their own article.
Although considered paradoxes, some of these are based on fallacious reasoning, or incomplete/faulty analysis. Informally, the term is often used to describe a counter-intuitive result.



Contents


1 Logic

1.1 Self-reference
1.2 Vagueness


2 Mathematics

2.1 Statistics
2.2 Probability
2.3 Infinity and infinitesimals
2.4 Geometry and topology


3 Decision theory
4 Physics

4.1 Astrophysics
4.2 Classical mechanics
4.3 Cosmology
4.4 Electromagnetism
4.5 Quantum mechanics
4.6 Relativity
4.7 Thermodynamics


5 Biology

5.1 Health and nutrition


6 Chemistry
7 Time travel
8 Linguistics and artificial intelligence
9 Philosophy
10 Mysticism
11 Economics
12 Perception
13 Politics
14 Psychology and sociology
15 Miscellaneous
16 See also
17 Notes



Logic[edit]

Barbershop paradox: The supposition that if one of two simultaneous assumptions leads to a contradiction, the other assumption is also disproved leads to paradoxical consequences. Not to be confused with the Barber paradox.
What the Tortoise Said to Achilles: "Whatever Logic is good enough to tell me is worth writing down...", also known as Carroll's paradox, not to be confused with the "Achilles and the tortoise" paradox by Zeno of Elea.
Catch-22: A situation in which someone is in need of something that can only be had by not being in need of it. A soldier who wants to be declared insane in order to avoid combat is deemed not insane for that very reason, and will therefore not be declared insane.
Drinker paradox: In any pub there is a customer of whom it is true to say: if that customer drinks, everybody in the pub drinks.
Paradox of entailment: Inconsistent premises always make an argument valid.
Lottery paradox: If there is one winning ticket in a large lottery, it is reasonable to believe of any particular lottery ticket that it is not the winning ticket, but it is not reasonable to believe that no lottery ticket will win.
Raven paradox: (or Hempel's Ravens): Observing a green apple increases the likelihood of all ravens being black.
Ross' paradox: Disjunction introduction poses a problem for imperative inference by seemingly permitting arbitrary imperatives to be inferred.
Unexpected hanging paradox: The day of the hanging will be a surprise, so it cannot happen at all, so it will be a surprise. The surprise examination and Bottle Imp paradox use similar logic.

Self-reference[edit]
These paradoxes have in common a contradiction arising from either self-reference or circular reference, in which several statements refer to each other in a way that following some of the references leads back to the starting point.

Barber paradox: A barber (who is a man) shaves all and only those men who do not shave themselves. Does he shave himself? (Russell's popularization of his set theoretic paradox.)
Bhartrhari's paradox: The thesis that there are some things which are unnameable conflicts with the notion that something is named by calling it unnameable.
Berry paradox: The phrase "the first number not nameable in under ten words" appears to name it in nine words.
Crocodile dilemma: If a crocodile steals a child and promises its return if the father can correctly guess exactly what the crocodile will do, how should the crocodile respond in the case that the father guesses that the child will not be returned?
Paradox of the Court: A law student agrees to pay his teacher after (and only after) winning his first case. The teacher then sues the student (who has not yet won a case) for payment.
Curry's paradox: "If this sentence is true, then Santa Claus exists."
Epimenides paradox: A Cretan says: "All Cretans are liars". This paradox works in mainly the same way as the Liar paradox.
Grelling–Nelson paradox: Is the word "heterological", meaning "not applicable to itself", a heterological word? (Another close relative of Russell's paradox.)
Kleene–Rosser paradox: By formulating an equivalent to Richard's paradox, untyped lambda calculus is shown to be inconsistent.
Liar paradox: "This sentence is false." This is the canonical self-referential paradox. Also "Is the answer to this question 'no'?", and "I'm lying."

Card paradox: "The next statement is true. The previous statement is false." A variant of the liar paradox that does not use self-reference.
Pinocchio paradox: What would happen if Pinocchio said "My nose will be growing"?[1]
Quine's paradox: "'Yields a falsehood when appended to its own quotation' yields a falsehood when appended to its own quotation." Shows that a sentence can be paradoxical even if it is not self-referring and does not use demonstratives or indexicals.
Yablo's paradox: An ordered infinite sequence of sentences, each of which says that all following sentences are false. While constructed to avoid self-reference, there is no consensus whether it relies on self-reference or not.


Opposite Day: "It is opposite day today." Therefore, it is not opposite day, but if you say it is a normal day it would be considered a normal day.
Petronius' paradox: "Moderation in all things, including moderation" (unsourced quotation sometimes attributed to Petronius).
Richard's paradox: We appear to be able to use simple English to define a decimal expansion in a way that is self-contradictory.
Russell's paradox: Does the set of all those sets that do not contain themselves contain itself?
Socratic paradox: "All I know is that I know nothing."

Vagueness[edit]

Ship of Theseus: It seems like you can replace any component of a ship, and it is still the same ship. So you can replace them all, one at a time, and it is still the same ship. However, you can then take all the original pieces, and assemble them into a ship. That, too, is the same ship you began with.


See also List of Ship of Theseus examples


Sorites paradox (also known as the paradox of the heap): If you remove a single grain of sand from a heap, you still have a heap. Keep removing single grains, and the heap will disappear. Can a single grain of sand make the difference between heap and non-heap?

Mathematics[edit]
See also: Category:Mathematics paradoxes and Paradoxes of set theory

All horses are the same color: A proof by induction that all horses have the same color.
Ant on a rubber rope: An ant crawling on a rubber rope can reach the end even when the rope stretches much faster than the ant can crawl.
Cramer's paradox: The number of points of intersection of two higher-order curves can be greater than the number of arbitrary points needed to define one such curve.
Elevator paradox: Elevators can seem to be mostly going in one direction, as if they were being manufactured in the middle of the building and being disassembled on the roof and basement.
Interesting number paradox: The first number that can be considered "dull" rather than "interesting" becomes interesting because of that fact.
Potato paradox: If you let potatoes consisting of 99% water dry so that they are 98% water, they lose 50% of their weight.
Russell's paradox: Does the set of all those sets that do not contain themselves contain itself?

Statistics[edit]
See also: Category:Statistical paradoxes

Abelson's paradox: Effect size may not be indicative of practical meaning.
Accuracy paradox: Predictive models with a given level of accuracy may have greater predictive power than models with higher accuracy.
Berkson's paradox: A complicating factor arising in statistical tests of proportions.
Freedman's paradox: Describes a problem in model selection where predictor variables with no explanatory power can appear artificially important.
Friendship paradox: For almost everyone, their friends have more friends than they do.
Inspection paradox: Why one will wait longer for a bus than one should.
Lindley's paradox: Tiny errors in the null hypothesis are magnified when large data sets are analyzed, leading to false but highly statistically significant results.
Low birth weight paradox: Low birth weight and mothers who smoke contribute to a higher mortality rate. Babies of smokers have lower average birth weight, but low birth weight babies born to smokers have a lower mortality rate than other low birth weight babies. This is a special case of Simpson's paradox.
Simpson's paradox, or the Yule–Simpson effect: A trend that appears in different groups of data disappears when these groups are combined, and the reverse trend appears for the aggregate data.
Will Rogers phenomenon: The mathematical concept of an average, whether defined as the mean or median, leads to apparently paradoxical results—for example, it is possible that moving an entry from an encyclopedia to a dictionary would increase the average entry length on both books.

Probability[edit]




The Monty Hall problem: which door do you choose?


See also: Category:Probability theory paradoxes

Bertrand's box paradox: A paradox of conditional probability closely related to the Boy or Girl paradox.
Bertrand's paradox: Different common-sense definitions of randomness give quite different results.
Birthday paradox: What is the chance that two people in a room have the same birthday?
Borel's paradox: Conditional probability density functions are not invariant under coordinate transformations.
Boy or Girl paradox: A two-child family has at least one boy. What is the probability that it has a girl?
Dartboard Puzzle: If a dart is guaranteed to hit a dartboard and the probability of hitting a specific point is positive, adding the infinitely many positive chances yields infinity, but the chance of hitting the dartboard is one. If the probability of hitting each point is zero, the probability of hitting anywhere on the dartboard is zero.[2]
False positive paradox: A test that is accurate the vast majority of the time could show you have a disease, but the probability that you actually have it could still be tiny.
Grice's paradox: Shows that the exact meaning of statements involving conditionals and probabilities is more complicated than may be obvious on casual examination.
Monty Hall problem: An unintuitive consequence of conditional probability.
Necktie paradox: A wager between two people seems to favour them both. Very similar in essence to the Two-envelope paradox.
Nontransitive dice: You can have three dice, called A, B, and C, such that A is likely to win in a roll against B, B is likely to win in a roll against C, and C is likely to win in a roll against A.
Proebsting's paradox: The Kelly criterion is an often optimal strategy for maximizing profit in the long run. Proebsting's paradox apparently shows that the Kelly criterion can lead to ruin.
Sleeping Beauty problem: A probability problem that can be correctly answered as one half or one third depending on how the question is approached.
Three cards problem: When pulling a random card, how do you determine the color of the underside?
Three Prisoners problem: A variation of the Monty Hall problem.
Two-envelope paradox: You are given two indistinguishable envelopes, each of which contains a positive sum of money. One envelope contains twice as much as the other. You may pick one envelope and keep whatever amount it contains. You pick one envelope at random but before you open it you are given the chance to take the other envelope instead.

Infinity and infinitesimals[edit]

Burali-Forti paradox: If the ordinal numbers formed a set, it would be an ordinal number that is smaller than itself.
Cantor's paradox: The set of all sets would have its own power set as a subset, therefore its cardinality would be at least as great as that of its power set. But Cantor's theorem proves that power sets are strictly greater than the sets they are constructed from. Consequently, the set of all sets would contain a subset greater than itself.
Galileo's paradox: Though most numbers are not squares, there are no more numbers than squares. (See also Cantor's diagonal argument)
Hilbert's paradox of the Grand Hotel: If a hotel with infinitely many rooms is full, it can still take in more guests.
Russell's paradox: Does the set of all those sets that do not contain themselves contain itself?
Skolem's paradox: Countably infinite models of set theory contain uncountably infinite sets.
Zeno's paradoxes: "You will never reach point B from point A as you must always get half-way there, and half of the half, and half of that half, and so on." (This is also a physical paradox.)
Supertasks may result in paradoxes such as




Benardete's paradox: Apparently, a man can be "forced to stay where he is by the mere unfulfilled intentions of the gods".
Grandi's series: The sum of 1-1+1-1+1-1... can be either one, zero, or one-half.
Ross–Littlewood paradox: After alternately adding and removing balls to a vase infinitely often, how many balls remain?
Thomson's lamp: After flicking a lamp on and off infinitely often, is it on or off?



Geometry and topology[edit]




The Banach–Tarski paradox: A ball can be decomposed and reassembled into two balls the same size as the original.



Banach–Tarski paradox: Cut a ball into a finite number of pieces and re-assemble the pieces to get two balls, each of equal size to the first. The von Neumann paradox is a two-dimensional analogue.

Paradoxical set: A set that can be partitioned into two sets, each of which is equivalent to the original.


Coastline paradox: the perimeter of a landmass is in general ill-defined.
Coin rotation paradox: a coin rotating along the edge of an identical coin will make a full revolution after traversing only half of the stationary coin's circumference.
Gabriel's Horn: or Torricelli's trumpet: A simple object with finite volume but infinite surface area. Also, the Mandelbrot set and various other fractals are covered by a finite area, but have an infinite perimeter (in fact, there are no two distinct points on the boundary of the Mandelbrot set that can be reached from one another by moving a finite distance along that boundary, which also implies that in a sense you go no further if you walk "the wrong way" around the set to reach a nearby point). This can be represented by a Klein bottle.
Hausdorff paradox: There exists a countable subset C of the sphere S such that S\C is equidecomposable with two copies of itself.
Nikodym set: A set contained in and with the same Lebesgue measure as the unit square, yet for every one of its points there is a straight line intersecting the Nikodym set only in that point.
Sphere eversion: A sphere can, topologically, be turned inside out.

Decision theory[edit]

Abilene paradox: People can make decisions based not on what they actually want to do, but on what they think that other people want to do, with the result that everybody decides to do something that nobody really wants to do, but only what they thought that everybody else wanted to do.
Apportionment paradox: Some systems of apportioning representation can have unintuitive results due to rounding

Alabama paradox: Increasing the total number of seats might shrink one block's seats.
New states paradox: Adding a new state or voting block might increase the number of votes of another.
Population paradox: A fast-growing state can lose votes to a slow-growing state.


Arrow's paradox: Given more than two choices, no system can have all the attributes of an ideal voting system at once.
Buridan's ass: How can a rational choice be made between two outcomes of equal value?
Chainstore paradox: Even those who know better play the so-called chain store game in an irrational manner.
Decision-making paradox: Selecting the best decision-making method is a decision problem in itself.
Fenno's paradox: The belief that people generally disapprove of the United States Congress as a whole, but support the Congressman from their own Congressional district.
Fredkin's paradox: The more similar two choices are, the more time a decision-making agent spends on deciding.
Green paradox: Policies intending to reduce future CO2 emissions may lead to increased emissions in the present.
Hedgehog's dilemma: or Lover's paradox Despite goodwill, human intimacy cannot occur without substantial mutual harm.
Inventor's paradox: It is easier to solve a more general problem that covers the specifics of the sought-after solution.
Kavka's toxin puzzle: Can one intend to drink the non-deadly toxin, if the intention is the only thing needed to get the reward?
Morton's fork: Choosing between unpalatable alternatives.
Navigation paradox: Increased navigational precision may result in increased collision risk.
Newcomb's paradox: How do you play a game against an omniscient opponent?
Paradox of tolerance: Should one tolerate intolerance if intolerance would destroy the possibility of tolerance?
Paradox of voting: Also known as the Downs paradox. For a rational, self-interested voter the costs of voting will normally exceed the expected benefits, so why do people keep voting?
Parrondo's paradox: It is possible to play two losing games alternately to eventually win.
Prevention paradox: For one person to benefit, many people have to change their behavior — even though they receive no benefit, or even suffer, from the change.
Prisoner's dilemma: Two people might not cooperate even if it is in both their best interests to do so.
Voting paradox: Also known as Condorcet's paradox and paradox of voting. A group of separately rational individuals may have preferences that are irrational in the aggregate.
Willpower paradox: Those who kept their minds open were more goal-directed and more motivated than those who declared their objective to themselves.

Physics[edit]
For more details on this topic, see Physical paradox.


Play media


A demonstration of the tea leaf paradox



Cool tropics paradox: A contradiction between modelled estimates of tropical temperatures during warm, ice-free periods of the Cretaceous and Eocene, and the lower temperatures that proxies suggest were present.
Irresistible force paradox: What would happen if an unstoppable force hit an immovable object?
Paradox of Place: If everything that exist has a place, that place must have a place, and so on ad infinitum.
Paradox of the grain of millet: When a grain of millet falls it makes no sound, but when a thousand grains fall they do, thus many of nothing become something.
The Moving Rows

Astrophysics[edit]

Algol paradox: In some binaries the partners seem to have different ages, even though they are thought to have formed at the same time.
Faint young Sun paradox: The contradiction between existence of liquid water early in the Earth's history and the expectation that the output of the young Sun would have been insufficient to melt ice on Earth.
GZK paradox: Extreme-energy cosmic rays have been observed that seem to violate the Greisen–Zatsepin–Kuzmin limit, which is a consequence of special relativity.
Paradox of youth: Compared to theory, there is an overabundance of young stars close to the supermassive black hole in the Galactic Center.

Classical mechanics[edit]

Achilles and the tortoise: If the tortoise is ahead of achilles, by the time Achilles reaches the tortoise's current position, the tortoise will have moved a bit further ahead, which goes on indefinitely.
Archer's paradox: An archer must, in order to hit his target, not aim directly at it, but slightly to the side. Not to be confused with the arrow paradox.
Arrow paradox If we divide time into discrete 0-duration slices, no motion is happening in each of them, so taking them all as a whole, motion is impossible.
Hydrostatic paradox: A massive battleship can float in a few litres of water.
Aristotle's wheel paradox: Rolling joined concentric wheels seem to trace the same distance with their circumferences, even though the circumferences are different.
Carroll's paradox: The angular momentum of a stick should be zero, but is not.
D'Alembert's paradox: Flow of an inviscid fluid produces no net force on a solid body.
Knudsen paradox: Based on the Navier–Stokes equations, one would expect the mass flux in a channel to decrease with increasing Knudsen number, but there is a distinct minimum around Knudsen number 0.8.
Denny's paradox: Surface-dwelling arthropods (such as the water strider) should not be able to propel themselves horizontally.
Dichotomy paradox: To reach its target, an airborne arrow must first reach an infinite number of midpoints between its current position and the target.
Elevator paradox: Even though hydrometers are used to measure fluid density, a hydrometer will not indicate changes of fluid density caused by changing atmospheric pressure.
Feynman sprinkler: Which way does a sprinkler rotate when submerged in a tank and made to suck in the surrounding fluid?
Painlevé paradox: Rigid-body dynamics with contact and friction is inconsistent.
Tea leaf paradox: When a cup of tea is stirred, the leaves assemble in the center, even though centrifugal force pushes them outward.
Upstream contamination: When a fluid is poured from a higher container onto a lower one, particles can climb up the falling water.

Cosmology[edit]

Bentley's paradox: In a Newtonian universe, gravitation should pull all matter into a single point.
Boltzmann brain: If the universe we observe resulted from a random thermodynamic fluctuation, it would be vastly more likely to be a simple one than the complex one we observe. The simplest case would be just a brain floating in vacuum, having the thoughts and sensations you have.
Fermi paradox: If there are, as various arguments suggest, many other sentient species in the Universe, then where are they? Shouldn't their presence be obvious?
Heat death paradox: If the universe was infinitely old, it would be in thermodynamical equilibrium, which contradicts what we observe.
Olbers' paradox: Why is the night sky dark if there is an infinity of stars, covering every part of the celestial sphere?

Electromagnetism[edit]

Faraday paradox: An apparent violation of Faraday's law of electromagnetic induction.

Quantum mechanics[edit]

Aharonov–Bohm effect: a charged particle is affected by an electromagnetic field even though it has no local contact with that field
Bell's theorem: Why do measured quantum particles not satisfy mathematical probability theory?
Double-slit experiment: Matter and energy can act as a wave or as a particle depending on the experiment.
Einstein–Podolsky–Rosen paradox: Can far away events influence each other in quantum mechanics?
Extinction paradox: In the small wavelength limit, the total scattering cross section of an impenetrable sphere is twice its geometrical cross-sectional area (which is the value obtained in classical mechanics).[3]
Hardy's paradox: How can we make inferences about past events that we haven't observed while at the same time acknowledge that the act of observing it affects the reality we are inferring to?
Klein paradox: When the potential of a potential barrier becomes similar to the mass of the impinging particle, it becomes transparent.
Mott problem: Spherically symmetric wave functions, when observed, produce linear particle tracks.
Quantum LC circuit paradox: Energies stored on capacitance and inductance are not equal to the ground state energy of the quantum oscillator.[citation needed]
Quantum pseudo-telepathy: Two players who can not communicate accomplish tasks that seemingly require direct contact.
Quantum Zeno effect: (Turing paradox) echoing the Zeno paradox, a quantum particle that is continuously observed cannot change its state
Schrödinger's cat paradox: According to the Copenhagen interpretation of quantum mechanics, a cat could be simultaneously alive and dead, as long as it remains unobserved.
Uncertainty principle: Attempts to determine position must disturb momentum, and vice versa.

Relativity[edit]

Bell's spaceship paradox: concerning relativity.
Black hole information paradox: Black holes violate a commonly assumed tenet of science that information cannot be destroyed.
Ehrenfest paradox: On the kinematics of a rigid rotating disk.
Ladder paradox: A classic relativity problem.
Mocanu's velocity composition paradox: a paradox in special relativity.
Supplee's paradox: the buoyancy of a relativistic object (such as a bullet) appears to change when the reference frame is changed from one in which the bullet is at rest to one in which the fluid is at rest.
Trouton-Noble or Right-angle lever paradox: Does a torque arise in static systems when changing frames?
Twin paradox: The theory of relativity predicts that a person making a round trip will return younger than his or her identical twin who stayed at home.

Thermodynamics[edit]

Gibbs paradox: In an ideal gas, is entropy an extensive variable?
Loschmidt's paradox: Why is there an inevitable increase in entropy when the laws of physics are invariant under time reversal? The time reversal symmetry of physical laws appears to contradict the second law of thermodynamics.
Maxwell's demon: The second law of thermodynamics seems to be violated by a cleverly operated trapdoor.[4]
Mpemba effect: Hot water can, under certain conditions, freeze faster than cold water, even though it must pass the lower temperature on the way to freezing.
Duncan's Paradox: Gas-surface reactions create either steady-state temperature or pressure differentials that can be used in perpetual motion machines.[5][6]


Schmidt's Paradox (In Russian): – the contradiction (discovered in 1917) between the observed vertical turbulent heat flux in the surface layer and the theory of heat conduction in the atmosphere .

Biology[edit]

Antarctic paradox: In some areas of the oceans, phytoplankton concentrations are low despite there apparently being sufficient nutrients.
C-value enigma: Genome size does not correlate with organismal complexity. For example, some unicellular organisms have genomes much larger than that of humans.
Cole's paradox: Even a tiny fecundity advantage of one additional offspring would favor the evolution of semelparity.
Gray's paradox: Despite their relatively small muscle mass, dolphins can swim at high speeds and obtain large accelerations.
Hormesis: Exposure to small doses of toxins can have beneficial effects.
Lek paradox: Persistent female choice for particular male trait values should erode genetic variance in male traits and thereby remove the benefits of choice, yet choice persists.
Lombard's paradox: When rising to stand from a sitting or squatting position, both the hamstrings and quadriceps contract at the same time, despite their being antagonists to each other.
Paradox of enrichment: Increasing the food available to an ecosystem may lead to instability, and even to extinction.
Paradox of the pesticides: Applying pesticide to a pest may increase the pest's abundance.
Paradox of the plankton: Why are there so many different species of phytoplankton, even though competition for the same resources tends to reduce the number of species?
Sherman paradox: An anomalous pattern of inheritance in the fragile X syndrome.
Temporal paradox (paleontology): When did the ancestors of birds live?

Health and nutrition[edit]

French paradox: The observation that the French suffer a relatively low incidence of coronary heart disease, despite having a diet relatively rich in saturated fats, which are assumed to be the leading dietary cause of such disease.
Glucose paradox: The large amount of glycogen in the liver cannot be explained by its small glucose absorption.
Hispanic paradox: The finding that Hispanics in the United States tend to have substantially better health than the average population in spite of what their aggregate socio-economic indicators predict.
Israeli paradox: The observation that Israelis suffer a relatively high incidence of coronary heart disease, despite having a diet very low in saturated fats, which are assumed to be the leading dietary cause of such disease.
Meditation paradox: The amplitude of heart rate oscillations during meditation was significantly greater than in the pre-meditation control state and also in three non-meditation control groups[7]
Mexican paradox: Mexican children tend to have higher birth weights than can be expected from their socio-economic status.
Obesity survival paradox: Although the negative health consequences of obesity in the general population are well supported by the available evidence, health outcomes in certain subgroups seem to be improved at an increased BMI.
Peto's paradox: Humans and other small-to-medium-sized mammals get cancer with high frequency, while larger mammals, like whales, do not. If cancer is essentially a negative outcome lottery at the cell level, and larger organisms have more cells, and thus more potentially cancerous cell divisions, one would expect larger organisms to be more predisposed to cancer.
Pulsus paradoxus: A pulsus paradoxus is an exaggerated decrease in systolic blood pressure during inspiration. It can indicate certain medical conditions in which there is reduced cardiac output, such as cardiac tamponade or constrictive pericarditis. Also known as the Pulse Paradox.[8]
Second wind: The "second wind" is a sudden period of increased wakefulness in individuals deprived of sleep that tends to coincide with the individual's circadian rhythm. Although the individual is more wakeful and aware of their surroundings, they are continuing to accrue sleep debt and thus, are actually exacerbating their sleep deprivation.

Chemistry[edit]

Faraday paradox (electrochemistry): Diluted nitric acid will corrode steel, while concentrated nitric acid will not.
Levinthal paradox: The length of time that it takes for a protein chain to find its folded state is many orders of magnitude shorter than it would be if it freely searched all possible configurations.
SAR paradox: Exceptions to the principle that a small change in a molecule causes a small change in its chemical behaviour are frequently profound.

Time travel[edit]

Bootstrap paradox, (also ontological paradox) Can a time traveler send himself information with no outside source?
Polchinski's paradox: A billiard ball can be thrown into a wormhole in such a way that it would emerge in the past and knock its incoming past self away from the wormhole entrance, creating a variant of the grandfather paradox.
Predestination paradox: A man travels back in time to discover the cause of a famous fire. While in the building where the fire started, he accidentally knocks over a kerosene lantern and causes a fire, the same fire that would inspire him, years later, to travel back in time. The bootstrap paradox is closely tied to this, in which, as a result of time travel, information or objects appear to have no beginning.
Temporal paradox: What happens when a time traveler does things in the past that prevent him from doing them in the first place?




Grandfather paradox: You travel back in time and kill your grandfather before he conceives one of your parents, which precludes your own conception and, therefore, you couldn't go back in time and kill your grandfather.
Hitler's murder paradox: You travel back in time and kill a famous person in history before they become famous; but if the person had never been famous, then he could not have been targeted as a famous person.



Linguistics and artificial intelligence[edit]

Bracketing paradox: Is a "historical linguist" a linguist who is historical, or someone who studies "historical linguistics"?
Code-talker paradox: How can a language both enable communication and block communication?
Moravec's paradox: Logical thought is hard for humans and easy for computers, but picking a screw from a box of screws is an unsolved problem.
Movement paradox: In transformational linguistics, there are pairs of sentences in which the sentence without movement is ungrammatical while the sentence with movement is not.
Sayre's paradox: In automated handwriting recognition, a cursively written word cannot be recognized without being segmented and cannot be segmented without being recognized.

Philosophy[edit]

Paradox of analysis: It seems that no conceptual analysis can meet the requirements both of correctness and of informativeness.
Buridan's bridge: Will Plato throw Socrates into the water or not?
Paradox of fiction: How can people experience strong emotions from purely fictional things?
Fitch's paradox: If all truths are knowable, then all truths must in fact be known.
Paradox of free will: If God knows in advance how we will decide, how can there be free will?
Goodman's paradox: Why can induction be used to confirm that things are "green", but not to confirm that things are "grue"?
Paradox of hedonism: When one pursues happiness itself, one is miserable; but, when one pursues something else, one achieves happiness.
Hutton's Paradox: If asking oneself "Am I dreaming?" in a dream proves that one is, what does it prove in waking life?
Liberal paradox: "Minimal Liberty" is incompatible with Pareto optimality.
Meno's paradox: (Learner's paradox) A man cannot search either for what he knows or for what he does not know.
Mere addition paradox: (Parfit's paradox) Is a large population living a barely tolerable life better than a small, happy population?
Moore's paradox: "It's raining, but I don't believe that it is."
Newcomb's paradox: A paradoxical game between two players, one of whom can predict the actions of the other.
Paradox of nihilism: Several distinct paradoxes share this name.
Omnipotence paradox: Can an omnipotent being create a rock too heavy for itself to lift?
Preface paradox: The author of a book may be justified in believing that all his statements in the book are correct, at the same time believing that at least one of them is incorrect.
Problem of evil: (Epicurean paradox) The existence of evil seems to be incompatible with the existence of an omnipotent, omniscient, and morally perfect God.
Rule-following paradox: Even though rules are intended to determine actions, "no course of action could be determined by a rule, because any course of action can be made out to accord with the rule".
When a white horse is not a horse: White horses are not horses because white and horse refer to different things.
Zeno's paradoxes: "You will never reach point B from point A as you must always get half-way there, and half of the half, and half of that half, and so on ..." (This is also a paradox of the infinite)

Mysticism[edit]

Maya_(illusion): Our illusions are not real, yet it's real that illusion itself exists.


Tzimtzum: In Kabbalah, how to reconcile self-awareness of finite Creation with Infinite Divine source, as an emanated causal chain would seemingly nullify existence. Luria's initial withdrawal of God in Hasidic panentheism involves simultaneous illusionism of Creation (Upper Unity) and self-aware existence (Lower Unity), God encompassing logical opposites.

Economics[edit]
See also: Category:Economics paradoxes
One class of paradoxes in economics are the paradoxes of competition, in which behavior that benefits a lone actor would leave everyone worse off if everyone did the same. These paradoxes are classified into circuit, classical and Marx paradoxes.

Allais paradox: A change in a possible outcome that is shared by different alternatives affects people's choices among those alternatives, in contradiction with expected utility theory.
The Antitrust Paradox:[dubious – discuss]: A book arguing that antitrust enforcement artificially raised prices by protecting inefficient competitors from competition.
Arrow information paradox: To sell information you need to give it away before the sale.
Bertrand paradox: Two players reaching a state of Nash equilibrium both find themselves with no profits gained via exploitation.
Braess' paradox: Adding extra capacity to a network can reduce overall performance.
Deaton paradox: Consumption varies surprisingly smoothly despite sharp variations in income.
Demographic-economic paradox: nations or subpopulations with higher GDP per capita are observed to have fewer children, even though a richer population can support more children.
Downs–Thomson paradox: Increasing road capacity at the expense of investments in public transport can make overall congestion on the road worse.
Easterlin paradox: For countries with income sufficient to meet basic needs, the reported level of happiness does not correlate with national income per person.
Edgeworth paradox: With capacity constraints, there may not be an equilibrium.
Ellsberg paradox: People exhibit ambiguity aversion (as distinct from risk aversion), in contradiction with expected utility theory.
European paradox: The perceived failure of European countries to translate scientific advances into marketable innovations.
Gibson's paradox: Why were interest rates and prices correlated?
Giffen paradox: Increasing the price of bread makes poor people eat more of it.
Grossman-Stiglitz paradox: Inability to recoup cost of obtaining market information implies efficient markets cannot exist.
Icarus paradox: Some businesses bring about their own downfall through their own successes.
Jevons paradox: Increases in efficiency lead to even larger increases in demand.
Leontief paradox: Some countries export labor-intensive commodities and import capital-intensive commodities, in contradiction with the Heckscher–Ohlin theorem.
Lucas paradox: Capital is not flowing from developed countries to developing countries despite the fact that developing countries have lower levels of capital per worker, and therefore higher returns to capital.
Mandeville's paradox: Actions that may be vicious to individuals may benefit society as a whole.
Mayfield's paradox: Keeping everyone out of an information system is impossible, but so is getting everybody in.
Metzler paradox: The imposition of a tariff on imports may reduce the relative internal price of that good.
Paradox of prosperity: Why do generations that significantly improve the economic climate seem to generally rear a successor generation that consumes rather than produces?
Paradox of thrift: If everyone saves more money during times of recession, then aggregate demand will fall and will in turn lower total savings in the population.
Paradox of toil: If everyone tries to work during times of recession, lower wages will reduce prices, leading to more deflationary expectations, leading to further thrift, reducing demand and thereby reducing employment.
Paradox of value, also known as diamond-water paradox: Water is more useful than diamonds, yet is a lot cheaper.
Productivity paradox: (also known as Solow computer paradox): Worker productivity may go down, despite technological improvements.
Scitovsky paradox: Using the Kaldor–Hicks criterion, an allocation A may be more efficient than allocation B, while at the same time B is more efficient than A.
Service recovery paradox: Successfully fixing a problem with a defective product may lead to higher consumer satisfaction than in the case where no problem occurred at all.
St. Petersburg paradox: People will only offer a modest fee for a reward of infinite expected value.
Paradox of Plenty: The Paradox of Plenty (resource curse) refers to the paradox that countries and regions with an abundance of natural resources, specifically point-source non-renewable resources like minerals and fuels, tend to have less economic growth and worse development outcomes than countries with fewer natural resources.
Throw away paradox: A trader can gain by throwing away some of his/her initial endowment.
Tullock paradox: Bribing politicians costs less than one would expect, considering how much profit it can yield.

Perception[edit]
For more details on this topic, see Perceptual paradox.




the vertical–horizontal illusion



Tritone paradox: An auditory illusion in which a sequentially played pair of Shepard tones is heard as ascending by some people and as descending by others.
Blub paradox: Cognitive lock of some experienced programmers that prevents them from properly evaluating the quality of programming languages which they do not know.[9]
Optical illusion: A visual illusion which suggests inconsistency, such as an impossible cube or the vertical-horizontal illusion, where the two lines are exactly the same length but appear to be of different lengths.

Politics[edit]

Stability–instability paradox: When two countries each have nuclear weapons, the probability of a direct war between them greatly decreases, but the probability of minor or indirect conflicts between them increases.
Wollheim's paradox: A person can simultaneously advocate two conflicting policy options, A and B, provided that the person believes that democratic decisions should be followed.

Psychology and sociology[edit]

Gender paradox: Women conform more closely than men to sociolinguistics norms that are overtly prescribed, but conform less than men when they are not.
Ironic process theory: Ironic processing is the psychological process whereby an individual's deliberate attempts to suppress or avoid certain thoughts (thought suppression) renders those thoughts more persistent.
Meat paradox: People care about animals, but embrace diets that involve harming them.
Moral paradox: A situation in which moral imperatives clash without clear resolution.
Outcomes paradox: Schizophrenia patients in developing countries seem to fare better than their Western counterparts.[10]
Region-beta paradox: People can sometimes recover more quickly from more intense emotions or pain than from less distressing experiences.
Self-absorption paradox: The contradictory association whereby higher levels of self-awareness are simultaneously associated with higher levels of psychological distress and with psychological well-being.[11]
Stapp's ironical paradox: "The universal aptitude for ineptitude makes any human accomplishment an incredible miracle."
Status paradox: Several paradoxes involve the concept of medical or social status.
Stockdale paradox: "You must never confuse faith that you will prevail in the end—which you can never afford to lose—with the discipline to confront the most brutal facts of your current reality, whatever they might be."
The Paradox of Anti-Semitism: A book arguing that the lack of external persecutions and antagonisms results in the dissolution of Jewish identity, a theory that resonates in works of Dershowitz and Sartre.

Miscellaneous[edit]

Absence paradox: No one is ever "here".
Bonini's paradox: Models or simulations that explain the workings of complex systems are seemingly impossible to construct. As a model of a complex system becomes more complete, it becomes less understandable, for it to be more understandable it must be less complete and therefore less accurate. When the model becomes accurate, it is just as difficult to understand as the real-world processes it represents.
Buttered cat paradox: Humorous example of a paradox from contradicting proverbs.
Intentionally blank page: Many documents contain pages on which the text "This page is intentionally left blank" is printed, thereby making the page not blank.
Observer's paradox: The outcome of an event or experiment is influenced by the presence of the observer.

See also[edit]


Logic portal



Auto-antonym: A word that is encoded with opposing meanings.
Absurdity
Excusable negligence: If a behavior is excusable, it is not negligence.
Gödel's incompleteness theorems: and Tarski's undefinability theorem
Ignore all rules: To obey this rule, it is necessary to ignore it.
Impossible object: A type of optical illusion.
Invalid proof: An apparently correct mathematical derivation that leads to an obvious contradiction.
Logical fallacy: A misconception resulting from incorrect reasoning in argumentation.
Paradox gun: A gun that has characteristics of both (smoothbore) shotguns and rifles.
Paradoxical laughter: Inappropriate laughter, often recognized as such by the laughing person.
Performative contradiction: Some statements contradict the conditions that allow them to be stated.
Proof that 0.999... equals 1
Puzzle
Self-refuting idea
Theories of humor: Incongruity theory and the Ridiculous.

Notes[edit]


^ Eldridge-Smith, Peter; Eldridge-Smith, Veronique (13 January 2010). "The Pinocchio paradox". Analysis. 70 (2): 212–215. ISSN 1467-8284. doi:10.1093/analys/anp173. Retrieved 23 July 2010. 
As of 2010[update], an image of Pinocchio with a speech bubble "My nose will grow now!" has become a minor Internet phenomenon (Google search, Google image search). It seems likely that this paradox has been independently conceived multiple times.
^ Numberphile (2013-07-15), Infinity Paradoxes - Numberphile, retrieved 2016-05-30 
^ Newton, Roger G. (2002). Scattering Theory of Waves and Particles, second edition. Dover Publications. p. 68. ISBN 0-486-42535-5. 
^ Carnap is quoted as saying in 1977 "... the situation with respect to Maxwell's paradox", in Leff, Harvey S.; Rex, A. F., eds. (2003). Maxwell's Demon 2: Entropy, Classical and Quantum Information, Computing (PDF). Institute of Physics. p. 19. ISBN 0-7503-0759-5. Archived from the original (PDF) on 2005-11-09. Retrieved 15 March 2010. 
On page 36, Leff and Rex also quote Goldstein and Goldstein as saying "Smoluchowski fully resolved the paradox of the demon in 1912" in Goldstein, Martin; Goldstein, Inge F. (1993). The Refrigerator and The Universe. Universities Press (India) Pvt. Ltd. p. 228. ISBN 978-81-7371-085-8. OCLC 477206415. Retrieved 15 March 2010. 
^ T.L. Duncan, Phys. Rev. E 61, 4661 (2000).
^ Sheehan, D.P., D.J. Mallin, J.T. Garamella, and W.F. Sheehan, Found. Phys. 44 235 (2014).
^ Peng, C.-K; Isaac C Henry; Joseph E Mietus; Jeffrey M Hausdorff; Gurucharan Khalsa; Herbert Benson; Ary L Goldberger (May 2004). "Heart rate dynamics during three forms of meditation". International Journal of Cardiology. 95 (1): 19–27. PMID 15159033. doi:10.1016/j.ijcard.2003.02.006. Retrieved 23 May 2012. 
^ Khasnis, A.; Lokhandwala, Y. (Jan–Mar 2002). "Clinical signs in medicine: pulsus paradoxus". Journal of Postgraduate Medicine. Mumbai – 400 012, India: 49. 48 (1): 46–9. ISSN 0022-3859. PMID 12082330. Retrieved 21 March 2010. The "paradox" refers to the fact that heart sounds may be heard over the precordium when the radial pulse is not felt. 
^ Hidders, J. "Expressive Power of Recursion and Aggregates in XQuery" (PDF). Retrieved 23 May 2012. : Chapter 1, Introduction.
^ Developing countries: The outcomes paradox Nature.com
^ Trapnell, P. D., & Campbell, J. D. (1999). "Private self-consciousness and the Five-Factor Model of Personality: Distinguishing rumination from reflection". Journal of Personality and Social Psychology, 76, 284–304.








v
t
e


Logic






Outline
History





Fields



Argumentation theory
Axiology
Critical thinking
Logic in computer science
Mathematical logic
Metalogic
Metamathematics
Non-classical logic
Philosophical logic
Philosophy of logic
Set theory





Foundations



Abduction
Analytic and synthetic propositions
Antinomy
A priori and a posteriori
Deduction
Definition
Description
Induction
Inference
Logical form
Logical consequence
Logical truth
Name
Necessity and sufficiency
Meaning
Paradox
Possible world
Presupposition
Probability
Reason
Reference
Semantics
Statement
Strict implication
Substitution
Syntax
Truth
Validity





Lists




topics



Mathematical logic
Boolean algebra
Set theory





other



Logicians
Rules of inference
Paradoxes
Fallacies
Logic symbols











Portal
Category
WikiProject (talk)
changes












v
t
e


Decision theory paradoxes






Abilene
Apportionment
Arrow's
Buridan's ass
Chainstore
Condorcet's
Decision-making
Downs
Ellsberg
Fenno's
Fredkin's
Green
Hedgehog's
Inventor's
Kavka's toxin puzzle
Morton's fork
Navigation
Newcomb's
Parrondo's
Prevention
Prisoner's dilemma
Tolerance
Willpower









List of paradoxes










v
t
e


Economic paradoxes (list)






Allais
Antitrust
Arrow information
Bertrand
Braess's
Competition
Income and fertility
Downs–Thomson
Easterlin
Edgeworth
Ellsberg
European
Gibson's
Giffen good
Icarus
Jevons
Leontief
Lucas
Mandeville's
Mayfield's
Metzler
Plenty
Productivity
Prosperity
Scitovsky
Service recovery
St. Petersburg
Thrift
Toil
Tullock
Value












v
t
e


Logical paradoxes



Self-reference



Barber
Berry
Bhartrhari's
Court
Crocodile
Curry's
Epimenides
Grelling–Nelson
Kleene–Rosser
Liar

Card
Pinocchio
Quine's
Yablo's


Richard's
Russell's
Socratic








Vagueness



Theseus' ship
Sorites





Other paradoxes



Barbershop
Catch-22
Drinker
Entailment
Lottery
Plato's beard
Raven
Ross'
Unexpected hanging






List of paradoxes










v
t
e


Philosophical paradoxes (list)






Analysis
Buridan's bridge
Dream argument
Epicurean
Fiction
Fitch's knowability
Free will
Goodman's
Hedonism
Liberal
Meno's
Mere addition
Moore's
Newcomb's
Nihilism
Omnipotence
Preface
Rule-following
White horse
Zeno's













 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=List_of_paradoxes&oldid=791566219#Economics"					
Categories: ParadoxesLists related to philosophical problemsHidden categories: Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2010All articles containing potentially dated statementsAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from April 2010All accuracy disputesArticles with disputed statements from February 2014Use dmy dates from October 2010Articles containing video clips 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةবাংলাفارسیFrançaisहिन्दीOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаPortuguêsРусскийSlovenščinaSuomiTürkçeУкраїнськаZazaki 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 21 July 2017, at 02:57.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Curry's paradox - WikiVisually





























WikiVisually




the entire wiki with video and photo galleriesfind something interesting to watch in seconds































FEATURED

ARTICLES /




·


VIDEO PICKER


·


LANGUAGE



·

hover over links in text for more info


























click links in text for more info

























Curry's paradox

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For Paul Curry's optical illusion and dissection puzzle, see Missing square puzzle.
Curry's paradox is a paradox that occurs in naive set theory or naive logics, and allows the derivation of an arbitrary sentence from a self-referring sentence and some apparently innocuous logical deduction rules. The paradox is named after the logician Haskell Curry. The paradox may be expressed in natural language and in various mathematical settings, including certain forms of set theory, lambda calculus, and combinatory logic.
It has also been called Löb's paradox after Martin Hugo Löb,[1] due to its relationship to Löb's theorem.



Contents


1 Informal Proof
2 Formal Proof

2.1 Sentential Logic
2.2 Naive set theory


3 Discussion

3.1 Terminology
3.2 Existence problem
3.3 Language capabilities for expressing the paradox
3.4 Consequences for some formal logic


4 Resolution

4.1 No resolution in lambda calculus

4.1.1 Domain of lambda calculus terms


4.2 Resolution in unrestricted languages
4.3 Resolution in formal logic
4.4 Resolution in set theory


5 See also
6 References
7 External links



Informal Proof[edit]
The standard method for proving conditional sentences (sentences of the form "if A, then B") is called a "conditional proof". For the sake of argument, A is assumed and then with that assumption B is shown to be true.
Because A refers to the overall sentence, this means that assuming A is the same as assuming "If A, then B". Therefore, in assuming A, we have assumed both A and "If A, then B". Therefore B is true, and we have proven "If this sentence is true, then 'Germany borders China' is true." Therefore Germany borders China.
To put it another way, let us consider both cases. If we assume the sentence is true, then Germany must border China. But Germany does not border China. However, in formal logic, when the second part of a conditional claim is proven false, the sentence as a whole is given the benefit of the doubt and declared true. So, the very fact that Germany does not border China proves our original sentence: "if this sentence is true, then Germany borders China."
Formal Proof[edit]
Sentential Logic[edit]
The example in the previous section used unformalized, natural-language reasoning. Curry's paradox also occurs in some varieties of formal logic. In this context, it shows that if we assume there is a formal sentence (X → Y), where X itself is equivalent to (X → Y), then we can prove Y with a formal proof. One example of such a formal proof is as follows. For an explanation of the logic notation used in this section, refer to the list of logic symbols.

X := (X → Y)

assumption, the starting point, equivalent to "If this sentence is true, then Y"


X → X

law of identity


X → (X → Y)

substitute right side of 2, since X is equivalent to X → Y by 1


X → Y

from 3 by contraction


X

substitute 4, by 1


Y

from 5 and 4 by modus ponens



An alternative proof is via Peirce's law. If X = X → Y then (X → Y) → X. This together with Peirce's law ((X → Y) → X) → X and modus ponens implies X and subsequently Y (as in above proof).
Therefore, if Y is an unprovable statement in a formal system, there is no statement X in that system such that X is equivalent to the implication (X → Y). By contrast, the previous section shows that in natural (unformalized) language, for every natural language statement Y there is a natural language statement Z such that Z is equivalent to (Z → Y) in natural language. Namely, Z is "If this sentence is true then Y".
In specific cases where the classification of Y is already known, few steps are needed to reveal the contradiction. For example, when Y is "Germany borders China," it is known that Y is false.

X = (X → Y)

assumption


X = (X → false)

substitute known value of Y


X = (¬X ∨ false)

implication


X = ¬X

identity



Naive set theory[edit]
Even if the underlying mathematical logic does not admit any self-referential sentences, certain forms of naive set theory are still vulnerable to Curry's paradox. In set theories which allow unrestricted comprehension, we can nevertheless prove any logical statement Y by examining the set





X
 




=



d
e
f





 

{
x
∣
x
∈
x
→
Y
}

.


{\displaystyle X\ {\stackrel {\mathrm {def} }{=}}\ \left\{x\mid x\in x\to Y\right\}.}



Assuming that 



∈


{\displaystyle \in }

 takes precedence over both 



→


{\displaystyle \to }

 and 



↔


{\displaystyle \leftrightarrow }

, the proof proceeds as follows:





X
=

{
x
∣
x
∈
x
→
Y
}



{\displaystyle X=\left\{x\mid x\in x\to Y\right\}}



Definition of X






x
=
X
→
(
x
∈
x
↔
X
∈
X
)


{\displaystyle x=X\to (x\in x\leftrightarrow X\in X)}



Substitution of equal sets in membership






x
=
X
→
(
(
x
∈
x
→
Y
)
↔
(
X
∈
X
→
Y
)
)


{\displaystyle x=X\to ((x\in x\to Y)\leftrightarrow (X\in X\to Y))}



Addition of a consequent to both sides of a biconditional (from 2)






X
∈
X
↔
(
X
∈
X
→
Y
)


{\displaystyle X\in X\leftrightarrow (X\in X\to Y)}



Law of concretion (from 1 and 3)






X
∈
X
→
(
X
∈
X
→
Y
)


{\displaystyle X\in X\to (X\in X\to Y)}



Biconditional elimination (from 4)






X
∈
X
→
Y


{\displaystyle X\in X\to Y}



Contraction (from 5)






(
X
∈
X
→
Y
)
→
X
∈
X


{\displaystyle (X\in X\to Y)\to X\in X}



Biconditional elimination (from 4)






X
∈
X


{\displaystyle X\in X}



Modus ponens (from 6 and 7)






Y


{\displaystyle Y}



Modus ponens (from 8 and 6)



Step 4 is the only step invalid in a consistent set theory. In Zermelo-Fraenkel set theory, an extra hypothesis stating the sethood of X would be required, that is provable in neither ZF nor in its extension ZFC (with the axiom of choice).
Therefore, in a consistent set theory, the set 




{
x
∣
x
∈
x
→
Y
}



{\displaystyle \left\{x\mid x\in x\to Y\right\}}

 does not exist for false Y. This can be seen as a variant on Russell's paradox, but is not identical. Some proposals for set theory have attempted to deal with Russell's paradox not by restricting the rule of comprehension, but by restricting the rules of logic so that it tolerates the contradictory nature of the set of all sets that are not members of themselves. The existence of proofs like the one above shows that such a task is not so simple, because at least one of the deduction rules used in the proof above must be omitted or restricted.

Discussion[edit]
Terminology[edit]
Natural language and mathematical logic are both based on asserting some statements to be true. A statement may be represented as a logical (or boolean) expression (or formula) which may be evaluated to give a value of true or false. An assertion is a statement or logical expression that, it is asserted, when evaluated, will give the value true.
Statements may also be considered in more complex ways. Statements may be qualified by who states, or believe them, and by level of certainty. However, for logic, the simple definition given above is sufficient.
Existence problem[edit]
This paradox is similar to,

Liar paradox
Russell's paradox

in that each paradox attempts to give a name for something that does not exist. These paradoxes all attempt to give a name or representation to a solution to the equation,

X = ¬X

Note that the paradox does not arise from asserting the statement of ¬X, as such a statement would be a lie. It arises from the consideration and naming of the statement. The paradox arises by naming or representing an expression of the form ¬X to be X. In the case of Curry's Paradox, the negation is constructed from implication,

X = X → false = ¬X ∨ false = ¬X

The domain of a boolean variable X is the set {true, false}. However neither true or false is a solution to the above equation. So it must be wrong to assert the existence of X, and it is falsehood to name the expression ¬X as X.
The paradox exists whenever an expression can be constructed whose value does not exist. This may be achieved using "this statement", but there are many other language features that allow the construction of an expression that does not exist.
Language capabilities for expressing the paradox[edit]
Curry's paradox can be formulated in any language supporting basic logic operations that also allows a self-recursive function to be constructed as an expression. The following list gives some mechanisms that support the construction of the paradox but the list is not exhaustive.

Self-reference; "this sentence".
Through naming of an expression which includes the name.
Apply naive set theory (Unrestricted comprehension).

The logic rules used in the construction of the proof are,

rule of assumption for conditional proof
contraction
modus ponens

The self-recursive function can then be used to define a non terminating computation whose value is solution to an equation. In Curry's Paradox we use implication to construct a negation, that constructs an equation with no solution.
The recursive expression then represents a value that does not exist. The laws of logic are only valid for Boolean values in {true, false}, so any deduction made from the expression may be in error.
Natural languages nearly always contain many of features that could be used to construct the paradox, as do many other languages. Usually the addition of meta programming capabilities to a language will add the features needed.
Mathematical logic generally does not countenance explicit reference to its own sentences. However the heart of Gödel's incompleteness theorems is the observation that a self-reference can be added; see Gödel number.
The axiom of Unrestricted comprehension adds the ability to construct a recursive definition in set theory. This axiom is not supported by modern set theory.
Consequences for some formal logic[edit]
In the 1930s, Curry's Paradox and the related Kleene–Rosser paradox played a major role in showing that formal logic systems based on self-recursive expressions are inconsistent.

Lambda calculus
Combinatory logic

Curry started with the Kleene–Rosser paradox[2] and deduced that the core problem could be expressed in this simpler Curry's paradox.[3] His conclusion may be stated as saying that the Combinatory logic and Lambda calculus could not be made consistent as a deductive language, while allowing recursion.
In the study of illative (deductive) combinatory logic, Curry in 1941[4] recognized the implication of the paradox as implying that, without restrictions, the following properties of a combinatory logic are incompatible:

Combinatorial completeness. This means that an abstraction operator is definable (or primitive) in the system, which is a requirement on the expressive power of the system.
Deductive completeness. This is a requirement on derivability, namely, the principle that in a formal system with material implication and modus ponens, if Y is provable from the hypothesis X, then there is also a proof of X → Y.[5]

Resolution[edit]
Note that unlike the liar paradox or Russell's paradox, this paradox does not depend on what model of negation is used, as it is completely negation-free. Thus paraconsistent logics can still be vulnerable to this, even if they are immune to the liar paradox.
No resolution in lambda calculus[edit]
The origin of Alonzo Church's lambda calculus may have been, "How can you solve an equation, to provide a definition of a function?". This is expressed in this equivalence,





f
 
x
=
y

⟺

f
=
λ
x
.
y


{\displaystyle f\ x=y\iff f=\lambda x.y}



This definition is valid if there is one and only one function 



f


{\displaystyle f}

 that satisfies the equation 



f
 
x
=
y


{\displaystyle f\ x=y}

 but invalid otherwise. This is the core of the problem that Stephen Cole Kleene and then Haskell Curry discovered with Combinatory logic and Lambda calculus.
The situation may be compared to defining,





y
=

x

2



⟺

x
=


y




{\displaystyle y=x^{2}\iff x={\sqrt {y}}}



This definition is fine as long as only positive values are allowed for the square root. In mathematics an existentially quantified variable may represent multiple values, but only one at a time. Existential quantification is the disjunction of many instances of an equation. In each equation there is one value for the variable.
However, in mathematics, an expression with no free variables must have one and only one value. So 





4




{\displaystyle {\sqrt {4}}}

 can only represent 



+
2


{\displaystyle +2}

. However there is no convenient way to restrict the lambda abstraction to one value, or to assure that there is a value.
Lambda calculus allows recursion by passing the same function as called, as a parameter. This allows situations where 



f
 
x
=
y


{\displaystyle f\ x=y}

 has multiple, or no solutions for 



f


{\displaystyle f}

.
Lambda calculus may be considered as part of mathematics if only lambda abstractions that represent a single solution to an equation are allowed. Other lambda abstractions are incorrect in mathematics.
Curry's paradox, and other paradoxes arise in Lambda Calculus because of the inconsistency of Lambda calculus considered as a deductive system. See also deductive lambda calculus.
Domain of lambda calculus terms[edit]
Lambda calculus is a consistent theory in its own domain. However it is not consistent to add the lambda abstraction definition to general mathematics. Lambda terms describe values from the lambda calculus domain. Each lambda term has a value in that domain.
When translating expressions from mathematics to lambda calculus the domain of lambda calculus terms is not always isomorphic to the domain of the mathematical expressions. This lack of isomorphism is the source of the apparent contradictions.
Resolution in unrestricted languages[edit]
There are many language constructs that implicitly invoke an equation that may have none or many solutions. The sound resolution to this problem is to syntactically link these expressions to an existentially quantified variable. The variable represents the multiple values in a way that is meaningful in common human reasoning, but is also valid in mathematics.
For example a natural language that allows the Eval function is not mathematically consistent. But each call to Eval in that natural language may be translated into mathematics in a way that is consistent. The translation of Eval(s) into mathematics is,

let x = Eval(s) in x

So where s = "Eval(s) → y"

let x = x → y in x

If y is false then the x = x → y is false, but this is a falsehood, not a paradox.
The existence of the variable x was implicit in the natural language. The variable x is created when the natural language is translated into mathematics. This allows us to use natural language, with natural semantics, while maintaining mathematical integrity.
Resolution in formal logic[edit]
The argument in formal logic starts with assuming the validity of naming (X → Y) as X. However this is not a valid starting point. First we must deduce the validity of the naming. The following theorem is easily proved and represents such a naming.





∀
A
,
∃
X
,
X
=
A


{\displaystyle \forall A,\exists X,X=A}



In the above statement the formula A is named as X. Now attempt to instantiate the formula with (X → Y) for A. However this is not possible as the scope of 



∃
X


{\displaystyle \exists X}

 is inside the scope of 



∀
A


{\displaystyle \forall A}

. The order of the quantifiers may be reversed using Skolemization.





∃
f
,
∀
A
,
f
(
A
)
=
A


{\displaystyle \exists f,\forall A,f(A)=A}



However now instantiation gives,





f
(
X
→
Y
)
=
X
→
Y


{\displaystyle f(X\to Y)=X\to Y}



which is not the starting point for the proof and does not lead to a contradiction. There are no other instantiations for A that lead to the starting point of the paradox.
Resolution in set theory[edit]
In Zermelo–Fraenkel set theory the axiom of unrestricted comprehension is replaced with a group of axioms that allow construction of sets. So Curry's paradox cannot be stated in ZFC. ZFC evolved in response to Russell's paradox.
See also[edit]

Russell's paradox
Girard's paradox
Kleene–Rosser paradox
List of paradoxes
Richard's paradox
Zermelo–Fraenkel set theory
Fixed-point combinator
Deductive lambda calculus
Let expression

References[edit]



^ Barwise, Jon; Etchemendy, John (1987). The Liar: An Essay on Truth and Circularity. New York: Oxford University Press. p. 23. ISBN 0195059441. Retrieved 24 January 2013. 
^ Kleene, S. C. & Rosser, J. B. (1935). "The inconsistency of certain formal logics". Annals of Mathematics. 36 (3): 630–636. doi:10.2307/1968646. 
^ The Inconsistency of Certain Formal Logic Haskell B. Curry The Journal of Symbolic Logic Vol. 7, No. 3 (Sep., 1942), pp. 115-117 Published by: Association for Symbolic Logic Article Stable URL: http://www.jstor.org/stable/2269292
^ Curry, Haskell B. (1941). "The Paradox of Kleene and Rosser". Transactions of the American Mathematical Society. 50: 454–516. MR 0005275. doi:10.1090/S0002-9947-1941-0005275-6. Retrieved 24 January 2013. 
^ Stenlund, Sören (1972). Combinators, λ-terms, and Proof Theory. Dordrecht: D. Reidel. p. 71. ISBN 978-9027703057. 



External links[edit]

Beall, J. C. "Curry's paradox". Stanford Encyclopedia of Philosophy. 
Cantini, Andrea. "Paradoxes and Contemporary Logic". Stanford Encyclopedia of Philosophy. 
Penguins Rule the Universe: A Proof that Penguins Rule the Universe, a brief and entertaining discussion of Curry's paradox.







v
t
e


Logical paradoxes



Self-reference



Barber
Berry
Bhartrhari's
Court
Crocodile
Curry's
Epimenides
Grelling–Nelson
Kleene–Rosser
Liar

Card
Pinocchio
Quine's
Yablo's


Richard's
Russell's
Socratic








Vagueness



Theseus' ship
Sorites





Other paradoxes



Barbershop
Catch-22
Drinker
Entailment
Lottery
Plato's beard
Raven
Ross'
Unexpected hanging






List of paradoxes








 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Curry%27s_paradox&oldid=790583000"					
Categories: Mathematics paradoxesMathematical logicParadoxes of naive set theorySelf-referential paradoxes 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


BosanskiCatalàDeutschEspañolFrançaisItalianoעבריתMagyar日本語PolskiPortuguêsРусскийSuomiУкраїнська 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 14 July 2017, at 18:08.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 












Hide Videos


















































LIST OF IMAGES


Loading...















































Curry's Paradox by ryansmailes - Teaching Resources - Tes






































 





















Resources



Pre-K and Kindergarten


Elementary


Middle school


High school


Special education


Authors' hub


Tes Teach





Jobs



Primary


Secondary


Supply


International


Careers advice


Recruit with Tes





Community



Recent posts


Search forums


Ofsted Blog


DfE Blog





News



School news (international)


Magazine





Courses



Teaching courses


CPD courses


Institute blog





Store



Elements


Magazine





● Help







Resources
Jobs
Community
News
Courses
Store


Search










Log
          in
Register
          for free






Resources
Jobs
News
Community
Courses
Log out
Help




Home feed 
My list
Courses 
Jobs 
Resources 
Author dashboard
Settings
Edit your profile
Mailing preferences
Account
Log out




Home
Resources
Jobs
News
Register for free
Log in
Help












Register for free


Already registered?

Log in















 


Free5(1)Downloaded 164 timesViewed 640 timesDownloadSave for laterReport a problemCurry's Paradox5(1)Prepared by Created byryansmailesSaveCreated: Mar 5, 2012| Updated: Mar 6, 2012ShareEmailPost3 slides showing various arrangements of a set of polygons. What is the true area? Why are there 3 different answers? Notebook and PowerPoint formats available.Free5(1)Downloaded 164 timesViewed 640 timesDownloadSave for laterReport a problemPreviewFiles included (2)Game, puzzle, quizCurry's Paradox Powerpointpptx, 152 KBGame, puzzle, quizCurry's_Paradoxnotebook, 17 KBAbout this resourceInfoCreated: Mar 5, 2012Updated: Mar 6, 2012Game, puzzle, quizCurry's Paradox PowerpointpptxGame, puzzle, quizCurry's_ParadoxnotebookReport a problemThis resource is designed for UK      teachers.  View US          version        .
1 Review555Diomedes71a year agoreportGreat, just what I was looking for - puzzle the intuition about the idea of conservation of area - under the operation of cutting ? rigid twists ? enlargement ... da ! Stretched triangle / Triangle of constant height ! We'll always have a keen eye for properties that are conserved.

Categories & GradesMath / Geometry and measures / 2D properties of shapes8th9th10th11thOther resources by this authorMaths Puzzle PowerPoint114 Slides which encourage the use of mathematics to solve problems. Answers are attached for most of the problems.By ryansmailes(50)FREETESMaths Christmas Activities BookletA collection of Christmas themed Maths puzzles and problems. Ideal for the end of term.By ryansmailes(86)FREETESEnd of Term General Knowledge QuizGeneral knowledge quiz with answers.By ryansmailes(21)FREEPopular paid resourcesPlotting coordinates using up to four quadrants!I have created this for a year 5 top set maths group. It is differentiated 3 ways, yellow being the less able, green able and pink more able. This ...By lauraexplorer(34)$1.33KS3 Circles-Rescue the princess-adventure gameAdventure game in which students answer KS3 circle questions in order to rescue a princess. Teacher notes and answers are provided. There are 5 sec...By kmbheck(14)$1.33Pentomino puzzles activityInvestigation and problem solving activity in which students identify all the different pentominoes, then fit them into shapes (50 different shapes...By kmbheck(15)$2.65New resourcesQuilt block patternsA set of 3 single sided activity sheets with solutions. Students need to carefully use a pencil and ruler to construct straight lines on the grid p...By Maths2Measure(0)$3.98Properties of quadrilaterals- Fill in the miising words starter/plenaryUsed with my lower ability Year 7s. The missing words are listed but you could remove them to provide more challenge.By annclewes(1)FREETangram InvestigationThis activity can be used as an individual or class investigation of the properties of the tangram. There are many different types of questions tha...By Maths2Measure(0)$3.98Updated resourcesCIRCLES - IntroductionThis colourful powerpoint uses animations and photographs to introduce or revise the vocabulary needed for working with circles e.g. radius, diamet...By Skillsheets(2)$3.05Printable ruler with times tables, fraction and directed number supportTesting this idea of giving students a ruler that has additional information such as times tables, fractions and directed numbers. An explanation i...By clenghaus(0)FREEYear 2 Autumn/Harvest/Halloween themed Fractions - differentiated levelsThese Year 2 fractions questions are Autumn, Harvest and Halloween themed. There are 3 differentiated levels of reasoning and arithmetic problems w...By blossomingminds(0)$5.30

































Curry's paradox - wikipedia

































Business
Scalping forex
Forex Trading
Forex
 













Sector Analysis
Income Analysis
Macro Analysis
Forex strategy
Daily Forex News
Forex futures
 




Curry’s paradox – wikipedia

05.04.2017
             Daily Forex News






. Claims of the form “if A, then B” are called conditional claims. Market futures quotes Curry’s paradox uses a particular kind of self-referential conditional sentence, as demonstrated in this example: If this sentence is true, then Germany borders China.
Even though Germany does not border China, the example sentence certainly is a natural-language sentence, and so the truth of that sentence can be analyzed.




 Binary to hex The paradox follows from this analysis. Fraction to whole number calculator The analysis consists of two steps.
• Second, the truth of the example sentence can be used to prove that Germany borders China. Kroner to usd Because Germany does not border China, this suggests that there has been an error in one of the proofs.
The claim “Germany borders China” could be replaced by any other claim, and the sentence would still be provable; thus every sentence appears to be provable, similar to the principle of explosion. Love quotes tagalog Because the proof uses only well-accepted methods of deduction, and because none of these methods appears to be incorrect, this situation is paradoxical. Euronews online russian Proof that the sentence is true [ edit ]
The following analysis is used to show that the sentence “If this sentence is true, then Germany borders China” is itself true. Usd myr chart The quoted sentence is of the form “If A, then B” where A refers to the sentence itself and B refers to “Germany borders China”. Usd cad analysis Such sentences are called conditional sentences, and the standard method for proving them is called conditional proof. Troy isd To apply this method, the first step is to assume for the sake of argument that the hypothesis (A) is true. Convert binary to decimal The goal is then to show that the conclusion (B) can be proven from that assumption. Crossword puzzle usa today Therefore, for the purpose of the proof, assume A.
Because A refers to the overall sentence, this means that assuming A is the same as assuming “If A, then B”. The millionaire real estate agent pdf Therefore, in assuming A, we have assumed both A and “If A, then B”. Gender identity disorder test From these, we can obtain B by an application of the standard deduction rule modus ponens. Chf usd chart Therefore, A implies B, and we have proved “If this sentence is true, then Germany borders China” is true. Usps shipping cost Therefore “Germany borders China”, should be true — but it actually is false! The paradox is caused by the fact that the deduction rules used in the proof are standard rules that are used in many other settings; thus, the paradox casts doubt on the correctness of these rules. Usd gbp exchange rate Less formally
Consider both cases. Us dollar rate today in india If we assume the sentence is true, then Germany must border China. Usa today newspaper But Germany does not border China, so the sentence is false. Stock futures cnn money So we assume the sentence is false; then Germany may not border China. Gbp to usd Since Germany in fact does not border China, the sentence is true. World stock markets cnnmoney Therefore assuming the sentence is true yields a false sentence and assuming the sentence is false yields a true sentence. 1 usd to zmk The Curry paradox shows that through self-reference, we can have a logically inconsistent statement. Gbp usd exchange rate live Thus any system that allows for such a statement is a logically inconsistent system; such systems are called ‘naive’. Math smartboard games Formal logic [ edit ]
The example in the previous section used unformalized, natural-language reasoning. Futures market hours today Curry’s paradox also occurs in some varieties of formal logic. Usa today sports odds In this context, it shows that if we assume there is a formal sentence (X → Y), where X itself is equivalent to (X → Y), then we can prove Y with a formal proof. 1 usd to chf One example of such a formal proof is as follows. Fraction worksheets 3rd grade For an explanation of the logic notation used in this section, refer to the list of logic symbols.
An alternative proof is via Peirce’s law. Yahoo futures If X = X → Y then (X → Y) → X. Grain futures markets This together with Peirce’s law ((X → Y) → X) → X and modus ponens implies X and subsequently Y (as in above proof).
Therefore, if Y is an unprovable statement in a formal system, there is no statement X in that system such that X is equivalent to the implication (X → Y). Call option in the money By contrast, the previous section shows that in natural (unformalized) language, for every natural language statement Y there is a natural language statement Z such that Z is equivalent to (Z → Y) in natural language. Decimal operations worksheet Namely, Z is “If this sentence is true then Y”.
In specific cases where the classification of Y is already known, few steps are needed to reveal the contradiction. Dollar to pound conversion rate For example, when Y is “Germany borders China,” it is known that Y is false.
Even if the underlying mathematical logic does not admit any self-referential sentences, certain forms of naive set theory are still vulnerable to Curry’s paradox. Usd rmb exchange rate In set theories which allow unrestricted comprehension, we can nevertheless prove any logical statement Y by examining the set X = d e f { x ∣ ( x ∈ x ) → Y } . Verizon modem password {\displaystyle X\ {\stackrel {\mathrm {def} }{=}}\ \left\{x\mid (x\in x)\to Y\right\}.}
• ( x = X → ( ( ( x ∈ x ) → Y ) ↔ ( ( X ∈ X ) → Y ) ) ) {\displaystyle (x=X\to (((x\in x)\to Y)\leftrightarrow ((X\in X)\to Y)))} Addition of a consequent to both sides of a biconditional (from 2)
Step 4 is the only step invalid in a consistent set theory. Gender roles in society articles In Zermelo-Fraenkel set theory, an extra hypothesis stating the sethood of X would be required, that is provable in neither ZF nor in its extension ZFC (with the axiom of choice).
Therefore, in a consistent set theory, the set { x ∣ ( x ∈ x ) → Y } {\displaystyle \left\{x\mid (x\in x)\to Y\right\}} does not exist for false Y. Exchange rate rupee to usd This can be seen as a variant on Russell’s paradox, but is not identical. Binary code decoder Some proposals for set theory have attempted to deal with Russell’s paradox not by restricting the rule of comprehension, but by restricting the rules of logic so that it tolerates the contradictory nature of the set of all sets that are not members of themselves. Stock market futures implied open The existence of proofs like the one above shows that such a task is not so simple, because at least one of the deduction rules used in the proof above must be omitted or restricted.
Natural language and mathematical logic are both based on asserting some statements to be true. The box movie A statement may be represented as a logical (or boolean) expression (or formula) which may be evaluated to give a value of true or false. Nok usd An assertion is a statement or logical expression that, it is asserted, when evaluated, will give the value true.
Statements may also be considered in more complex ways. Vnd to usd converter Statements may be qualified by who states, or believe them, and by level of certainty. Binary code translation However, for logic, the simple definition given above is sufficient. 1 usd to rmb Existence problem [ edit ]
in that each paradox attempts to give a name for something that does not exist. Usps shipping supplies These paradoxes all attempt to give a name or representation to a solution to the equation, X = ¬X
Note that the paradox does not arise from asserting the statement of ¬X, as such a statement would be a lie. Exchange rate usd to rmb It arises from the consideration and naming of the statement. Exchange rate us to canada The paradox arises by naming or representing an expression of the form ¬X to be X. What is a binary number In the case of Curry’s Paradox, the negation is constructed from implication, X = X → false = ¬X ∨ false = ¬X
The domain of a boolean variable X is the set {true, false}. Convert idr to usd However neither true or false is a solution to the above equation. Commodity futures price quotes So it must be wrong to assert the existence of X, and it is falsehood to name the expression ¬X as X.
The paradox exists whenever an expression can be constructed whose value does not exist. Usd to nzd This may be achieved using “this statement”, but there are many other language features that allow the construction of an expression that does not exist. Euro dollar exchange rate chart Language capabilities for expressing the paradox [ edit ]
Curry’s paradox can be formulated in any language supporting basic logic operations that also allows a self-recursive function to be constructed as an expression. Us futures market live The following list gives some mechanisms that support the construction of the paradox but the list is not exhaustive.
The self-recursive function can then be used to define a non terminating computation whose value is solution to an equation. Usd aud exchange rate In Curry’s Paradox we use implication to construct a negation, that constructs an equation with no solution.
The recursive expression then represents a value that does not exist. 1 usd to malaysian ringgit The laws of logic are only valid for Boolean values in {true, false}, so any deduction made from the expression may be in error.
Natural languages nearly always contain many of features that could be used to construct the paradox, as do many other languages. Futures markets explained Usually the addition of meta programming capabilities to a language will add the features needed.
Mathematical logic generally does not countenance explicit reference to its own sentences. Usd to aud converter However the heart of Gödel’s incompleteness theorems is the observation that a self-reference can be added; see Gödel number.
The axiom of Unrestricted comprehension adds the ability to construct a recursive definition in set theory. Usd to ringgit This axiom is not supported by modern set theory. Best used bookstores nyc Consequences for some formal logic [ edit ]
In the 1930s, Curry’s Paradox and the related Kleene–Rosser paradox played a major role in showing that formal logic systems based on self-recursive expressions are inconsistent.
Curry started with the Kleene–Rosser paradox [2] and deduced that the core problem could be expressed in this simpler Curry’s paradox. Python xml [3] His conclusion may be stated as saying that the Combinatory logic and Lambda calculus could not be made consistent as a deductive language, while allowing recursion.
In the study of illative (deductive) combinatory logic, Curry in 1941 [4] recognized the implication of the paradox as implying that, without restrictions, the following properties of a combinatory logic are incompatible:
• Combinatorial completeness. Binary file download This means that an abstraction operator is definable (or primitive) in the system, which is a requirement on the expressive power of the system.
• Deductive completeness. Cad to usd converter This is a requirement on derivability, namely, the principle that in a formal system with material implication and modus ponens, if Y is provable from the hypothesis X, then there is also a proof of X → Y. Hex to binary converter [5]
Note that unlike the liar paradox or Russell’s paradox, this paradox does not depend on what model of negation is used, as it is completely negation-free. Binary code reader Thus paraconsistent logics can still be vulnerable to this, even if they are immune to the liar paradox. Famous quotes about friendship No resolution in lambda calculus [ edit ]
The origin of Alonzo Church’s lambda calculus may have been, “How can you solve an equation, to provide a definition of a function?”. Picture format converter This is expressed in this equivalence, f x = y ⟺ f = λ x . Gbp to usd exchange rate history y {\displaystyle f\ x=y\iff f=\lambda x.y}
This definition is valid if there is one and only one function f {\displaystyle f} that satisfies the equation f x = y {\displaystyle f\ x=y} but invalid otherwise. Binary editor This is the core of the problem that Stephen Cole Kleene and then Haskell Curry discovered with Combinatory logic and Lambda calculus.
This definition is fine as long as only positive values are allowed for the square root. Usd to inr history In mathematics an existentially quantified variable may represent multiple values, but only one at a time. Gold chart 1 year Existential quantification is the disjunction of many instances of an equation. Pounds to us dollars converter In each equation there is one value for the variable.
However, in mathematics, an expression with no free variables must have one and only one value. Binary multiplication So 4 {\displaystyle {\sqrt {4}}} can only represent + 2 {\displaystyle +2} . Call option price formula However there is no convenient way to restrict the lambda abstraction to one value, or to assure that there is a value.
Lambda calculus allows recursion by passing the same function as called, as a parameter. Usd to sgd conversion This allows situations where f x = y {\displaystyle f\ x=y} has multiple, or no solutions for f {\displaystyle f} .
Lambda calculus may be considered as part of mathematics if only lambda abstractions that represent a single solution to an equation are allowed. Usa today sudoku answers Other lambda abstractions are incorrect in mathematics.
Curry’s paradox, and other paradoxes arise in Lambda Calculus because of the inconsistency of Lambda calculus considered as a deductive system. Binary worksheet See also deductive lambda calculus. Fx rate gbp to usd Domain of lambda calculus terms [ edit ]
Lambda calculus is a consistent theory in its own domain. Usd to myr exchange rate However it is not consistent to add the lambda abstraction definition to general mathematics. Future stock market crash Lambda terms describe values from the lambda calculus domain. Canadian dollar to usd Each lambda term has a value in that domain.
When translating expressions from mathematics to lambda calculus the domain of lambda calculus terms is not always isomorphic to the domain of the mathematical expressions. Rs to us dollar This lack of isomorphism is the source of the apparent contradictions. Gold price 2016 Resolution in unrestricted languages [ edit ]
There are many language constructs that implicitly invoke an equation that may have none or many solutions. Cool pictures of nature The sound resolution to this problem is to syntactically link these expressions to an existentially quantified variable. Name in binary The variable represents the multiple values in a way that is meaningful in common human reasoning, but is also valid in mathematics.
For example a natural language that allows the Eval function is not mathematically consistent. Pound usd But each call to Eval in that natural language may be translated into mathematics in a way that is consistent. Currency converter jpy to usd The translation of Eval(s) into mathematics is, let x = Eval(s) in x
The existence of the variable x was implicit in the natural language. 1 usd to sgd The variable x is created when the natural language is translated into mathematics. Decimal word problems grade 6 This allows us to use natural language, with natural semantics, while maintaining mathematical integrity. Stock market futures charts Resolution in formal logic [ edit ]
The argument in formal logic starts with assuming the validity of naming (X → Y) as X. Aud to usd forecast 2015 However this is not a valid starting point. Usd law school ranking First we must deduce the validity of the naming. Famous quotes about life The following theorem is easily proved and represents such a naming. Exchange rate pounds to us dollars ∀ A , ∃ X , X = A {\displaystyle \forall A,\exists X,X=A}
In the above statement the formula A is named as X. Binary code generator Now attempt to instantiate the formula with (X → Y) for A. Dow futures trading hours However this is not possible as the scope of ∃ X {\displaystyle \exists X} is inside the scope of ∀ A {\displaystyle \forall A} . Uk to us conversion The order of the quantifiers may be reversed using Skolemization. Usd inr rate ∃ f , ∀ A , f ( A ) = A {\displaystyle \exists f,\forall A,f(A)=A}
which is not the starting point for the proof and does not lead to a contradiction. Equity finance investment There are no other instantiations for A that lead to the starting point of the paradox. British pound historical exchange rate Resolution in set theory [ edit ]
In Zermelo–Fraenkel set theory the axiom of unrestricted comprehension is replaced with a group of axioms that allow construction of sets. Xau usd forecast today So Curry’s paradox cannot be stated in ZFC. Binary form music ZFC evolved in response to Russell’s paradox. Pln usd exchange rate See also [ edit ]
More from my siteCurry’s paradox – wikipediaCurry’s paradox – wikipediaBrexit will fundamentally change the future of europe _ huffington post understanding binaryThe non-binary anorexic_ disordered eating, disordered gender _ huffington post usd rub chartJosh linkner_ discovering learning moments binary mathTherapeutic solutions receives allowance on patent claim from the us patent office covering projuvenol(r) active ingredient pterostilbene in cancer immunotherapies – yahoo finance


binary file download, binary multiplication, exchange rate rupee to usd, gbp to usd exchange rate, vnd to usd converter



Menu 
Business

Daily Forex News

Forex

Forex futures

Forex strategy

Forex Trading

Income Analysis

Macro Analysis

NO

Scalping forex

Sector Analysis


 



Archives 
July 2017
June 2017
May 2017
April 2017
March 2017
February 2017
January 2017
December 2016
November 2016
October 2016
September 2016
August 2016
July 2016
June 2016
May 2016
April 2016
March 2016
February 2016
January 2016
December 2015
November 2015
October 2015
September 2015
August 2015
July 2015
June 2015
May 2015
April 2015
March 2015

  New posts 

Secure ota firmware update with cc1310 – hackster. io


Presidency moves to confirm onnoghen as cjn _


Alternative gender roles research paper


Concho resources (cxo) announces sale of the alpha crude connector system in $1.22b deal


Providers _ east amherst psychology group


 Tags1 usd
aud usd
binary c
binary code
binary convert
binary file
binary number
binary numbers
binary search
binary to
call option
convert binary
currency exchange
currency market
decimal to binary
dollar exchange rate
exchange rate
exchange rates
exchange rate usd
famous quotes
foreign currency
foreign exchange
funny jokes
funny quotes
gbp to usd
inr to usd
market futures
nzd usd
pound exchange rate
rmb to usd
stock market futures
the binary
the box
the forex
to binary
usa today
usd cad
usd chart
usd eur
usd exchange
usd exchange rate
usd exchange rate history
usd rate
usd to
usd to rm
 















             © 2017  Exchange Forex. Real investments and money

Powered by Exchange Forex. Real investments and money

All materials are found on open spaces of a network the Internet as freely extended and laid out exclusively in the fact-finding purposes. If you are what lawful legal owner or a product and against its placing on the given site, inform us and we will immediately remove the given material. The administration of a site does not bear responsibility for actions of the visitors breaking copyrights. abuzesite@bigmir.net






















Carlyle, EOG Resources Form $400M Drilling Partnership in Oklahoma | 2017-05-22 | Natural Gas Intelligence











































 





 

HOMEDAILY GPIDAILY GPI HOMERockies Express (REX)M&ARegulatoryMarketsInfrastructureProductionNGVLNGStorageMexicoSHALE DAILYSHALE DAILY HOMEAll Basins> Arkoma-Woodford> Bakken> Barnett> Cana-Woodford> Eagle Ford> Haynesville> Marcellus> Montney> Niobrara> Oklahoma Liquids Plays> Permian> San Juan> Upper Devonian> UticaCanadian Oil SandsInternational ShaleNGINGI ALL NEWS ACCESSNGI MIDDAY PRICE ALERTNGI FORWARD LOOKNGI WEEKLY NEWSLETTERNGI BIDWEEK ALERTNGI BIDWEEK SURVEYNGI WEEKLY GPIPublishing CalendarDATANGI's MidDay Price AlertPrice Data "Learn More"Gas Price "Snapshots">Forward Basis Prices>Daily Prices>Weekly Prices>Bidweek PricesBidweek Alert DataShale Gas Prices (subscriber-only)NGI Price Index Methodology (pdf)NGI Shale Price Index Methodology (pdf)NGI Datafeed Spec and Automation*New* March 2017 Price Table Notice



Login

Subscribe or Register



Email



Password





Remember Me

 Forgot your password? 







My NGI Welcome, 




Logout



ABOUTNGI CorporateNewsletter/Data ServicesPublishing CalendarAdvertise with NGIThought LeadershipCareersContact UsMar. 1 Subscriber NoticeRESEARCHWEBINARSWebinar Replay- Super Power - Solving the Appalachia Gas GlutWebinar Replay- Cracking the Ethane Code in AppalachiaWebinar Replay- Mexico: Market of TomorrowWebinar Replay- Natural Gas Price Volatility 2015Special Reports4Q16 U.S. Oil & Gas Earnings Report: Research and Analysis2017 Natural Gas Pipelines & Shale Resource Plays  MapREX Tracker2Q2017 Earnings Calls ListNGI Forward Look Price PrimerNGI's Ranking of Top North American Natural Gas Marketers (Q1)2016 NGI'S Shale Plays FactbookEventsSPECIAL REPORTS** NEW ** Haynesville 2.0 Special Report: The Once and Future KingPipelines and Power Appalachia Special ReportOilfield Services 3Q Earnings Calls - Special ReportSCOOP / STACK Special ReportInside Cenagas - Special ReportPermian Special ReportCracker Special ReportMexico Special ReportBakken Special ReportDUCs Special ReportSoutheast Special ReportMarcellus/Utica Special ReportTRIALTrial Subscription: NGI's All News AccessTrial Subscription: NGI's Forward LookTrial Subscription: NGI's Bidweek AlertSUBSCRIBE


View Cart
 







Advanced Search






Natural Gas Intelligence is a leading daily provider of natural gas prices, natural gas news, and gas pricing data to the deregulated North American natural gas industry
























NGI's Shale Basin Prices (Subscriber Content )




U.S. Unconventional Basin Rig Count




 2Q2017 Earnings Calls List & Coverage











NGI's NatGas Prices - Biggest Movers


Daily
NOVA/AECO C

-0.56


Weekly
Westcoast Station 2

-0.76


Bidweek
Dominion North

-0.89


Shale
Cana - Woodford

-0.07






Subscriber Content

Shale Basin Prices




PDF 
Current Issue
 
Premium Content

Shale Price Data FeedShale Price Historical Data








North America Resource Plays
CanadaDuvernay ShaleEastern CanadaHorn RiverMontney ShaleGulf CoastBarnett ShaleEagle Ford ShaleEaglebineHaynesville ShaleLower Smackover/Brown DensePermian BasinTuscaloosa Marine ShaleMid-ContinentArkoma-WoodfordCana-WoodfordFayetteville ShaleGranite WashMississippian LimeOklahoma Liquid PlaysNortheastMarcellusUpper Devonian/Huron ShaleUticaRocky Mountains/WestBakken ShaleGreen River BasinMontereyNiobrara/Denver-Julesburg Basin Paradox BasinPiceance BasinPowder River BasinSan Juan BasinUinta Basin




NatGas Cash Flat Off Storage Report, Expired August Futures End on Firm Note


Pemex NatGas Production Down, But 2Q Profits Sharply Higher


Trump Reportedly Threatens Retaliation Against Alaska For Murkowski Healthcare Vote


Shell Adopts ‘Lower-Forever Mindset’ on Crude Oil Prices


Futures Jump Following Thin NatGas Storage Gains
 




Home » Carlyle, EOG Resources Form $400M Drilling Partnership in Oklahoma



E&P / Mid-Continent / Shale Daily / NGI The Weekly Gas Market Report / NGI All News Access
Carlyle, EOG Resources Form $400M Drilling Partnership in Oklahoma

Charlie Passut
May 22, 2017




TAGS carlyle  /  cleveland  /  energy



          Email
          / 
Print





|
          

            More
          




 / Text Size+



Larger
Smaller
 [X]





Related Articles

Continental Increasing Focus on Oklahoma's Stacked Plays After Impressive Well Results


Linn’s Renamed Midstream Arm Blue Mountain Clinches Deal for Oklahoma Cryogenic Plant 


EOG Shatters Industry Records in Permian’s Delaware



Related Products

North American Natural Gas Pipelines & Shale/Resource Plays 2014 Edition


NGI's Forward Look


NGI's Forward Look Data Feed 1-Year






	The Carlyle Group LP, a global private equity firm, announced Monday that it has entered into an agreement to form a joint venture (JV) with EOG Resources Inc., and will invest up to $400 million to help the company develop its oil and natural gas assets in Oklahoma.

	Carlyle said that as part of the JV, its Carlyle Energy Mezzanine Opportunities Fund II LP will fund a development program in Ellis County over four years. "After certain performance hurdles are achieved in the program, Carlyle's working interests will largely revert to EOG," the firm said.

	Additional details of the JV were not disclosed, and Houston-based EOG did not release a statement.

	Ellis County is prospective to the Cleveland and Tonkawa formations in the Anadarko Basin.

	According to data from the Oklahoma Corporation Commission (OCC), which regulates oil and gas activities in the state, natural gas production in Ellis County totaled approximately 48 Bcf in 2012, the most recent year where figures were available. Meanwhile, crude oil and condensate production totaled more than 4.7 million bbl.

	The OCC's most recent Intent to Drill file, which lists activity over the past seven days, shows three operators plan to drill a total of seven wells targeting the Cleveland and Tonkawa formations. Nichols Operating LLC plans to drill one Cleveland well, while Mid-Con Energy Operating LLC is planning two Cleveland wells and Fourpoint Energy LLC is planning four in the Tonkawa.

	Earlier this month, EOG reported that four wells in the Permian Basin had record-breaking production, which helped the company beat its production guidance and returned it to profitability.

	At the end of the first quarter, Carlyle managed $162 billion worth of assets under 287 investment vehicles. Its two energy sector funds -- Carlyle Energy Mezzanine Opportunities Fund LP and Carlyle Energy Mezzanine Opportunities Fund II LP -- have combined assets of approximately $4 billion.


Email



Tweet

























Associate Editor | Dulles, VA

Charlie Passut joined the staff of NGI in February 2011. Before this he was a reporter for the Tidewater News and a copy editor for the Manassas Journal Messenger. He also served as systems administrator and web editor for the Oakland Press, and traveled extensively as a software installer/trainer for Baseview Products. He graduated from Northern Illinois University with a bachelor's degree in political science in 1992.

charlie.passut@naturalgasintel.com









    Recent Articles by Charlie Passut



Appellate Court Hears Oral Arguments on BLM Fracking Rule


Trump Reportedly Threatens Retaliation Against Alaska For Murkowski Healthcare Vote


EPA Moving Forward With Plans to Rescind WOTUS Definition











Restricted Content
You must have JavaScript enabled to enjoy a limited number of articles over the next 180 days.
Please click here to continue without javascript..













About NGI












Natural Gas Intelligence (NGI), is a leading provider of natural gas, shale news and market information for the deregulated North American natural gas industry. Since the first issue of Natural Gas Intelligence was published in 1981, NGI has provided key pricing and data relied upon daily by thousands of industry participants in the U.S, Canada and Mexico as well as Central and South America, Europe and Asia.



HOMEDAILY GPISHALE DAILYNGIDATAABOUT2017 SHALE/PIPELINE MAPEVENTSSUBSCRIBEADVERTISE

























Copyright ©2017. All Rights Reserved
  	Privacy Policy |
  	Terms Of Use. 
  	Design, CMS, Hosting & Web Development :: ePublishing

 


 












Omnipotence Paradox by Passion Johnson on PreziCreateExploreLearn & supportGet startedLog inPricingGet startedLog inMy PrezisExploreLearn & supportProductCompanyCareersSupportCommunityContactAppsEnglishEspañol한국어日本語DeutschPortuguêsFrançaisMagyarItaliano×Houston, we have a problem!Oops. A firewall is blocking access to Prezi content. Check out this article to learn more or contact your system administrator.
            Stand out and be remembered with Prezi,  
            the secret weapon of great presenters.
        
                    Get started today
                
                    Get started
                
            What is Prezi?
            
                Learn more
            
                Loading presentation...
            
        You’re using the new, improved player. You can always go back to the old viewer.
    Switch back
            
                
                    Public
                
            
            
                & reusable
            
        
            Create your own
        
                    Make a copy
                
    Share

        Embed
    
                Liked
            
                Like
            Present Remotely Send the link below via email or IMCopy Present to your audienceStart remote presentationInvited audience members will follow you as you navigate and presentPeople invited to a presentation do not need a Prezi accountThis link expires 10 minutes after you close the presentationA maximum of 30 users can follow your presentationLearn more about this feature in our knowledge base article
    Do you really want to delete this prezi?

    Neither you, nor the coeditors you shared it with will be able to recover it again.
DeleteCancelMake your likes visible on Facebook?
        Connect your Facebook account to Prezi and let your likes appear on your timeline.
        You can change this under Settings & Account at any time.
    No, thanksConnect with FacebookOmnipotence Paradox
                            
                                No description
                            
                        
        
            by Passion Johnson
        
        on 6 February 2013
    TweetComments (0)
                                    Please log in to add your comment.
                                Report abuseTranscript of Omnipotence ParadoxWhat is a Paradox? 1. A argument that produces an inconsistency, typically within logic or common sense. 2. Most logical paradoxes are known to be invalid arguments but are still valuable in promoting critical thinking Is the Paradox resolved? Many paradoxes do allow for resolution, though many remain unresolved such as the Curry's Paradox. Philosophy: Omnipotence Paradox "Can an omnipotent being create a rock too heavy for itself to lift?1. If he could lift the rock, then it seems that the being could cease to be omnipotent, as the rock was not heavy enough; if he could not, it seems that the being was not omnipotent to begin with.Omnipotence also means unlimited power Dates,Origins,Etc. The argument in medieval happened in the 12th century, addressed by Averroes (1126-1198) and later by Thomas Aquinas.Full transcriptMore presentations by
    
        
            Passion Johnson
        Untitled PreziUntitled PreziTaxiCab GeometryBy: Passion Johnson and Jaquavius Mooring
            More prezis by author
        Popular presentationsSee more popular or the latest prezisPreziProductGalleryThe ScienceConversational PresentingFor BusinessTestimonialsCompanyAboutTeamCareersOur ValuesPressOur CustomersContact UsLanguages
                    English
                
                    Español
                
                    한국어
                
                    日本語
                
                    Deutsch
                
                    Português
                
                    Français
                
                    Magyar
                
                    Italiano
                InfogramChartsInfographicsSupportPrezi Next SupportPrezi Classic SupportBlogSee all© 2017 Prezi Inc. TermsPreziProductGalleryThe ScienceConversational PresentingFor BusinessTestimonialsInfogramInfogramChartsInfographicsCompanyAboutTeamCareersOur ValuesPressOur CustomersContact UsSupportPrezi Next SupportPrezi Classic SupportLanguages
                                English
                            
                                Español
                            
                                한국어
                            
                                日本語
                            
                                Deutsch
                            
                                Português
                            
                                Français
                            
                                Magyar
                            
                                Italiano
                            © 2017 Prezi Inc. TermsConnect your Facebook account to Prezi and publish your likes in the future. OkNo, thanks


Search results for `Curry’s paradox` - PhilPapers









































Sign in | Create an account



PhilPapers
PhilEvents
PhilJobs







































Syntax
Advanced Search











New

All new items
Books
Journal articles
Manuscripts



Browse

All Categories
Metaphysics and Epistemology

Metaphysics and EpistemologyEpistemology
Metaphilosophy
Metaphysics
Philosophy of Action
Philosophy of Language
Philosophy of Mind
Philosophy of Religion
M&E, Misc

Value Theory

Value TheoryAesthetics
Applied Ethics
Meta-Ethics
Normative Ethics
Philosophy of Gender, Race, and Sexuality
Philosophy of Law
Social and Political Philosophy
Value Theory, Miscellaneous

Science, Logic, and Mathematics

Science, Logic, and MathematicsLogic and Philosophy of Logic
Philosophy of Biology
Philosophy of Cognitive Science
Philosophy of Computing and Information
Philosophy of Mathematics
Philosophy of Physical Science
Philosophy of Social Science
Philosophy of Probability
General Philosophy of Science
Philosophy of Science, Misc

History of Western Philosophy

History of Western PhilosophyAncient Greek and Roman Philosophy
Medieval and Renaissance Philosophy
17th/18th Century Philosophy
19th Century Philosophy
20th Century Philosophy
History of Western Philosophy, Misc

Philosophical Traditions

Philosophical TraditionsAfrican/Africana Philosophy
Asian Philosophy
Continental Philosophy
European Philosophy
Philosophy of the Americas
Philosophical Traditions, Miscellaneous

Philosophy, Misc

Philosophy, MiscPhilosophy, Introductions and Anthologies
Philosophy, General Works
Teaching Philosophy
Philosophy, Miscellaneous

Other Academic Areas

Other Academic AreasNatural Sciences
Social Sciences
Cognitive Sciences
Formal Sciences
Arts and Humanities
Professional Areas
Other Academic Areas, Misc





Journals



Submit material

Submit a book or article
Upload a bibliography
Personal pages we track
Archives we track
Information for publishers



More

Introduction
Discussion forums
Submitting to PhilPapers
Frequently Asked Questions
Subscriptions
Editor's Guide
The Categorization Project
For Publishers
For Archive Admins
Contact us
PhilPapers Surveys
API
Bargain Finder
About PhilPapers













Syntax
Advanced Search











Sign in
Create an account














Syntax
Advanced Search

































Results for 'Curry’s paradox' (try it on Scholar)

1000+ foundOrder:List dateFirst authorImpactPub yearRelevanceDownloads
Order

Options
1 filter applied





BibTeX / EndNote / RIS / etc

Export this page:

Choose a format..
Formatted textPlain textBibTeXZoteroEndNoteReference Manager

    Limit to  items. 
    

 
 



Restrictions

 pro authors only
 online only
 open access only
 published only

 filter by language
Configure languages here.
Sign in to use this feature.



 
 

Viewing options






 show categories





 categorization shortcuts



  
 hide abstracts

  
 open articles in new windows






Open Category Editor











 399 Curry's Paradox and Omega Inconsistency.Andrew Bacon - 2013 -  Studia Logica 101 (1):1-9.detailsIn recent years there has been a revitalised interest in non-classical solutions to the semantic paradoxes. In this paper I show that a number of logics are susceptible to a strengthened version of Curry's paradox. This can be adapted to provide a proof theoretic analysis of the omega-inconsistency in Lukasiewicz's continuum valued logic, allowing us to better evaluate which logics are suitable for a naïve truth theory. On this basis I identify two natural subsystems of Lukasiewicz logic which individually, (...) but not jointly, lack the problematic feature. (shrink)Fuzzy Logic in Logic and Philosophy of Logic Liar Paradox in Logic and Philosophy of Logic Many-Valued Logic in Logic and Philosophy of Logic Russell's Paradox in Philosophy of Mathematics Substructural Logic in Logic and Philosophy of Logic  Direct download (6 more)     Export citation     My bibliography   4 citations   
 50 Curry's Paradox in Contractionless Constructive Logic.Seiki Akama - 1996 -  Journal of Philosophical Logic 25 (2):135 - 150.detailsWe propose contractionless constructive logic which is obtained from Nelson's constructive logic by deleting contractions. We discuss the consistency of a naive set theory based on the proposed logic in relation to Curry's paradox. The philosophical significance of contractionless constructive logic is also argued in comparison with Fitch's and Prawitz's systems.                             Liar Paradox in Logic and Philosophy of Logic Logic and Philosophy of Logic Nonclassical Logics in Logic and Philosophy of Logic Paradoxes, Misc in Logic and Philosophy of Logic Substructural Logic in Logic and Philosophy of Logic  Direct download (5 more)     Export citation     My bibliography  
 61 Natural Deduction and Curry's Paradox.Susan Rogerson - 2007 -  Journal of Philosophical Logic 36 (2):155 - 179.detailsCurry's paradox, sometimes described as a general version of the better known Russell's paradox, has intrigued logicians for some time. This paper examines the paradox in a natural deduction setting and critically examines some proposed restrictions to the logic by Fitch and Prawitz. We then offer a tentative counterexample to a conjecture by Tennant proposing a criterion for what is to count as a genuine paradox.           Proof Theory in Logic and Philosophy of Logic  Direct download (6 more)     Export citation     My bibliography  
 29 Curry's Paradox, Generalized Modus Ponens Axiom and Depth Relevance.Gemma Robles & José M. Méndez - 2014 -  Studia Logica 102 (1):185-217.details“Weak relevant model structures” (wr-ms) are defined on “weak relevant matrices” by generalizing Brady’s model structure ${\mathcal{M}_{\rm CL}}$ built upon Meyer’s Crystal matrix CL. It is shown how to falsify in any wr-ms the Generalized Modus Ponens axiom and similar schemes used to derive Curry’s Paradox. In the last section of the paper we discuss how to extend this method of falsification to more general schemes that could also be used in deriving Curry’s Paradox.  Liar Paradox in Logic and Philosophy of Logic Logic and Philosophy of Logic  Direct download (4 more)     Export citation     My bibliography  
 110 Two Flavors of Curry's Paradox.Jc Beall & Julien Murzi - 2013 -  Journal of Philosophy 110 (3):143-165.detailsIn this paper, we distinguish two versions of Curry's paradox: c-Curry, the standard conditional-Curry paradox, and v-Curry, a validity-involving version of Curry's paradox that isn’t automatically solved by solving c-curry. A uniﬁed treatment of curry paradox thus calls for a uniﬁed treatment of both c-Curry and v-Curry. If, as is often thought, c-Curry paradox is to be solved via non-classical logic, then v-Curry may require a lesson about the structure—indeed, the substructure—of the validity relation itself.Liar Paradox in Logic and Philosophy of Logic Logical Consequence and Entailment in Logic and Philosophy of Logic  Direct download (6 more)     Export citation     My bibliography   24 citations   
 87 Curry's Paradox.Jc Beall - manuscriptdetailsCurry's paradox, so named for its discoverer, namely Haskell B. Curry, is a paradox within the family of so-called paradoxes of self-reference (or paradoxes of circularity). Like the liar paradox (e.g., ‘this sentence is false’) and Russell's paradox , Curry's paradox challenges familiar naive theories, including naive truth theory (unrestricted T-schema) and naive set theory (unrestricted axiom of abstraction), respectively. If one accepts naive truth theory (or naive set theory), then Curry's paradox becomes a (...) direct challenge to one's theory of logical implication or entailment. Unlike the liar and Russell paradoxes Curry's paradox is negation-free; it may be generated irrespective of one's theory of negation. An intuitive version of the paradox runs as follows. (shrink)Liar Paradox in Logic and Philosophy of Logic  Direct download     Export citation     My bibliography   2 citations   
 65 Curry's Paradox, Lukasiewicz, and Field.Peter Smith - unknowndetailsIn approaching Ch. 4 of Saving Truth from Paradox, it might be helpful first to revisit Curry’s original paper, and to revisit Lukasiewicz too, to provide more of the scenesetting that Field doesn’t himself fill in. So in §1 I’ll say something about Curry, in §2 we’ll look at what Lukasiewicz was up to in his original three-valued logic, and in §3 we’ll look at the move from a three-valued to a many-valued Lukasiewicz logic. In §4, I move (...) on to announce a theorem by H´. (shrink)Liar Paradox in Logic and Philosophy of Logic Logic and Philosophy of Logic  Direct download (2 more)     Export citation     My bibliography  
 81 Curry's Paradox.Robert K. Meyer, Richard Routley & J. Michael Dunn - 1979 -  Analysis 39 (3):124 - 128.detailsLiar Paradox in Logic and Philosophy of Logic  Direct download (5 more)     Export citation     My bibliography   27 citations   
 51 Curry's Paradox and 3-Valued Logic.A. N. Prior - 1955 -  Australasian Journal of Philosophy 33 (3):177 – 182.detailsLiar Paradox in Logic and Philosophy of Logic  Direct download (5 more)     Export citation     My bibliography   2 citations   
Curry's Paradox.K. Meyer Robert & Church Alonso - 1979 -  Analysis 39 (3):124.detailsNo categories Direct download     Export citation     My bibliography  
Review: A. N. Prior, Curry's Paradox and 3-Valued Logic. [REVIEW]Gert Heinz Muller - 1957 -  Journal of Symbolic Logic 22 (1):90-91.detailsLiar Paradox in Logic and Philosophy of Logic Logic and Philosophy of Logic  Direct download (2 more)     Export citation     My bibliography  
Curry's Paradox and 3-Valued Logic.A. N. Prior - 1957 -  Journal of Symbolic Logic 22 (1):90-91.detailsLogic and Philosophy of Logic   Export citation     My bibliography  
 48 Validity Curry Strengthened.Lionel Shapiro - 2013 -  Thought: A Journal of Philosophy 2 (1):100-107.detailsSeveral authors have argued that a version of Curry's paradox involving validity motivates rejecting the structural rule of contraction. This paper criticizes two recently suggested alternative responses to “validity Curry.” There are three salient stages in a validity Curry derivation. Rejecting contraction blocks the first, while the alternative responses focus on the second and third. I show that a distinguishing feature of validity Curry, as contrasted with more familiar forms of Curry's paradox, is that paradox arises already (...) at the first stage. Accordingly, blocking the second or third stages won't suffice for resolving the paradox. (shrink)Logical Consequence and Entailment in Logic and Philosophy of Logic Paradoxes, Misc in Logic and Philosophy of Logic  Direct download (4 more)     Export citation     My bibliography   4 citations   
 11 Variations on a Theme of Curry.Lloyd Humberstone - 2006 -  Notre Dame Journal of Formal Logic 47 (1):101-131.detailsAfter an introduction to set the stage, we consider some variations on the reasoning behind Curry's Paradox arising against the background of classical propositional logic and of BCI logic and one of its extensions, in the latter case treating the "paradoxicality" as a matter of nonconservative extension rather than outright inconsistency. A question about the relation of this extension and a differently described (though possibly identical) logic intermediate between BCI and BCK is raised in a final section, which closes (...) with a handful of questions left unanswered by our discussion. (shrink)Liar Paradox in Logic and Philosophy of Logic Logic and Philosophy of Logic  Direct download (4 more)     Export citation     My bibliography   2 citations   
 152 Deflating Logical Consequence.Lionel Shapiro - 2011 -  Philosophical Quarterly 61 (243):320-342.detailsDeflationists about truth seek to undermine debates about the nature of truth by arguing that the truth predicate is merely a device that allows us to express a certain kind of generality. I argue that a parallel approach is available in the case of logical consequence. Just as deflationism about truth offers an alternative to accounts of truth's nature in terms of correspondence or justification, deflationism about consequence promises an alternative to model-theoretic or proof-theoretic accounts of consequence's nature. I then (...) argue, against considerations put forward by Field and Beall, that Curry's paradox no more rules out deflationism about consequence than the liar paradox rules out deflationism about truth. (shrink)Logical Consequence and Entailment in Logic and Philosophy of Logic Minimalism and Deflationism about Truth in Philosophy of Language Substructural Logic in Logic and Philosophy of Logic  Direct download (7 more)     Export citation     My bibliography   18 citations   
A Relevant Invalidity In Curry's Foundations.Richard Sylvan - 1987 -  Bulletin of the Section of Logic 16 (1):51-53.detailsCurry claims that the positive paradox principle, ` A ⊃ in his elementary statement presentation, ‘is valid in any normal interpretation’ . By previous deﬁnition, ‘an interpretation of a system S is a normal interpretation just when the proposition A is true when and only when ` A’ . But his argument to normal validity is interestingly, and relevantly, invalid.                    Liar Paradox in Logic and Philosophy of Logic   Export citation     My bibliography  
 40 Do Philosophical Intuitions Need Calibration?Marko Jurjako - 2015/2016 -  Anthropology and Philosophy 12:73-84.detailsIn his seminal paper ‘Reflection on Reflective Equilibrium’ Robert Cummins argued that if intuitions are to serve as reliable guides to philosophical truths then we should be able to check their reliability in particular cases. However, if we can check the reliability of intuitions then that means that we have an independent non-intuitive access to the domain that intuitions are supposed to disclose, which in effect makes intuitions obsolete. Overgaard, Gilbert and Burwood in their book ‘An Introduction to Metaphilosophy’ respond (...) to Cummins’ argument by claiming that at least logical intuitions do not demand independent validation because they provide cases of obvious noncontroversial truths. In this paper I discuss one aspect of the question concerning the reliability of philosophical intuitions. In particular, by relying on the so-called Curry’s paradox, I argue that even the intuitions concerning the validity of the basic logical rules, such as the modus ponens, can be problematized. In this respect, I argue that Cummins’ argument remains a viable challenge for those who think that intuitions provide special and undisputed authority in philosophical theorising. (shrink)Intuition, Misc in Epistemology Metaphilosophy, Misc in Metaphilosophy Paradoxes, Miscellaneous in Logic and Philosophy of Logic  Direct download     Export citation     My bibliography  
 7 Non-Deterministic Conditionals and Transparent Truth.Federico Pailos & Lucas Rosenblatt - 2015 -  Studia Logica 103 (3):579-598.detailsTheories where truth is a naive concept fall under the following dilemma: either the theory is subject to Curry’s Paradox, which engenders triviality, or the theory is not trivial but the resulting conditional is too weak. In this paper we explore a number of theories which arguably do not fall under this dilemma. In these theories the conditional is characterized in terms of non-deterministic matrices. These non-deterministic theories are similar to infinitely-valued Łukasiewicz logic in that they are consistent (...) and their conditionals are quite strong. The difference is the following: while Łukasiewicz logic is \-inconsistent, the non-deterministic theories might turn out to be \-consistent. (shrink)Liar Paradox in Logic and Philosophy of Logic Logic and Philosophy of Logic Nonclassical Logics in Logic and Philosophy of Logic  Direct download (2 more)     Export citation     My bibliography  
 39 Naive Structure, Contraction and Paradox.Lionel Shapiro - 2015 -  Topoi 34 (1):75-87.detailsRejecting structural contraction has been proposed as a strategy for escaping semantic paradoxes. The challenge for its advocates has been to make intuitive sense of how contraction might fail. I offer a way of doing so, based on a “naive” interpretation of the relation between structure and logical vocabulary in a sequent proof system. The naive interpretation of structure motivates the most common way of blaming Curry-style paradoxes on illicit contraction. By contrast, the naive interpretation will not as easily motivate (...) one recent noncontractive approach to the Liar paradox. (shrink)Liar Paradox in Logic and Philosophy of Logic Paradoxes in Logic and Philosophy of Logic Proof Theory in Logic and Philosophy of Logic Substructural Logic in Logic and Philosophy of Logic Value Theory  Direct download (3 more)     Export citation     My bibliography   2 citations   
 68 Curry's Revenge: The Costs of Non-Classical Solutions to the Paradoxes of Self-Reference.Greg Restall - 2007 -  In J. C. Beall (ed.), Revenge of the Liar: New Essays on the Paradox. Oxford University Press.detailsThe paradoxes of self-reference are genuinely paradoxical. The liar paradox, Russell’s paradox and their cousins pose enormous difficulties to anyone who seeks to give a comprehensive theory of semantics, or of sets, or of any other domain which allows a modicum of self-reference and a modest number of logical principles. One approach to the paradoxes of self-reference takes these paradoxes as motivating a non-classical theory of logical consequence. Similar logical principles are used in each of the paradoxical inferences. (...) If one or other of these problematic inferences are rejected, we may arrive at a consistent (or at least, a coherent) theory. In this paper I will show that such approaches come at a serious cost. The general approach of using the paradoxes to restrict the class of allowable inferences places severe constraints on the domain of possible propositional logics, and on the kind of metatheory that is appropriate in the study of logic itself. Proof-theoretic and model-theoretic analyses of logical consequence make provide different ways for non-classical responses to the paradoxes to be defeated by revenge problems: the redefinition of logical connectives thought to be ruled out on logical grounds. Non-classical solutions are not the “easy way out” of the paradoxes. (shrink)Liar Paradox in Logic and Philosophy of Logic $21.50 used   $117.17 new   $155.00 direct from Amazon   (collection)   Amazon page Direct download     Export citation     My bibliography   1 citation   
 164 Belief and Self‐Knowledge: Lessons From Moore's Paradox.Declan Smithies - 2016 -  Philosophical Issues 26 (1):393-421.detailsThe aim of this paper is to argue that what I call the simple theory of introspection can be extended to account for our introspective knowledge of what we believe as well as what we consciously experience. In section one, I present the simple theory of introspection and motivate the extension from experience to belief. In section two, I argue that extending the simple theory provides a solution to Moore’s paradox by explaining why believing Moorean conjunctions always involves some (...) degree of irrationality. In section three, I argue that it also solves the puzzle of transparency by explaining why it’s rational to answer the question whether one believes that p by answering the question whether p. Finally, in section four, I defend the simple theory against objections by arguing that self-knowledge constitutes an ideal of rationality. (shrink)Infallibility and Incorrigibility In Self-Knowledge in Philosophy of Mind Moore's Paradox in Philosophy of Language Rationality-Based Accounts of Self-Knowledge in Philosophy of Mind  Direct download (5 more)     Export citation     My bibliography  
 625 Moore's Paradox and Epistemic Norms.Clayton Littlejohn - 2010 -  Australasian Journal of Philosophy 88 (1):79 – 100.detailsWe shall evaluate two strategies for motivating the view that knowledge is the norm of belief. The first draws on observations concerning belief's aim and the parallels between belief and assertion. The second appeals to observations concerning Moore's Paradox. Neither of these strategies gives us good reason to accept the knowledge account. The considerations offered in support of this account motivate only the weaker account on which truth is the fundamental norm of belief.      Epistemic Norms in Epistemology G. E. Moore in 20th Century Philosophy Justification, Misc in Epistemology Knowledge, Misc in Epistemology Moore's Paradox in Philosophy of Language Norms of Assertion in Philosophy of Language  Direct download (6 more)     Export citation     My bibliography   5 citations   
 286 Expressivism and Moore's Paradox.Jack Woods - 2014 -  Philosophers' Imprint 14 (5):1-12.detailsExpressivists explain the expression relation which obtains between sincere moral assertion and the conative or affective attitude thereby expressed by appeal to the relation which obtains between sincere assertion and belief. In fact, they often explicitly take the relation between moral assertion and their favored conative or affective attitude to be exactly the same as the relation between assertion and the belief thereby expressed. If this is correct, then we can use the identity of the expression relation in the two (...) cases to test the expressivist account as a descriptive or hermeneutic account of moral discourse. I formulate one such test, drawing on a standard explanation of Moore's paradox. I show that if expressivism is correct as a descriptive account of moral discourse, then we should expect versions of Moore's paradox where we explicitly deny that we possess certain affective or conative attitudes. I then argue that the constructions that mirror Moore's paradox are not incoherent. It follows that expressivism is either incorrect as a hermeneutic account of moral discourse or that the expression relation which holds between sincere moral assertion and affective or conative attitudes is not identical to the relation which holds between sincere non-moral assertion and belief. A number of objections are canvassed and rejected. (shrink)Moore's Paradox in Philosophy of Language Moral Expressivism in Meta-Ethics Moral Language, Misc in Meta-Ethics  Direct download (3 more)     Export citation     My bibliography   2 citations   
 90 Simpson's Paradox and Causality.Prasanta S. Bandyopadhyay, Mark Greenwood, Don Dcruz & Venkata Raghavan - 2015 -  American Philosophical Quarterly 52 (1):13-25.detailsThere are three questions associated with Simpson’s Paradox (SP): (i) Why is SP paradoxical? (ii) What conditions generate SP?, and (iii) What should be done about SP? By developing a logic-based account of SP, it is argued that (i) and (ii) must be divorced from (iii). This account shows that (i) and (ii) have nothing to do with causality, which plays a role only in addressing (iii). A counterexample is also presented against the causal account. Finally, the causal and (...) logic-based approaches are compared by means of an experiment to show that SP is not basically causal. (shrink)Philosophy of Science, General Works in Philosophy of Science, Misc  Direct download (2 more)     Export citation     My bibliography  
 391 Meno's Paradox in Context.David Ebrey - 2014 -  British Journal for the History of Philosophy 22 (1):4-24.detailsI argue that Meno’s Paradox targets the type of knowledge that Socrates has been looking for earlier in the dialogue: knowledge grounded in explanatory definitions. Socrates places strict requirements on definitions and thinks we need these definitions to acquire knowledge. Meno’s challenge uses Socrates’ constraints to argue that we can neither propose definitions nor recognize them. To understand Socrates’ response to the challenge, we need to view Meno’s challenge and Socrates’ response as part of a larger disagreement about the (...) value of inquiry. (shrink)Plato: Definition in Ancient Greek and Roman Philosophy Plato: Knowledge and Belief in Ancient Greek and Roman Philosophy Plato: Meno's Paradox in Ancient Greek and Roman Philosophy  Direct download (4 more)     Export citation     My bibliography  
 42 Moore's Paradox in Belief and Desire.John N. Williams - 2014 -  Acta Analytica 29 (1):1-23.detailsIs there a Moore ’s paradox in desire? I give a normative explanation of the epistemic irrationality, and hence absurdity, of Moorean belief that builds on Green and Williams’ normative account of absurdity. This explains why Moorean beliefs are normally irrational and thus absurd, while some Moorean beliefs are absurd without being irrational. Then I defend constructing a Moorean desire as the syntactic counterpart of a Moorean belief and distinguish it from a ‘Frankfurt’ conjunction of desires. Next I discuss (...) putative examples of rational and irrational desires, suggesting that there are norms of rational desire. Then I examine David Wall’s groundbreaking argument that Moorean desires are always unreasonable. Next I show against this that there are rational as well as irrational Moorean desires. Those that are irrational are also absurd, although there seem to be absurd desires that are not irrational. I conclude that certain norms of rational desire should be rejected. (shrink)Desire in Philosophy of Mind Moore's Paradox in Philosophy of Language  Direct download (6 more)     Export citation     My bibliography   3 citations   
 11 Mctaggart’s Paradox.Rögnvaldur Ingthorsson - 2016 -  Routledge.detailsMcTaggart’s argument for the unreality of time, first published in 1908, set the agenda for 20th-century philosophy of time. Yet there is very little agreement on what it actually says—nobody agrees with the conclusion, but still everybody finds something important in it. This book presents the first critical overview of the last century of debate on what is popularly called "McTaggart’s Paradox". Scholars have long assumed that McTaggart’s argument stands alone and does not rely on any contentious ontological principles. (...) The author demonstrates that these assumptions are incorrect—McTaggart himself explicitly claimed his argument to be dependent on the ontological principles that form the basis of his idealist metaphysics. The result is that scholars have proceeded to understand the argument on the basis of their own metaphysical assumptions, duly arriving at very different interpretations. This book offers an alternative reading of McTaggart’s argument, and at the same time explains why other commentators arrive at their mutually incompatible interpretations. It will be of interest to students and scholars with an interest in the philosophy of time and other areas of contemporary metaphysics. (shrink)A-Theories of Time in Metaphysics B-Theories of Time in Metaphysics McTaggart's Argument in Metaphysics Time and Change in Metaphysics  Direct download     Export citation     My bibliography   1 citation   
 31 Moore's Paradox and the Priority of Belief Thesis.John N. Williams - 2013 -  Philosophical Studies 165 (3):1117-1138.detailsMoore’s paradox is the fact that assertions or beliefs such asBangkok is the capital of Thailand but I do not believe that Bangkok is the capital of Thailand or Bangkok is the capital of Thailand but I believe that Bangkok is not the capital of Thailand are ‘absurd’ yet possibly true. The current orthodoxy is that an explanation of the absurdity should first start with belief, on the assumption that once the absurdity in belief has been explained then this (...) will translate into an explanation of the absurdity in assertion. This assumption gives explanatory priority to belief over assertion. I show that the translation involved is much trickier than might at first appear. It is simplistic to think that Moorean absurdity in assertion is always a subsidiary product of the absurdity in belief, even when the absurdity is conceived as irrationality. Instead we should aim for explanations of Moorean absurdity in assertion and in belief that are independent even if related, while bearing in mind that some forms of irrationality may be forms of absurdity even if not conversely. (shrink)Moore's Paradox in Philosophy of Language  Direct download (12 more)     Export citation     My bibliography   4 citations   
 47 The Completeness of the Pragmatic Solution to Moore's Paradox in Belief: A Reply to Chan.John N. Williams - 2013 -  Synthese 190 (12):2457-2476.detailsMoore’s paradox in belief is the fact that beliefs of the form ‘ p and I do not believe that p ’ are ‘absurd’ yet possibly true. Writers on the paradox have nearly all taken the absurdity to be a form of irrationality. These include those who give what Timothy Chan calls the ‘pragmatic solution’ to the paradox. This solution turns on the fact that having the Moorean belief falsifies its content. Chan, who also takes the absurdity (...) to be a form of irrationality, objects to this solution by arguing that it is circular and thus incomplete. This is because it must explain why Moorean beliefs are irrational yet, according to Chan, their grammatical third-person transpositions are not, even though the same proposition is believed. But the solution can only explain this asymmetry by relying on a formulation of the ground of the irrationality of Moorean beliefs that presupposes precisely such asymmetry. I reply that it is neither necessary nor sufficient for the irrationality that the contents of Moorean beliefs be restricted to the grammatical first-person. What has to be explained is rather that such grammatical non-first-person transpositions sometimes, but not always, result in the disappearance of irrationality. Describing this phenomenon requires the grammatical first-person/non-first person distinction. The pragmatic solution explains the phenomenon once it is formulated in de se terms. But the grammatical first-person/non-first-person distinction is independent of, and a fortiori, different from, the de se /non- de se distinction presupposed by pragmatic solution, although both involve the first person broadly construed. Therefore the pragmatic solution is not circular. Building on the work of Green and Williams I also distinguish between the irrationality of Moorean beliefs and their absurdity. I argue that while all irrational Moorean beliefs are absurd, some Moorean beliefs are absurd but not irrational. I explain this absurdity in a way that is not circular either. (shrink)Moore's Paradox in Philosophy of Language  Direct download (11 more)     Export citation     My bibliography   3 citations   
 186 Moore's Paradox and the Accessibility of Justification.Declan Smithies - 2012 -  Philosophy and Phenomenological Research 85 (2):273-300.detailsThis paper argues that justification is accessible in the sense that one has justification to believe a proposition if and only if one has higher-order justification to believe that one has justification to believe that proposition. I argue that the accessibility of justification is required for explaining what is wrong with believing Moorean conjunctions of the form, ‘p and I do not have justification to believe that p.’.             Epistemic Internalism and Externalism in Epistemology G. E. Moore in 20th Century Philosophy Justification, Misc in Epistemology Moore's Paradox in Philosophy of Language  Direct download (12 more)     Export citation     My bibliography   29 citations   
 47 Moore's Paradox and Akratic Belief.Eugene Chislenko - 2016 -  Philosophy and Phenomenological Research 92 (3):n/a-n/a.detailsG.E. Moore noticed the oddity of statements like: “It's raining, but I don't believe it.” This oddity is often seen as analogous to the oddity of believing akratically, or believing what one believes one should not believe, and has been appealed to in denying the possibility of akratic belief. I describe a Belief Akratic's Paradox, analogous to Moore's paradox and centered on sentences such as: “I believe it's raining, but I shouldn't believe it.” I then defend the possibility (...) of akratic belief against appeals to this analogy, arguing both that akratic belief does not require belief-akratic-paradoxical belief, and that the latter is importantly different from Moorean belief. I conclude by considering the implications of these arguments for an understanding of both Moorean and akratic belief. (shrink)Irrationality in Epistemology Moore's Paradox in Philosophy of Language Moral Psychology, Misc in Normative Ethics The Nature of Belief in Philosophy of Mind Weakness of Will in Philosophy of Action  Direct download (6 more)     Export citation     My bibliography   1 citation   
 9 Rosser-Type Undecidable Sentences Based on Yablo’s Paradox.Taishi Kurahashi - 2014 -  Journal of Philosophical Logic 43 (5):999-1017.detailsIt is widely considered that Gödel’s and Rosser’s proofs of the incompleteness theorems are related to the Liar Paradox. Yablo’s paradox, a Liar-like paradox without self-reference, can also be used to prove Gödel’s first and second incompleteness theorems. We show that the situation with the formalization of Yablo’s paradox using Rosser’s provability predicate is different from that of Rosser’s proof. Namely, by using the technique of Guaspari and Solovay, we prove that the undecidability of each instance (...) of Rosser-type formalizations of Yablo’s paradox for each consistent but not Σ1-sound theory is dependent on the choice of a standard proof predicate. (shrink)Liar Paradox in Logic and Philosophy of Logic Logic and Philosophy of Logic  Direct download (3 more)     Export citation     My bibliography   2 citations   
 109 On a New Tentative Solution to Fitch’s Paradox.Alessandro Giordani - 2015 -  Erkenntnis 81 (3):597-611.detailsIn a recent paper, Alexander argues that relaxing the requirement that sound knowers know their own soundness might provide a solution to Fitch’s paradox and introduces a suitable axiomatic system where the paradox is avoided. In this paper an analysis of this solution is proposed according to which the effective move for solving the paradox depends on the axiomatic treatment of the ontic modality rather than the limitations imposed on the epistemic one. It is then shown that, (...) once the ontic modality is standardly introduced, the paradox still follows and, in addition, some puzzling consequences arise. (shrink)Doxastic and Epistemic Logic in Logic and Philosophy of Logic Knowability in Epistemology  Direct download (3 more)     Export citation     My bibliography  
 187 An Axiomatic Version of Fitch's Paradox.Samuel Alexander - 2013 -  Synthese 190 (12):2015-2020.detailsA variation of Fitch’s paradox is given, where no special rules of inference are assumed, only axioms. These axioms follow from the familiar assumptions which involve rules of inference. We show (by constructing a model) that by allowing that possibly the knower doesn’t know his own soundness (while still requiring he be sound), Fitch’s paradox is avoided. Provided one is willing to admit that sound knowers may be ignorant of their own soundness, this might offer a way out (...) of the paradox. (shrink)Epistemic Paradoxes, Misc in Epistemology Infallibility in Epistemology Knowability in Epistemology  Direct download (4 more)     Export citation     My bibliography   1 citation   
 155 Eliminativism, Dialetheism and Moore's Paradox.John N. Williams - 2015 -  Theoria 81 (1):27-47.detailsJohn Turri gives an example that he thinks refutes what he takes to be “G. E. Moore's view” that omissive assertions such as “It is raining but I do not believe that it is raining” are “inherently ‘absurd'”. This is that of Ellie, an eliminativist who makes such assertions. Turri thinks that these are perfectly reasonable and not even absurd. Nor does she seem irrational if the sincerity of her assertion requires her to believe its content. A commissive counterpart of (...) Ellie is Di, a dialetheist who asserts or believes that The Russell set includes itself but I believe that it is not the case that the Russell set includes itself. Since any adequate explanation of Moore's paradox must handle commissive assertions and beliefs as well as omissive ones, it must deal with Di as well as engage Ellie. I give such an explanation. I argue that neither Ellie's assertion nor her belief is irrational yet both are absurd. Likewise neither Di's assertion nor her belief is irrational yet in contrast neither is absurd. I conclude that not all Moore-paradoxical assertions or beliefs are irrational and that the syntax of Moore's examples is not sufficient for the absurdity found in them. (shrink)Moore's Paradox in Philosophy of Language  Direct download (10 more)     Export citation     My bibliography  
 88 Defending Transitivity Against Zeno’s Paradox.Ken Binmore & Alex Voorhoeve - 2003 -  Philosophy and Public Affairs 31 (3):272–279.detailsThis article criticises one of Stuart Rachels' and Larry Temkin's arguments against the transitivity of 'better than'. This argument invokes our intuitions about our preferences of different bundles of pleasurable or painful experiences of varying intensity and duration, which, it is argued, will typically be intransitive. This article defends the transitivity of 'better than' by showing that Rachels and Temkin are mistaken to suppose that preferences satisfying their assumptions must be intransitive. It makes cler where the argument goes wrong by (...) showing that it is a version of Zeno's paradox of Achilles and the Tortoise. (shrink)Intransitivity of Value in Value Theory, Miscellaneous Value Theory, Misc in Value Theory, Miscellaneous  Direct download (14 more)     Export citation     My bibliography   6 citations   
 136 Chisholm's Paradox and Conditional Oughts.Catharine Saint Croix & Richmond Thomason - 2014 -  Lecture Notes in Computer Science 8554:192-207.detailsSince it was presented in 1963, Chisholm’s paradox has attracted constant attention in the deontic logic literature, but without the emergence of any definitive solution. We claim this is due to its having no single solution. The paradox actually presents many challenges to the formalization of deontic statements, including (1) context sensitivity of unconditional oughts, (2) formalizing conditional oughts, and (3) distinguishing generic from nongeneric oughts. Using the practical interpretation of ‘ought’ as a guideline, we propose a linguistically (...) motivated logical solution to each of these problems, and explain the relation of the solution to the problem of contrary-to-duty obligations. (shrink)Deontic Logic in Logic and Philosophy of Logic Generics in Philosophy of Language Logic of Conditionals in Philosophy of Language Paradox of Deontological Constraints in Normative Ethics Roderick Chisholm in 20th Century Philosophy  Direct download (2 more)     Export citation     My bibliography  
 84 Moore's Paradox and Moral Motivation.Michael Cholbi - 2009 -  Ethical Theory and Moral Practice 12 (5):495-510.detailsAssertions of statements such as ‘it’s raining, but I don’t believe it’ are standard examples of what is known as Moore’s paradox. Here I consider moral equivalents of such statements, statements wherein individuals affirm moral judgments while also expressing motivational indifference to those judgments (such as ‘hurting animals for fun is wrong, but I don’t care’). I argue for four main conclusions concerning such statements: 1. Such statements are genuinely paradoxical, even if not contradictory. 2. This paradoxicality can be (...) traced to a form of epistemic self-defeat that also explains the paradoxicality of ordinary Moore-paradoxical statements. 3. Although a simple form of internalism about moral judgment and motivation can explain the paradoxicality of these moral equivalents, a more plausible explanation can be provided that does not rely on this simple form of internalism. 4. The paradoxicality of such statements suggests a more credible understanding of the thesis that those who are not motivated by their moral judgments are irrational. (shrink)Moore's Paradox in Philosophy of Language Moral Expressivism in Meta-Ethics  Direct download (5 more)     Export citation     My bibliography   3 citations   
 27 A SOLUTION TO FITCH'S PARADOX OF KNOWABILITY.Helge Rückert - 2004 -  In S. Rahman J. Symons (ed.), Logic, Epistemology, and the Unity of Science. Kluwer Academic Publisher. pp. 351--380.detailsThere is an argument (first presented by Fitch), which tries to show by formal means that the anti-realistic thesis that every truth might possibly be known, is equivalent to the unacceptable thesis that every truth is actually known (at some time in the past, present or future). First, the argument is presented and some proposals for the solution of Fitch's Paradox are briefly discussed. Then, by using Wehmeier's modal logic with subjunctive marks (S5*), it is shown how the derivation (...) can be blocked if one respects adequately the distinction between the indicative and the subjunctive mood. Essentially, this proposal amounts to the one by Edgington which was formulated with the help of the actuality-operator. Finally it is shown how the criticisms by Williamson against Edgington can be answered by the formulation of a new conception of possible knowledge that \alpha (thereby \alpha being in the indicative mood and thus referring to the actual world). This conception is based on the concept of same de re knowledge in different possible worlds. (shrink)Semantic Anti-Realism in Metaphysics  Direct download     Export citation     My bibliography   5 citations   
 18 On Proofs of the Incompleteness Theorems Based on Berry's Paradox by Vopěnka, Chaitin, and Boolos.Makoto Kikuchi, Taishi Kurahashi & Hiroshi Sakai - 2012 -  Mathematical Logic Quarterly 58 (4‐5):307-316.detailsBy formalizing Berry's paradox, Vopěnka, Chaitin, Boolos and others proved the incompleteness theorems without using the diagonal argument. In this paper, we shall examine these proofs closely and show their relationships. Firstly, we shall show that we can use the diagonal argument for proofs of the incompleteness theorems based on Berry's paradox. Then, we shall show that an extension of Boolos' proof can be considered as a special case of Chaitin's proof by defining a suitable Kolmogorov complexity. We (...) shall show also that Vopěnka's proof can be reformulated in arithmetic by using the arithmetized completeness theorem. (shrink)Mathematical Proof in Philosophy of Mathematics  Direct download (7 more)     Export citation     My bibliography   2 citations   
 20 Intuitionistic Epistemic Logic, Kripke Models and Fitch's Paradox.Carlo Proietti - 2012 -  Journal of Philosophical Logic 41 (5):877-900.detailsThe present work is motivated by two questions. (1) What should an intuitionistic epistemic logic look like? (2) How should one interpret the knowledge operator in a Kripke-model for it? In what follows we outline an answer to (2) and give a model-theoretic definition of the operator K. This will shed some light also on (1), since it turns out that K, defined as we do, fulfills the properties of a necessity operator for a normal modal logic. The interest of (...) our construction also lies in a better insight into the intuitionistic solution to Fitch's paradox, which is discussed in the third section. In particular we examine, in the light of our definition, De Vidi and Solomon's proposal of formulating the verification thesis as Φ → ¬¬KΦ. We show, as our main result, that this definition excapes the paradox, though it is validated only under restrictive conditions on the models. (shrink)Formal Epistemology in Epistemology Intuitionistic Logic in Logic and Philosophy of Logic Logic and Philosophy of Logic  Direct download (7 more)     Export citation     My bibliography   2 citations   
 30 Montague’s Paradox, Informal Provability, and Explicit Modal Logic.Walter Dean - 2014 -  Notre Dame Journal of Formal Logic 55 (2):157-196.detailsThe goal of this paper is to explore the significance of Montague’s paradox—that is, any arithmetical theory $T\supseteq Q$ over a language containing a predicate $P$ satisfying $P\rightarrow \varphi $ and $T\vdash \varphi \,\therefore\,T\vdash P$ is inconsistent—as a limitative result pertaining to the notions of formal, informal, and constructive provability, in their respective historical contexts. To this end, the paradox is reconstructed in a quantified extension $\mathcal {QLP}$ of Artemov’s logic of proofs. $\mathcal {QLP}$ contains both explicit modalities (...) $t:\varphi $ and also proof quantifiers $x:\varphi $. In this system, the basis for the rule NEC is decomposed into a number of distinct principles governing how various modes of reasoning about proofs and provability can be internalized within the system itself. A conceptually motivated resolution to the paradox is proposed in the form of an argument for rejecting the unrestricted rule NEC on the basis of its subsumption of an intuitively invalid principle pertaining to the interaction of proof quantifiers and the proof-theorem relation expressed by explicit modalities. (shrink)Logic and Philosophy of Logic Logics in Logic and Philosophy of Logic Modal and Intensional Logic in Logic and Philosophy of Logic Proof Theory in Logic and Philosophy of Logic  Direct download (2 more)     Export citation     My bibliography   1 citation   
 3 Ekman’s Paradox.Peter Schroeder-Heister & Luca Tranchini - forthcoming -  Notre Dame Journal of Formal Logic.detailsPrawitz observed that Russell’s paradox in naive set theory yields a derivation of absurdity whose reduction sequence loops. Building on this observation, and based on numerous examples, Tennant claimed that this looping feature, or more generally, the fact that derivations of absurdity do not normalize, is characteristic of the paradoxes. Striking results by Ekman show that looping reduction sequences are already obtained in minimal propositional logic, when certain reduction steps, which are prima facie plausible, are considered in addition to (...) the standard ones. This shows that the notion of reduction is in need of clarification. Referring to the notion of identity of proofs in general proof theory, we argue that reduction steps should not merely remove redundancies, but must respect the identity of proofs. Consequentially, we propose to modify Tennant’s paradoxicality test by basing it on this refined notion of reduction. (shrink)Logic and Philosophy of Logic  Direct download (2 more)     Export citation     My bibliography  
 128 Signification, Essence, and Meno's Paradox: A Reply to David Charles's 'Types of Definition in the Meno'.Gail Fine - 2010 -  Phronesis 55 (2):125-152.detailsAccording to David Charles, in the Meno Socrates fleetingly distinguishes the signification from the essence question, but, in the end, he conflates them. Doing so, Charles thinks, both leads to Meno's paradox and prevents Socrates from answering it satisfactorily. I argue that Socrates doesn't conflate the two questions, and that his reply to Meno's paradox is more satisfactory than Charles allows.                  Plato: Definition in Ancient Greek and Roman Philosophy Plato: Meno in Ancient Greek and Roman Philosophy Plato: Meno's Paradox in Ancient Greek and Roman Philosophy  Direct download (4 more)     Export citation     My bibliography   1 citation   
 35 A Paraconsistentist Approach to Chisholm's Paradox.Marcelo E. Coniglio & Newton M. Peron - 2009 -  Principia: An International Journal of Epistemology 13 (3):299-326.detailsThe Logics of Deontic (In)Consistency (LDI's) can be considered as the deontic counterpart of the paraconsistent logics known as Logics of Formal (In)Consistency. This paper introduces and studies new LDI's and other paraconsistent deontic logics with different properties: systems tolerant to contradictory obligations; systems in which contradictory obligations trivialize; and a bimodal paraconsistent deontic logic combining the features of previous systems. These logics are used to analyze the well-known Chisholm's paradox, taking profit of the fact that, besides contradictory obligations (...) do not trivialize in LDI's, several logical dependencies of classical logic are blocked in the context of LDI's, allowing to dissolve the paradox. (shrink)Deontic Logic in Logic and Philosophy of Logic Paraconsistent Logic in Logic and Philosophy of Logic Paradoxes, Misc in Logic and Philosophy of Logic Roderick Chisholm in 20th Century Philosophy  Direct download (4 more)     Export citation     My bibliography   2 citations   
 43 Moore's Paradox, Introspection and Doxastic Logic.Adam Rieger - 2015 -  Thought: A Journal of Philosophy 4 (4):215-227.detailsAn analysis of Moore's paradox is given in doxastic logic. Logics arising from formalizations of various introspective principles are compared; one logic, K5c, emerges as privileged in the sense that it is the weakest to avoid Moorean belief. Moreover it has other attractive properties, one of which is that it can be justified solely in terms of avoiding false belief. Introspection is therefore revealed as less relevant to the Moorean problem than first appears.      Doxastic and Epistemic Logic in Logic and Philosophy of Logic Moore's Paradox in Philosophy of Language  Direct download (4 more)     Export citation     My bibliography  
 103 Counterfactuals and Newcomb's Paradox.Daniel Hunter & Reed Richter - 1978 -  Synthese 39 (2):249 - 261.detailsIn their development of causal decision theory, Allan Gibbard and William Harper advocate a particular method for calculating the expected utility of an action, a method based upon the probabilities of certain counterfactuals. Gibbard and Harper then employ their method to support a two-box solution to Newcomb’s paradox. This paper argues against some of Gibbard and Harper’s key claims concerning the truth-values and probabilities of counterfactuals involved in expected utility calculations, thereby disputing their analysis of Newcomb’s Paradox. If (...) we are right, then Gibbard and Harper’s method of calculating expected utility does not adequately represent rational choice. (shrink)Causal Decision Theory in Philosophy of Action Causal Theories of Counterfactuals in Philosophy of Language Evidential Decision Theory in Philosophy of Action Newcomb's Problem in Philosophy of Action  Direct download (5 more)     Export citation     My bibliography   3 citations   
 147 Belief, Assertion and Moore's Paradox.Timothy Chan - 2008 -  Philosophical Studies 139 (3):395 - 414.detailsIn this article I argue that two received accounts of belief and assertion cannot both be correct, because they entail mutually contradictory claims about Moore’s Paradox. The two accounts in question are, first, the Action Theory of Belief (ATB), the functionalist view that belief must be manifested in dispositions to act, and second, the Belief Account of Assertion (BAA), the Gricean view that an asserter must present himself as believing what he asserts. It is generally accepted also that Moorean (...) assertions are absurd, and that BAA explains why they are. I shall argue that ATB implies that some Moorean assertions are, in some fairly ordinary contexts, well justified. Thus BAA and ATB are mutually inconsistent. In the concluding section I explore three possible ways of responding to the dilemma, and what implications they have for the nature of the constitutive relationships linking belief, assent and behavioural dispositions. (shrink)Functionalism in Philosophy of Mind Moore's Paradox in Philosophy of Language Norms of Assertion in Philosophy of Language The Nature of Belief in Philosophy of Mind  Direct download (5 more)     Export citation     My bibliography  
 37 Moore's Paradox in Thought: A Critical Survey.John N. Williams - 2015 -  Philosophy Compass 10 (1):24-37.detailsIt is raining but you don’t believe that it is raining. Imagine silently accepting this claim. Then you believe both that it is raining and that you don’t believe that it is raining. This would be an ‘absurd’ thing to believe,yet what you believe might be true. Itmight be raining, while at the same time, you are completely ignorant of the state of the weather. But how can it be absurd of you to believe something about yourself that might be (...) true of you? This is Moore’s paradox as it occurs in thought. Solving the paradox consists in explaining why such beliefs are absurd. I give a survey of some of the main explanations. I largely deal with explanations of the absurdity of ‘omissive’ beliefs with contents of the form p & I don’t believe that p and of ‘commissive beliefs’ with contents of the form p & I believe that not-p as well as beliefs with contents of the form p & I don’t know that p. (shrink)Moore's Paradox in Philosophy of Language  Direct download (9 more)     Export citation     My bibliography  
 60 The Lesson of Newcomb's Paradox.David H. Wolpert & Gregory Benford - 2013 -  Synthese 190 (9):1637-1646.detailsIn Newcomb’s paradox you can choose to receive either the contents of a particular closed box, or the contents of both that closed box and another one. Before you choose though, an antagonist uses a prediction algorithm to accurately deduce your choice, and uses that deduction to fill the two boxes. The way they do this guarantees that you made the wrong choice. Newcomb’s paradox is that game theory’s expected utility and dominance principles appear to provide conflicting recommendations (...) for what you should choose. Here we show that the conflicting recommendations assume different probabilistic structures relating your choice and the algorithm’s prediction. This resolves the paradox: the reason there appears to be two conflicting recommendations is that the probabilistic structure relating the problem’s random variables is open to two, conflicting interpretations. We then show that the accuracy of the prediction algorithm in Newcomb’s paradox, the focus of much previous work, is irrelevant. We end by showing that Newcomb’s paradox is time-reversal invariant; both the paradox and its resolution are unchanged if the algorithm makes its ‘prediction’ after you make your choice rather than before. (shrink)Decision-Theoretic Puzzles in Philosophy of Action  Direct download (4 more)     Export citation     My bibliography  


1 — 50 / 1000




BibTeX / EndNote / RIS / etc

Export this page:

Choose a format..
Formatted textPlain textBibTeXZoteroEndNoteReference Manager

    Limit to  items. 
    

 
 



Restrictions

 pro authors only
 online only
 open access only
 published only

 filter by language
Configure languages here.
Sign in to use this feature.



 
 

Viewing options






 show categories





 categorization shortcuts



  
 hide abstracts

  
 open articles in new windows






Open Category Editor






Off-campus access

Using PhilPapers from home? 

Create an account to enable off-campus access through your institution's proxy server.





Monitor this page

Be alerted of all new items appearing on this page. Choose how you want to monitor it: 




 Email


 
 RSS feed








Editorial team

General Editors:
David Bourget (Western Ontario)
David Chalmers (ANU, NYU)



Area Editors:
David BourgetGwen BradfordBerit BrogaardMargaret CameronDavid ChalmersJames ChaseRafael De ClercqEzio Di NucciBarry HallenHans HalvorsonJonathan Jenkins IchikawaMichelle KoschØystein LinneboJeeLoo LiuPaul LivingstonBrandon LookManolo MartínezMatthew McGrathMichiru NagatsuSusana NuccetelliGualtiero PiccininiGiuseppe PrimieroJack Alan ReynoldsDarrell RowbottomAleksandra SamonekConstantine SandisHoward SankeyJonathan SchafferThomas SenorRobin SmithDaniel StarJussi SuikkanenLynne TirrellAness Webster

Other editors
Contact us
Learn more about PhilPapers
















loading ..






















Applied ethicsEpistemologyHistory of Western PhilosophyMeta-ethicsMetaphysicsNormative ethicsPhilosophy of biologyPhilosophy of languagePhilosophy of mindPhilosophy of religionScience Logic and MathematicsMore ...



Home | 
    New books and articles |
    Bibliographies |
    Philosophy journals |
    Discussions |
    Article Index |
    About PhilPapers | 
    API |
    Contact us







PhilPapers logo by Andrea Andrews and Meghan Driscoll.



This site uses cookies and Google Analytics (see our terms & conditions for details regarding the privacy implications). 
Use of this site is subject to terms & conditions.
All rights reserved by The PhilPapers Foundation




Page generated Fri Jul 28 07:04:22 2017 on pp1














 

Curry's Paradox Fund I Lp - Funding history, company info, news ...































Want to see more?Want to find out who got funded, and who’s funding the next big thing? in real time? all across the world? tailored to your specific areas of focus?100+ deals per dayGet access to the most exhaustive worldwide funding watch on the web!Comprehensive funding informationKnow about who invested in a company, which sites covered the event, the funding history, etc.Exclusive insightsView original analytics such as most dynamic industries, most active investors, and more!Stay aware!Get emailed when deals critical to your business happen. Filter by region, industry and topics of interest.As seen onHave a login?Sign inRegister now!It's free!Use your social accountOr fill in the quick form:Register nowpromise we won't spamSign invia your social account:via your existing WGF account:Remember meRegister, it's freeForgot your password?SIGN INForgot your password?Enter your e-mail and we will send you your new password.reset passwordThe world's largest funding base/companies/207443-currys-paradox-fund-i-lpsection=companies&subsection=detail&id=207443  




			Search deals by company name, industry, location, investors...			
			




SEARCH


Curry's Paradox Fund I LpCompany DetailsGet alertedif Curry's Paradox Fund I Lp gets funded!Curry's Paradox Fund I LpFunding history Key peopleCountry:State:City:United StatesCaliforniaSan FranciscoIndustry:Finance Funding history DateDeal sizeInvestors August 17th, 2015$693,616-View DealCreate alertManage your alerts in accountWant to know when Curry's Paradox Fund I Lp gets funded?Key peopleLLC AngelList Advisors,DirectorLLC Assure Fund Management,DirectorJens BeyrichExecutive OfficerPlease note that all data is automatically extracted and errors can occur.The WhoGotFunded team has not necessarily reviewed the information in this page and has not determined if it is accurate and complete.Inaccurate Data? Help us improve WhoGotFunded: post a comment!